
The Jurassic Branch
Michael Crichton


Dragons hate dirty leather, white, fur and food.
Bad smell, bad look, bad smell, bad sound, bad smell, bad


poison; So the designer spared no talent to make them more."


Linus, 1797


"Don't underestimate the new way of life."


Irwin Cargoff, 1972
introduction
"InGen said."


In the late 20th century, gold entered the mainstream in a fairly unique way:
He was angry and furious to immediately rectify the situation. Behind the company
It has been attempted - by some external signs - to be updated and the results are great.
He is perfectly educated.

Biotechnology promises a profound change in human life. Earlier this year,
Automated power and computers will have a profound impact on our daily lives. on
In the words of one analyst, biotechnology will transform every aspect of human life: us .
Health, nutrition, fitness, exercise, fitness. Nothing happened.
again. It will change the world.

But the biotechnology revolution differs from conventional science in three important ways .
scenery.

First, the length is great. The United States entered the space age with a scientific plan.
School, Los Alamos. It entered the computer age through the work of dozens of people.
Companies. But biotechnology programs now have more than 2,000
emissions in the United States alone. Fifty companies spend $5 billion a year on this
clean.

Second, there aren’t many positive or negative studies. Used to make pearl truffles
Benefits over coconut water may include strengthening the hair and stimulating hair cells i
A smell you’ve always loved will feel like an affront, but it’s not. Of course, the
Biotechnology is being used in a variety of game-changing applications.
such as toiletries and cleaning supplies;
New technology is powerful.

Third, the work is not managed. No one pays him any attention. No federal law requires it. Nothing there.
Government policy, in the United States or anywhere else in the world. And because things
From biotech to pharmaceuticals to agriculture to artificial ice, smart politics is hard.

But the strange thing is that there is no researcher among the wise. fluent
Fortunately, every scientist involved in the study of the human body is also engaged .
Biotechnology. No compromises. Everyone has a role.


The marketing of invasive biology is the most controversial issue in history.
Science, and it ended up being a huge success. Four hundred years from Galilee;
Science operates as an open and honest inquiry into religion. scientists
They keep on going, subjecting themselves to various threats
Politics is war. Scientists always follow the process of research and continue
They love the idea of ​​trying their hands and seeing themselves in action
It’s for everyone’s benefit. And in many cases, science
Special value.

In 1953, two explorers in England, James Watson and Francis Crook,
They described the structure of DNA and its role as the key to the human spirit.
Hundreds of years of experience to understand the world in education. He waits patiently.
that their gift went for the good of mankind.

However, this did not happen. Thirty years later, almost entirely Watson and Crick .
My neighbors are in another company. Molecular genetics research
It used to be a multi-million dollar project and we could finally get
1953. Then from April 1976 onwards.

Meeting Robert Swanson, Robert Swanson, the legend.
Enter Herber Boyer, a biochemist at the University of California, Berkeley. The two men decided to .
He found a commercial company that used Boyer’s gene editing technology. Their new company,
Genentech quickly became one of the largest and most successful genetic engineering companies.


It seems like everyone wants to be rich. Recommended for startups
Almost weekly, specialists are also called in to conduct genetic research. In 1986, there were 362 employees.
Of these, 64 are members of professional academies and sit on audit committees of biotechnology companies. The number
The number for those in government or consulting firms is often higher.

It’s important to note that this mindset shift is significant. In the past, it was completely
Experts have proposed theories about this phenomenon. They were looking for money as a tool.
Not necessarily, it’s just good for customers. And do workshops, even in prominent places.
Bell or IBM labs are among the few that have their own. Thus, the person
Pure scientists refer to the work of specialized scientists and
In everything. Their privacy policies protect academic scientists from fraud.
Industrial relations is when there is a debate on technological issues, scientists disagree on
They’re there to talk about people’s problems.

But this is not true. There are few insect biologists and little research
Entities with which there is no business relationship. The old days are over. Legacy research continues;
He was angrier than anything. But it was done confidentially, quickly, and cheaply.


At this stage of the industry, it’s probably unnecessary to involve a company as big as Universal .
A Palo Alto Genetic Technologies Inc. It will be worth it. It’s also not surprising that genetic
The problem is not going away. After that, Inghan’s trial was confidential; that
The first incident occurred in Central America, with ur 20
People were there to see it. Of these, only a few survived.

Even in the aftermath, when Gene Technologies International filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy on
San Francisco court order dated October 5, 1989, ignored by the public. fluent
It turns out to be the opposite: InGen is the third small US biotech company to fail .
year, the seventh since 1986.
Japanese financial institutions, such as Hamaguri and Dansaka, are companies that
In this case, you cannot provide information. To avoid misinformation, Daniel Russ, Kuwan, Swan, and
Ross, an Ingen lieutenant, also represented the Japanese workers. is small
A call from the Vice President of Costa Rica could be heard from the front of the room. So it’s not a surprise.
that within a month, Ingen’s problems were solved with enthusiasm and cooperation.

Parties to the Convention, in addition to the education authorities concerned, signed
It’s an unsecured contract, and no one is talking about what happened, but many
"InGen incident" The people at the "InGen incident" didn't sign, and they're probably talking about this reputation
The events took place over two days in August 1989 on a beach in the northwest.
Costa Rica.


The Jurassic Branch
initial:
The raptor report


Rain dripped down on the sheets and washed away the roof of the hospital.
He screams in the car, rolling on the hard floor. Roberta Carter is silent, and
He looked out the window. In the hospital we couldn’t see the sea or the sea beyond.
He approached the right side. This is not what he expected when he arrived at the fishing village
Bahja Anasco, in western Costa Rica, is two months into training as a doctor.
Bobby Carter looks forward to sunshine and laughter after two years of domestic violence
A reception at Michael Reese's home in Chicago.

He had been at Bahja Anasco for three weeks. And it rains every day.

Everything else was fine. Bahja Anasko enjoyed being alone and making friends.
subject. Costa Rica has the top 20 medical systems in the world, and they are the best.
On the west side, the hospital is well equipped and well maintained. Her husband, Manuel
Arag6n, was clever and kind. Bob can use many different medications.
Which he did in Chicago.

But snow! The rain never stops!


Manuel shook his head in secondary. "Listen," he said.

« Honey, | Listen,” Bob said.

"No. Listen."

And then he heard it, another sound mixed with the rain, a deep, steady and .
Until it started: helicopter music. They were no good,” he said.
It comes back to moments like this.

But the sound gets louder, and the helicopter gets lower in the air.
He screamed, stopped, and came back. He saw a helicopter hovering over the water.
past the fishing boats, then walk to the other side of the treehouse, and back
beach.

He was looking for a place to land.

An oversized Sikorsky bird with green paint on its wings and the words “InGen .
recovery." This is the name of the recovery process that creates a new instance
Mountains by the sea. The resort is said to be very comfortable and very comfortable; quite
The locals worked in construction, and he took two
anniversary. Bob can recall American holidays with boats and
Tennis court where guests can play and drink their drinks
The real life of the city.

Bobby wonders what went so far on the island for a helicopter to be here.
weather. In the air, he saw the pilot getting excited as the helicopter took off.
The sand of the sea. The uniformed men rushed out and opened the door. fluent
He heard cheers in Spanish and Manuel nodded.

They called the doctor.


Two black players are holding a hat nearby and a white man is yelling. clean
The man is wearing a blue shirt. A red stripe features on the back of a Mets baseball logo. "There was a
Doctor here?” He said, standing to his feet.

"I'm Dr. Carter," he said. Heavy rain fell and covered his head and neck. that
The black man paused. He was wearing pants and t-shirt. was
He has a stethoscope, and the man takes in salt air.

"Ed Regis. We have a sick child here, Doctor."

"Then you better get him to San Jose," she said. San Jose left in just twenty minutes.
With the wind.

"We can, but we can't cross the mountains right now. You need to heal here."

Bobby stood by the injured man as he was taken to the hospital. With a small one, no.
Those older than eighteen years. She lifted her black shirt and saw a huge cock.
and the other with his feet.

"what happened?"

"Bloody accident," Ed groaned. "He fell. A piece of furniture hit him."

The black, bouncing boy looked distressed.

Manuel stood at the hospital doors, holding his hand. The people won the night.
And he set it on a table in the middle of the room. Manuel sets out on a journey through the forest, and
Bobby turned around the little boy and looked at his body. Suddenly, he could see
otherwise. the child shall surely die.

A large round pierced his leg and punctured his spine. at the gate of trouble;
The meat was messy. In the middle, the body is gone, and the bones are broken. second
The flap is cut over the femoral and tibial bones to expose the soft tissue.
Lower root. His first thought was that his leg was broken.

"Tell me about the problem again," he said.

"|I don't see it," Eddie said. "They said Coke killed her."

"Maybe he got shot," Bobby Carter said, looking around the room. as
Most emergency physicians can vividly remember patients they have seen
year after year. He saw two men. One of them was a two-year-old boy who fell.
by a Rottweiler. Other people studied the circus and created
The Bengal Tiger. Both injuries had their reasons. It has a long history of Bengal.


"Born?" Ed said. "No, no. Kiss on the cheek, trust me." Eddie smiled and said. fluent
He runs around, acting like he’s done nothing wrong. He asks Bobby why. If they do
Civil servants, with no experience in residential construction, must be in danger all the time.

Do you need collagen? Manuel said.

"Yes," she said. "After you think."

He bent down and traced the wound with his fist. When the ground is dry.
There is emptiness in Jagan’s body. But he wasn’t rich, just a few tips.
The flower is represented by the laurel, a kind of pearl, the flower of death and life. heart
I haven't heard that.

How long ago?

"One hour."

Again, he noticed Ed Regis' expression. He was one of those people who was scared and worried. and
It’s not like the building manager. He’s like a leader. Obviously, it contains
background.

Bobby Carter has returned from a party. Somehow he didn't think he
It’s a mechanical problem. It just didn’t make sense. The spinal cord is intact and there is no retention.
component of pain. Any vehicle failure is a factory failure - almost always
He got into some cases. But there’s no one here. However, the man was a gentleman.
He was cut -shot- in the leg, and also in the chest.

She was like the real Molly. On the other hand, most of their bodies are intact, which means
cruelty to animals. He looked back at his head, his hands -

sleeve.

He felt starstruck when he saw the picture of the boy. Both have access
Their hands and their hands and their hands. He worked in Chicago long enough to keep
What does this mean.

"Okay," he said. "Wait outside."

"why?" Eddie said he was scared. He didn't like that.

"Do you want me to help him or not?" He said, pushing the door open and locking it.
forward. He didn't know what was going on, but he didn't like it. Manuel paused. "|Translated
To wash?

"Yes," she said. He reached for the younger Olympus. It took a long time.
It changes the brightness of any sad picture to correct the contrast. It’s like a real event,” he said.
The boy yelled as he dropped his camera and smiled at her. His mouth twitches.
Mouth opened.

“Raptor,” he said. "It's a Raptor…."

As a result, Manuel clearly recoiled in horror.

"What does that mean?" Bobby said.

Manuel shook his head. “I didn’t know Drs.

"I don't?" It sounds like Spanish. "Then go with it."

"Yes Doctor." He licked his lips. "It smells bad." And he cut himself.

Bobby looked back at the black circle on his shoulder. He grabbed it and held it.
Between the ribs. It was like a storm. ...

The wounded boy’s eyes widened. "Raptor," he said.

Manuel said in a fearful voice, "It's over."

"What's wrong?"

"beast."

"What's a raptor?" "fluent

It means hippie.

Bobby rubbed his eyes. Costa Ricans aren’t very religious, but he’s heard some words
hupia spoken in the ancient east. It is said that the angels of old were
The kids get it. According to their beliefs, hippies lived in the mountains of
Costa Rica, but live on offshore islands.

Manuel turns around, speaking and grinning. "It's not good stuff that smells bad," she said.
said. "He's a lover."

Bobby was about to tell him to get back to work when the injured boy opened his eyes and sat up .
On the table. Manuel screamed in terror. The injured boy sighed and shook his head.


He looks left and right with big, bloodshot eyes. what
Suddenly, her body started to relax and hit Bobby, but he was still recovering.
From table to floor. He picked it up again. There was blood everywhere. Ed opened his mouth.
door, “What’s going on?” When Joel saw it, he turned back.
hand to mouth. Bobby reaches into the boat to grab the boy’s mouth, but
He did, he knew he didn’t, and he was shocked and devastated.

She ran for the door, but Manuel grabbed her by the collar and pulled her back.
back. "No," she said. "Hopia is moving."

"Manuel, for god's sake-"

"I don't." He looked at her angrily. "No, you don't understand that."

Bobby looked at his body and knew it was bad; nothing
He could be resurrected. Manuel called the men, they returned home and
The body is destroyed. Eddie relaxed and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand, he whispered, "I trust you."
Do what you do best.
He turned and went into the house.

"Better," said Manuel.

Bobby stares at the boy's hands. He completed himself with his clothes, in
The effects of the defendant’s injury. He was convinced she wasn’t dead.
Construction accidents; She was under attack, baring her hips in her defense.
"Where did you come from on this island?" he asked.

"At sea. Maybe a hundred and twenty miles offshore," "Far from home."
She said.

Manuel looked at the helicopter. "I hope he doesn't come back."

Well, you guessed it, there are pictures too. But when he returned to the table, he said
that his camera was there.


It finally rained that night. Alone in his room outside the hospital, Bobby sat down.
with its own Spanish dictionary. The boy says "raptor", and yet
Manuel’s cousins ​​were, I think, Spanish. Yes, he found it in
dictionary. It means "beast" or "evil".

It gave him happiness. The definition of the word is not well defined by the word hippie.
Of course, he didn’t open the door. And not even a demon broke a leaf on that tree. is
The kid was trying to warn him?

Near the house he heard a noise. Southern Woman added in the 2018 quarter.
service, and Elena Morales, a community volunteer, is in charge. Bobby was in the hospital.
And he motioned for Elena to take off immediately.

"Ilina…."

"SJ Doctor?"

"Do you know what a raptor looks like?"

Elena was blond and in her thirties, a strong, ruthless woman. on
At night, under the stars, he looked up at the sky and said, "Rapper?"

"Yeah, you know that word?"

"SJ." Elena shook her head. "It was basically ... someone came in at night and beat a dog."

Who cheated?

"Yes."

"A hippie?"

Her whole body changed. "No, Doctor."

"why not?"

"Don't talk about Hoopia right now," Elena said sternly, shaking her head in frustration.
A working woman. "We can't say that right now."

"But the fact that he draws and carries it to his men?"

"Come and leave?" Elena said, shocked. "No, doctor. It's nothing like that. It's normal."
It’s a new baby.”
I went to the hospital. "I'll call you when I do, Doctor. | Wait another hour, at most two."


Bobby looked up at the stars and could hear the waves crashing against the shore. on
In the darkness he saw the shadow of fishing boats on the shore. Everything else is
He’s a charming, sweet guy who loves to talk about vampires and little kids.

Bobby returns home and learns that Manuel has insisted that he did not
Words in Spanish. Anxiously, he turned to the Little English Dictionary and said:
See the information there:


raptor \ the [Dr. of L. Ponder's Report, Fr. Raptus]: feathers of birds.


The first line


In the first row of the second column, there is little evidence of
The first mathematical idea will be obvious.


Hi Malcolm
soon
paradise


Mike Bowman looks through his headphones as he drives a Land Ruver in Cabo Blanc
Island of habitat, western Costa Rica. It was a beautiful July morning, and
The trail is beautiful: kissing the rock, looking out over the forest and greenery
Atlantic Ocean. According to the photographer, Cabo Blanco is an unexplored, paradise-like desert.
Looking around now, Boman points out that the holidays are back on track.

Bowman, a 36-year-old Dallas native, came to Costa Rica with
His wife and daughter are going on vacation in a couple of weeks. The road is indeed his own; Every week.
Ellen keeps her ear to the ground about Costa Rica’s beautiful national parks and how beautiful they are.
Tina could see them. And when they arrived, she told Ellen she had something to see .
He paints outdoors in San Jose. It was the first time Mike Bohmer did anything major and
Experience Health is the cheapest in Costa Rica, and we buy all private hospitals


In fact, they argued frequently and Mike felt betrayed by her and vice versa. And he set his feet upon the earth.
Even the Playstation controller. Anyway, well, Ellen is thirteen and
She was a very beautiful woman. Hell, she was a princess at her age in Russia and
It hasn’t happened in a decade. But Ellen is shocked and sad. And so the
Like previous years, he was anxious to preserve his scent.

That, and everything.

The Land Rover crashed into a ditch and was covered in dirt. Sitting down next to him, Elena said, "Mike."
Do you think that's true? We didn’t see each other for hours.”

"There was another car 15 minutes away," he recalled. Remember that blue car?

"I'm going the other way . . ."


"Honey, all you want is a vacation," she said, "and that's what you're going to get."

Elena nodded in agreement. "| I hope you're right."

"Yes, sir | I hope it's clean" Christina said from the back seat. He was eight years old.

"Trust me, I'm fine." He sucked in silence for a while. "So that's it? Look how you look. That's
beautiful."

"Okay," Tony said.

Ellen left the room, looked at herself in the mirror, and rolled her eyes. fluent
He took a deep breath and left the room.

The track began to climb and Mike Baumer stayed at the helm. A little nervous.
A beam of red light flashes down the street and this one screams, "Watch out! Watch out!" And he went out, and departed.
issue.

"What does it mean?" Elin asked. brain?

"It can be a joke," Bowman said.

"Can you ask?" Tina said, taking off her hat and pointing to several animals.
In fact, he attributes his behavior to school work.

"|I don't know," Mike shrugged.

Tina looked at the pictures in the exercise book. "|Don't think of it as a joke," he said.
"| I think it's another voice." They saw many animals scurrying along their path.

"Hi," she said cheerfully. "As the book says, 'The Sea of ​​Cloud White
Several species of wildlife roam here, including raccoons and white-tipped, three-toed sloths.
and Quavatamide.' "Do you think we'll see a teacher with three fingers, sir?"

"|We'll do it."

"really?"

"Just look in the mirror."

"Very scary."

The trail leads through the forest to the sea.


Mike Bowman felt like a star when they reached the beach: Two white miles
arena, running. You park the Land Rover in dense grass.
water, and canned food. Ellen changed into her underwear and said, "Yes | No ".
You know how I feel.

"Good morning, my love." Sure, he thought she was a bit petty, but he had learned not to.
that.

Tina was already walking to the beach.

“Don’t forget you have to wear your sunglasses,” says Ellen.

"Then," Tina said through her shrug. "I'll go see if there's a rumor."

Ellen Bowman looked out at the water, at the trees. "You think it's okay?"

"Damn nobody here for miles," Mike said.

"What about snakes?"

"Oh for God's sake," Mike Bowman said. "There are no rights to water."

"Okay, then…."

"Amiel," she murmured. "Deer are bloodthirsty. They're human. We can't trust them
The body is hot. Ninety degrees outside. When the snake comes out, it bites. believe
I. No deer on the beach." He saw his daughter running towards the beach
A black line on a white background. "Let him go." Let her go.

He put his hand on his wife's waist.


Tina kept going until she was exhausted, then threw herself on the ground in frustration.
He went to the water. The sea was rough and there was no water. sat.
For a moment, she held her breath, then turned to her parents and the car to see .
where he lived.

Her mother looked at her hand and called her back. Tina frantically waved her hand, making sure she didn't.
understand. Tina didn't want to wear sunscreen. He would not return, nor would hearken to his voice.
My mom talks about losing weight. She wanted to stay here and maybe see a black man.

Tina spotted Lazy two days ago at the beast of San Jose. Just like a Muppet
kind of, and it seems like no big deal. However, he couldn’t move; He could have easily run away with her.


Now, hearing her mother, Tina decides to leave for the day and return.
water, in the shade of a tree. On one side of the island, mango trees bloom
The presence of mangrove roots restricts access to land. This one was left in the dust.
and removal of stuck mangrove leaves. He saw some bird feet on the ground. in Costa Rica.
His sheep knew it. Documents say there are three times more tigers in Costa Rica than there were in the 1990s.
Throughout the United States and Canada.

Of course, there are some birds that are too small to be
saw. Other roads were steep and muddy. Tina looks at them.
Just then he heard a rustle, and then another rustle among the trees.

Does he forgive those who have not committed adultery? Tina didn't think so, but she didn't admit it. Kurt came.
Maybe a shark. He waited in silence, without breath, to hear that voice again, at last.
He noticed above the voices a few yards away a dead body emerged from the depths of the woods.
And he tried.

Tina held her breath. A new animal on your list! The dog got up on its hind legs and studied.
She shook her head and looked at him. He stood like that, tall, black and
Red streaks on the back. Small feathers form in the hairs of the ear that move through the air.
The butterfly raised its head and looked.

Tina thought it was weird. It looks like a giant fish. He raised his hand and shook it.
under their hands.

Her smile is fearless. He walked towards her barefoot. It was difficult.
It is bigger than a chicken, and shakes its head like a chicken when it walks. Tina thinks it is.
You know exactly.

He noticed that the wandering insect had left three bird droppings. infant
He approaches Tiny. He hugged his body, not wanting to scare the little animal. heart
He was surprised that he could get so close, but then he remembered that it was a public forum. All this
The animals in the park are known to be mischievous. Maybe these three did. very good
She hopes to give him some food. Unfortunately, he didn’t make it. Slowly, Tina pulled away.
his hand, folded, to show that he had no food.

The butterfly squawked, raised its head, and flew away.

"I'm sorry," Tiny said. "I have nothing."

And, unexpectedly, the scalp flew onto his outstretched hand. Tina can think.
His slender fingers touched the flesh of his hands, and he felt an odd sensation against the animal's skin.
Put it down.

The clown waved his hand.


«|I just wanted to see you,» said Ellen Bowman, squinting in the sunlight. "That's it. Just look."
your."

"It's really good," Mike said as he pulled out the hotel food. I was
The fried chicken is bad and the baskets are full of meat. Not if Ellen has a haircut.
fluent.

"You think he didn't leave a bottle?" Illen said.

"No, ma'am. | No."

"| I'm doing it here," Elena said.

"|I think that's what you want," Mike Bomer said.

"| Done."

"Well, what's the matter?"

"| I just want to see, that's all," said Ellen.

Then, on the other side of the sea, through the howl of the wind, they heard their daughter's cry. heart
I'll cry.


Bontarinas
"I think it's bad now," Dr. Smith said. Cross, reducing oxygen atoms .


She leaned over Tina and fell asleep. Mike Bowman was sitting on the edge of the bed next to his daughter. Mike thought.
Fortunately Drs. cross; He speaks fluent English, having studied medical


London and Baltimore schools. Dr. Cruz promotes the church and convent of Santa Marja
The new hospital in Puntarenas was not easy or simple.

But still, Mike Bohmer is concerned. There is no such thing.
Her daughter was very sick and she was far from home.

When Mike first met Tina, she smiled brightly. The whole right hand
There was blood, covered in tiny droplets, each the size of a palm. And there was
In his hands, like tears.

He drove his car into the ditch. Suddenly, his hands began to turn red and itchy.
Mike hasn’t forgotten the car that drove around town for a while, a four-door Land Rover.
She walked along the dirt road in the mountains, her daughter screamed in terror and
Pain, and his arm turned red and swollen. Before reaching the park boundary.
The throat spread to her arms, and Tina began to relax. . . .

"Will you be okay now?" Ellen said, looking at the oxygen mask.

«| Believe,” says Dr. Cross. "| He gave him another remedy, and he recovered himself."
It’s pretty straightforward. And you can see that the needle in his hand is smoking very well.

"As for the parts…" Mike Bowman said.

"We don't have an official name yet," the doctor said. "| I don't know anything like that myself."
But you see them disappear. It’s already hard to get rid of them. happy |
They took pictures to look at. and | He washed his hands to pick up some
Raw milk – one for testing here, a second sent to the San Jose laboratory, and a third we
He will rest if necessary. Do you have the picture he gave you?”

"Yeah," Mike Bowman said. A picture Tina drew of a response to the doctor.
In questions involving parents.

Is this the animal that ate him? Dr. said. Cruz when he saw the wire.

"Yeah," Mike Bowman said. "He said the bat was soft, almost like a dog or a raccoon."

"|I don't know what that is," said the doctor. "He wrote it on the back of his hand…"

"It's a problem," Mike Baumer said. "He said he was walking on his hind legs."

Dr. Cruz shouted. He looked at the picture for a moment. "| I'm not an expert. I asked the doctor."
Gittier joins us here. He is a member of the Biol¢Juco de Carrara, the
from the sea. "You can train us a dog."

No one in Cape Blanc? Booman asked. "That's when you forget."

"Unfortunately, no," Dr. Smith said. Cross. “Cabo Blanco doesn’t have permanent staff or teachers.
He worked there for a while. You may have been one of the first people to visit this beach in the 1990s.
Many months. But | I’m sure you’ll see Drs. Gutierrez has a lot of talent.

Dr. Gutierrez described himself as a well-built man with a beard and khaki pants. The fear was
If you are an American. He stepped in front of Bowman and whispered, “Mr.
And Ms. Bowman, as you said, we’d love to hear from you. He then explained that it was a snowflake.
biologist who has been working in Costa Rica for fifteen years. Marty Gutierrez
He studied Tina, raising his hand high, scanning each document.
penlight, then squeeze them with a small tweezer. A short time later, Gutierrez appeared,
He shakes his head as if he understands. Then he looked at the old bears and
He asks more questions about the animal, and Cruz tells him it was grown in a lab.

He eventually turned to Mike Bowman and his wife, his admirers. "I think Tina will be fine."
| “I just want to clarify a few things,” she said, taking notes in a group. "they
Her daughter says she was bitten by a one-legged tiger that was walking
Are you eating at the beach instead of fresh water?

"Okay, yeah."

"And the chief made a plan?"

"Tina said she was screaming and yelling."

"Like a dog, you say?"

"Yes."

"It looks good," Dr. Smith said. Gutierrez, "| Take a look at this opportunity." He explained that one in six thousand .
There are many species of butterflies in the world, and many species of migratory birds. Among these species,
There are only four in Latin America. And judging by their description, the animal may be one.
At four. "| I'm pretty sure this mushroom is Basiliscus amoratus, a species of dried mushrooms found here .


Costa Rica and Honduras as well. When standing on their hind legs, they can sometimes look like
foot."

Are they poisonous?

"No, Miss Bowman, no." Gutierrez explained that the shot to the right hand
Allergic reactions. “According to the literature, fourteen percent of healthy
Dragons, he says, and apparently your wife is one of them.

"She was crying, saying she was so sorry."

"That's it," Gutierrez said. "The thyroid glands contain serotonin, which controls the equi
suffering." Crusoe whispered. "Did her body burn with histamine?

"Yeah," Cruz said. "rush."

"Serotonin," Gutierrez said. "It's not a question."

Ellen Bowman, however, was undaunted. "But why did he capture the rat in the first place?"

“That garbage is too hard to clean up,” Gutierrez said. “The farmers are screaming in the woods.
schedule. and sometimes | He heard that a wolf had attacked a child in his home in Amaloy .
50 miles from where you live. Thus the problem occurred. I don’t know why your daughter is so big
bite. What are you doing then?”

"It's nothing. He said he stayed because he didn't want to scare you."

"I'm fine," Gutierrez said, sounding surprised. He shook his head. "Okay. | I don't think we need to say
What really happened. Wild animals are not smart.

"What about the beard?" Illen said. "| Always think about the bottom line. . . ."

"No, no," said Dr. Smith. Gutierrez. "Heaven forbid the press, Mrs. Bowman. Your daughter is
She is allergic to a tattoo. There is nothing more.”

Mike Boman showed Gutierrez the photo he had taken of Tina. Gutierrez shook his head. "am
He treats it like a bass drum,” he said. “Sometimes it’s awkward, really.
Its tail is very long, and it can hold its tail with only three branches in its length.
Too long and too deep. But at least this is an alternative that could work
That’s what we’re talking about.

"But Tina says language matters a lot," Ellen Boman said. "And that's
He had three legs."

"This one is a great artist," Mike Bowman said.

"I'm sure it is," Gutierrez said, laughing. "But | remember your daughter is sent ."
the amoratus basilisk is common, and is considered a highly intelligent species of hunchback. It’s a great opportunity to learn from
The treatment lasted twelve hours. It should be fine in the morning.


In the modern laboratory, just outside the Santa Maria Hospital, Drs.
Gutierrez considers the animal that ate the American dog a monster.
lizard. Serum analysis was immediately positive, although an initial history of
It is characterized by a number of antimicrobial compounds with unknown biological activities. but
The night technician was on duty and placed the liquid samples in the trays.
fridge.

The next day, the crew of the day searched the store for signs of the missing.
The patients. He saw that Bowman, CHRISTINA L. had to go on Saturday, the .
The author has collected stinging samples. At the end of the day, he noticed that a sample containing
Turns out it was developed from the lab at the University of San Jose,... it got a diagnosis.
from the ground and set him on his way.


"Go. Say thank you to Dr. Cruz," Ellen Bowman said, pulling Tina forward.

"Thank you, Dr. Cruz," Tina said. "I'm fine now." He reached out and touched the spot.
His physician family. Then he said, "You have one more dragon."

At the same time Drs. Cruz was shocked; Then he laughed. "That's it, Tina. When | all services
Hospital Overnight, Morning | Change my clothes.

"But not your tie?" "I don't.

shirt.

Ellen Bowman said, "Mike told you he was watching."

"true." Dr. Cruz smiled and shook the girl’s head violently. "You can be happy with anything
Welcome to Costa Rica, Tina.


"will."

The Bowman family started walking when Dr. Cross: "Obey, Tina, remember."
The kid who sucks you?

"okay."

"remember?"

"okay."

Do you have any legs?

"Yes."

How many arms does he have?

"Three," he said.

"How do you know?"

« Yes | See,” he said. "Anyway, all seabirds mark the ocean with
He held out his hand, three fingers half bending. "And good
He also made this symbol on the ground.

"Did the owl make a mark like the bird?"

"Uh-huh," Tiny said. "He also walks like a bird. Moves his head up and down."
He took a few puffs and shook his head.

When the Boers left, Drs. Cruz decides to give Gutierrez the information,
Biological Station.

"|He must have intended to accept the girl's message," Gutierrez said. "|We did some research
ego. | I can’t believe the potatoes are sour. invalid."

"What can be done?"

"No," Gutierrez said, "we're not talking away. Anyway, have you ever heard of a
Is anyone else injured in the hospital?

"No, why?"

"Tell me, friend, if you care."


beach;


Marty Gutierrez sat on the beach, watching the morning sun in the sky until it was too late.
It shone upon the bay water, its light reaching beneath the thickets;
It sits among the coral reefs of the Cape Blanca coastline. He can decide how to be
He had been staying where the American woman had been for two days.

Although it is true, as he tells Bowmans, that spiders cause more damage.
Gutierrez had never heard of a shark biting a human. And he didn’t.
Anyone admitted to the hospital with a stroke. Moreover, the root of the function from the right
Greater than Uncle Basil, when he came to the Carrara Gate, he saw Fit
There is an official library, but it is not on any website about the history of the Basilica. Then he looked
International Bioscience Server, a database in the United States, but without a website
Taking too much medication, or being hospitalized for pneumonia.

She then called the midwife, Amalo, who saw a 9-day-old boy.
He was lying on his back, his leg held by a dog, his own.
It’s safe to say it’s a joke. Then her foot swelled with the baby.
He was about to die. The boy says the bird is black with blue eyes. This is what it means
The child is often ahead of the woman.

"All right," Gutierrez said.

"No, just like everyone else," the doctor said, adding that he heard another explosion.
Plot: A kid in V squez, a seaside village, screams in his sleep. and
The other is at the Sotrero Gate. This has all happened in the last two months. all
It was surrounded by sleeping babies and children.

The new monster made Gutierrez wonder if there was an old one .
Living animals don’t know. This is done in Costa Rica. Only seventy-five.
Millions of miles small, the country smaller than the state of Maine. However, in
Due to its small size, Costa Rica is home to some of the most unique wildlife: coral reefs .
the Atlantic and the Pacific, four ranges of mountains, the summits of which are twelve thousand feet;
And the fire worked; rainforest, cloud forest, humid, temperate, and desert


Dry soil. This complex ecosystem has recorded a great diversity of plant and animal life.
Costa Rica has three times more horse farms than any other country in North America. must
One large species of grass. There are five types of ants.

New species have been accidentally discovered all the time in recent years.
For a bad reason. Costa Rica is losing forests as wild animals lose their habitat;
They moved to other places and sometimes changed their status.

So a new species was created. But excited for the new.
A new disease of women. Animals carry bacterial diseases, many
It can spread from person to person. The problem is central spinal cord injury, or CSE, and
This led to a form of the disease in humans and horses. Gutierrez felt it was important to
To spot this new pest, if possible, look for diseases.

He sat on the beach, watching the sunset and enjoying it. Maybe Tina is great.
Look at a new organ that may not be there. Now, Gutierrez isn’t done. This morning was
He grabbed a windmill, flipped through the paint, and proudly flew to the beach.
But time is running out. Soon he had to drive up the mountain from the desert;
He didn’t want to go into the darkness.

Gutierrez got up and started walking to the beach. In the distance, something black.
yelled the person walking through the Black Princess's door. Gutierrez changed
On entering the water. If there is a sound, there may be another
Up in the trees, black bears hover over people.

But this animal was hurrying just as alone, moving slowly and stopping.
He stayed on his back a lot. There is something at the entrance of the tomb. Like Gutiérrez
He approached her, eating bread. The head and body are separated from the vertebrae.
Even in the distance, Gutteridge could see streaks of flames on the ground.

Gutierrez fell to the ground and deputies were shot. A screaming bull, I know.
Those who live in resource-poor areas are at a disadvantage. He couldn’t even escape when the first train pulled up.
he shouted as he left. As the second train pulled away from the tunnel,
Enraged and surprised, he left all his food behind and ran into the woods.

Gutierrez stepped back up and walked forward. He didn’t care about his friend; that
The tranquilizer dose was too low to give her anything for just a few minutes of relief. It’s almost over.
She wonders what to do with her new money. Gutierrez himself wrote the first draft of the book, but
Others had to return to the United States for better medical treatment .
course. To whom should he send it? The head teacher was Edward H. Simpson.
New York, Professor of Veterinary Medicine at Columbia University, New York. A good old man is
drum, Simpson was the world leader in drumming. bridge,
Marty decides to send his clothes to Drs. Samson.


New York


Dr. Ricard Ston, Director, Columbia University Medical Laboratory
However, the Center admitted yesterday had a bigger size than expected. on
In the late 20th century, the lab took up the entire fourth floor of the public health building
In the lab, the research team worked to destroy the yellow fever virus.
Malaria and malaria. But medical and research projects are good in Nairobi and rural areas.
PoloCon puts TDL in a less important position than it used to be. is now part of the equation
Because of that, there are only two full-time employees, and the guys enjoy the
A search for the diseases of New Yorkers published. Laboratory work included
He wasn't prepared for what he saw in the morning.

"Oh, it's pretty simple," the dentist lab technician said and continued.
Dunne's magazine. "It's a remote and unexplored part of Costa Rica." It's beautiful.
receipt. "That's all for you, Dr. Stone."

Richard Stone walked through the lab, observing the newcomers. "It's one thing Eddie
The Simpson trial?

"Yes," she said. "But | I don't know why you sent us a butterfly."


“His secretary called,” Stone said. Simpson spends winters in Borneo, and
Because the patient had difficulty with the procedure, she contacted our lab for
He caught it. Let’s see what we’ve got, chij.

The white plastic cylinder is about half a gallon in capacity and has a metal lid.
Latches and lock switch. called the “Natural Biological Model” and
The signs and messages are available in four languages ​​and the messages are designed to
The cylinder to open to the ruthless leaders of the world.

The reporters did, and when Richard Stone turned on the big torch, he could see the flame.
There are still gases. The powder is placed on the air compressors and placed on the glass and
Face mask. The lab then analyzed contaminated samples from Venezuela
Small dog, Japanese hepatitis B, Kayasanur thu virus, Langat virus, Mayaro. so
Make the sky.

There was the sound of escaping gas and white smoke. The cylinder turned black.
cold. Inside, he finds a sandwich box from the closet with something shiny inside. The stones are scattered.
Returns the size of the page. A piece of grilled red meat.
Table with loud noise.

“Huh,” you say. "Like food."

"Yeah," Stone said. "What do they want?"

The technician looks at the printed envelope. "My son bullies the neighborhood kids."
Veterinary and Infectious Disease Investigations
He posted a picture of a child on the street, with the words TINA written on the back. "baby .
A picture of a baby."

Stone looked at the picture. "Obviously, we don't have to do tests on mice," Stone said. "But we know
Diseases can be easily identified by taking a blood test for this drug. What do they say ?
This dog?

"'Basilicus amoratus with three breathing tubes,'" she said, reading.

"Okay," Stone said. "Let's go. While you're waiting for him to show up, get an X-ray and get
A printed Polaroid. Once the blood is drawn, we start making antibodies until we get some
Your friend. Tell me if there is any problem.


Just before lunch, the teens got the answer: the dialysis wasn’t working.
A bacterial or viral infection. They also ran venom profiles and found only one.
My Friend: The blood was a bit sensitive to the poison of the Kabra king. But yea
Cross-reactivity is the difference between the new mice and Drs. Stone doesn’t think it’s an event.
The assistant faxed it to Drs. Martin Guthrie on the same night.

There was never any question about the quality of the ball; Wait for the doctor to come back.
Simpson. He didn’t return for a few weeks and his secretary asked him if TDL would .
Make sure to keep the tail at this point. Dr. Stone puts it in a sack and
And he put him in the temple.


Martin Gutierrez read a statement from Columbia Medical Center/Trump Disease Laboratory. fluent
supposed : -


Source: Basilica Amortis and Mathematics Education Software
(Taken from Dr. Simpson’s office)


Parameters: _ ground, ? Some animals eat.


Actions are done. X-ray, microscopy, immunohistochemistry for RTX;
Bacteria, viruses, bacterial contamination.


Results: There was no histological or immunological evidence of previous infection in this case.
Species of Basiliscus amuratus .


(sign)
Richard A. Stone, MD. , principal


Gittier made two presentations about the program. First, it means
Like potatoes, it was discovered by scientists at Columbia University. And second, if
The fact that there’s no bacterial infection means no worms can come out, sometimes it means they don’t
Costa Rica’s energy problems are huge. But let’s assume that the first premise is true:
If a certain species of wolf is released from the forest into a new area, and it comes
Unity with the villagers. Gutierrez is confident that within weeks, changes will be
Remember and the results are below.


In 1990, heavy rains washed away the roof of the hospital.
Lower anascope. It was almost midnight; He loses power in the storm, Elena from the island.
Morales was using a flashlight when he heard a noise. I think a
She was so frightened that she immediately left her mother and went to another house.
to see the baby. As his hand reached for the door, he heard an order.
And he stopped. The bird apparently flew out the window to escape the rain. coast
Rukans say if a bird comes, the baby will bring good luck.

Elena opened the door. The baby lies in a stomach, wrapped in a blanket, alone.
His face was white. Near the entrance, three dragons howl like wild animals.
When they saw Elena, they turned their heads and looked at her curiously, but they didn't run away. on
Elena's dim light drew blood from their nostrils. He smiled, it was a laugh.
He nodded, quickly turned his head, and nipped a piece of the boy's hair.

Elena steps forward, shouting, and the shadows turn into the darkness. But before the
When he reached his chest and saw what was happening in the child’s eyes, he felt embarrassed .
The child had to die. Children scattered on a rainy night, screaming and yelling, from
They have three hind legs, like birds.


Information Source


Later, when Elena Morales refused to say the racist thing. though
She was afraid of being arrested for abandoning the baby.
No one is waiting. So she told her mother that they had taken the boy out and pronounced him dead.
Among the books she sent to San Jose was SIDS: Preventing Infant Death . This is a syndrome.
unknown causes of mortality among children; It wasn’t that big and it was so sweet.
It is not accepted.

San Jose lab analyzes Tini Bowman's stomach
His education is very good. There are as many installations as there are. But between
Proteins are a problem: That cut was one of the most popular proteins in the 1980s
knowledge. Biological activity has not been studied, but it is considered a fatty acid.
Cobras are poisonous, anyway.

The lab also detects elevated levels of antioxidant enzymes. because
The enzyme is an example of genetic engineering and has not been adapted to algae, say technologists
He thought it was just the lab and didn’t say anything when Drs. Patience who's playing
Dr. Words.

The spider sits in a freezer at Columbia University, waiting for Drs. She'll be back.
Simpson, is not expected for about a month. Well, things might have been better if he
A tropical diseases lab technician named Alice Levine came in and checked this one.
Bowman chuckles, and says "Oh son of whoever drew the dinosaur?"

"than?" exclaimed Richard Stone, with a smirk on his face.

"Dinosaurs. Right? My son looks at them all the time."

"It's a joke," Stone said. "From Costa Rica. The girl wrapped underneath."

"No," Alice Levy shook her head. "Look. It's so big. That big full dick is huge
Back of the head. You’re a dinosaur.

"It doesn't have to be him. He's only a foot away."

"So? There were little dinosaurs back then," Alice said. "Believe me, | he knows. | he's got two kids."
I'm an expert. The youngest dinosaurs were under one foot. Tennisaurus or something similar, | I don't
expert. These names are incorrect. "You can't learn these skills when you're ten."


"You don't understand," Richard Stone said. "This is a picture of a modern hero. They
He sent us a dog. He’s at the top now.” Stone smiled and nodded.
share.

Alice Levine looked at her shoulders and back. It didn't hurt. "|None
I know," he said. "But this looks like a dinosaur to me."

Stone shook his head. "impossible."

"why?" said Alice Levine. "They're good pigs or pigs or whatever they call themselves."

Stone shook his head. Alice didn't know; The technology
She works in the bacteriology lab. And he has a clear purpose. stone
She remembers the time she thought a project manager was following her. . ...

"You know," Alice Levine said, "if it was a dinosaur, Richard, it could be a big problem."

"It's not a dinosaur."

"Did anyone see him. "No,"

The stone one.

"Well, take him to the museum or something," Alice Levy said. "You don't think so
should."

"I'm sorry."

Do you want me to do it for you? She said.

"No," said Richard Stone. "|Nothing."

"Can't you do something?"

"It's nothing." She returned the bag to the fridge and locked the door. "No
Dinosaur, a song. Anyway, please wait until the Dr. comes back. Simpson to Borneo to
hear. It’s the end, Alice. This dust is not going anywhere.”


The 2nd time.


With any version of Frattle Law, changes can be made quickly.


Ian Malcolm
The inner mine


Alan Grant lowered his head, his mouth an inch from the ground. It's too hot.
One hundred degrees. His feet hurt, even though he was wearing shoes. His arms were closed.
Solid alkaline powder. He laid his head on her chest. But Grant forgot
aggressive. His gaze focused on the six cardinals of the world in front of him.
Working patiently with an artist’s pencil and brush, he produced the shape of a small L
A piece of wood. Only one leg is long and does not go over the foot. Those teeth


a needlework, and afforded him an opportunity of learning] needlework. The skeletal elements are coded as
collect. Grant took a moment to paint the bones with cement pads before
will be displayed. It doesn’t make sense that the eggs are a young carnivorous dinosaur.
Her owner died 39 million years ago when she was two months old. with all grace.
Granite can also change the look of the entire space. If it does, this is the perfect first episode.
Children eat meat -

"Oh my God!"

Alan Grant blinked and looked into the sunlight. He took off his sunglasses and wiped them off.
Head and hands.

It was about a shipwreck in the wrong town of Snakewater, Montana.
Beneath the overcast clouds were mountains of craggy rock.
It runs for miles in every direction. There are no forests or forests. It was nothing but a bad marriage.
The sun is hot and the wind howls.

Investigators deemed the land unsafe, but when Grant visited the property,
He noticed something else. This infinite world is another and different world.
which was formed eighteen thousand years ago. In his mind, Grant found himself
A brown, red lake that became the mouth of a vast ocean. Mediterranean
Thousands of miles, stretching all the way from the New Rock Mountains to
Chickens are indigenous to Appalachia. All of South America was underwater.

Meanwhile, small clouds were in the sky and were obscured by the smoke nearby.
tractors. The air was thick with carbon dioxide. The plants are growing well.
farm. There are no fish in these waters, but there are crabs and crabs. Brushers
He jumped to tackle you to the ground. Some carnivorous dinosaurs are running.
They walk along the river's bank. There was a small island in the sea.
It’s about two acres. Shrouded in thick forest, the island is a perfect getaway.
where cannabis herbivores lay eggs in burrows and develop
Let your kids cry.

Over millions of years, the green alkaline ocean cooled and
He had fallen. The solid floor cracked and cracked under the heat. And an island in the sea with her own .
The dinosaur eggs hatched in a growing volcano in northern Montana that is now owned by Alan Grant .
Gosling.

"Oh my God!"

He stood with fourteen men in heavy uniforms and uniforms. He heard the laptop click.
In fact, it was the sound of a distant ball echoing off a high rock on a familiar hill.
He watches the kids working on the car, removing the large black stones
They looked at them with their eyes closed. At the top of the mountain, he saw six of his Tipis in his clothes, panting .
A tent, and trailer which they use as their rental laboratory. And when he saw Eli put down his hand, he went away .
The floor of the field lab.

"and!" he said, looking west.

Grant was a black and white Ford truck going down a dirt road.
they. He looked at his watch: right on time. On another hill, the boys got up and were rewarded.
The Snake Coast is so unexpected, and there’s so much talk about it
The head of the Environmental Protection Agency wants Alan Grant to see him about it.

But Grant is aware that paleontology, the study of extinct life, has in recent decades
Not what one expects these days. The modern world is changing rapidly and s
Questions include deforestation, global warming, and ozone depletion
The answer, at least, is historical data. Available information from marketing experts
give. He has twice been called as an expert witness in recent years.

Grant started down the hill behind the wheel.


The participant was rewarded with white powder while approaching the car door. "Bob Morris, EPA," he said,
He looks at his hand. "I'm in the San Francisco office."

Grant introduced himself and said, "Hey, you want a beer?"

"Jesus like that." Maurice looks in his early 20s, wearing a tie and a work suit.
He lowered the voice. Their shoes crunched on the stones as they walked towards the
thank you.


« When | I first came to this island, | I thought it was an Indian town,” Morris said, pointing.
of Tips.

"No," Grant said. "It's a good way to live here." Grant explains that in 1978, the first
During the Gonzalez years, they came from the west in a series of streets .
available. But the heat is still up in the air. Try other types of tents.
One answer. Eventually they started having tipis, the ceilings were big, comfortable and
It rises in the air. “It was the Blackfoot Tipis, built on four corners,” Grant said. "Su Tips
It’s done on three. But this is the Black Sea and we care. . ."

"Uh-huh," Maurice said. "nice." He looked down at his body and frowned.
head. "How long have you been here?"

"About 60 generations," Grant said. When Maurice refused, he explained: “We considered .
time in beer. We started in June with a hundred people. We’ve run about six rounds so far.

"Thirty-three, to be exact," said Ellie Sattler, when they reached the car. Grant sang.
Look at Morris’s face. Ellie wears a white dress and a long skirt in the middle. fluent
He was 24 years old and black. Her black hair was pulled back.

"Ellie's pushing us around," Grant said. "He knew what he was doing."

What am I doing? Maurice asked.

“It smells old,” Ellie said.” “And | to do something about the show." He opened the door and
And they came in.

The incandescents didn’t lower the temperature up to eighty-five degrees, but
It was hot in the afternoon. There are long metal shelves and small shelves.
Healthy bone samples were measured and measured. It consists of a computer and
education. It smells like vinegar.

Mor Riss looked at Bones. "I think dinosaurs are cool," he said.

"They are," Ellis said. "But all you see here are babies. Snake water
It’s important because there are so many dinosaur fossils here. Until that starts
In practice, small dinosaurs are unpredictable. Only the breath is left.
The Gobi Desert. We saw dozens of specimens with legs and feathers.
For the kids.”

When Grant went under the knife, he discovered Mauritian acid-collagen creams that used
to remove carbs from their roots.

"It's like chicken bones," Morris says, caressing his head.

"Yes," she said. "They look like birds."

"What about them?" Morris said, pointing to the sidewalk on the edge of a large pile of ashes.
On top, he wore heavy leather.

"It was a shot," Ellis said. "The bones were stinking when we picked them up, old man
We managed to remove it a few days later, but are now sending it back to the court to continue its investigation.

"A math test?" Maurice said.

"Take it with you," Grant said, putting a beer in his mug. She handed the other one to Elijah. fluent
He took a deep breath. Muric looked at him.

"We don't hear it here," Grant said. Want to come into my office?

"Yes," said Maurice. He led Grant to the driveway, where an inspector was sitting
Well kept table, well kept table. Grant fell to the ground and screamed.
Then he blew out a cloud of dust. He leaned down and placed his shirt on the back table.
He motioned for Morris to sit on the couch. "relax."

Grant is a professor of genetics at the University of Denver and one of its senior authorities.
his teachers, but he did not remember with the great ones. He looked at himself.
as an outsider, and he knew there were important things ahead.
and their relationships. Grant has no fear of scientists, museum curators, why
He called the Teak Dinosaurs. And he tried to take the cloth off and
A trend runs throughout Teacup Dinosaur Hunters , even in their conversations in jeans and fun.

Grant watches Maurice unload his car before grabbing a bite. Mauritius
She opened her bag and glanced at it before turning back to Ellie, who was packing up the elevator.
With hair and length behind parchment paper, not necessary;
"You probably know why I'm here."

Grant shook his head. "It's a long way, Mr. Morris."


“Well,” Morris said, “to be sure, the EPA considers these projects .
The Hammond Foundation. You get some money from them.

"Fifty thousand dollars a year," Grant agreed. "For the last five years."

What do you know about music? Maurice said.

Grant raised his hand. "The Hammond Foundation is a wonderful source of support for education. They are."
Education funding Worldwide, there are many education jobs. | they just knew they were helping Bob.
Kiri sent Tyrell to Alberta and June Weller to Alaska. Maybe more."

"You know how the Hammond Foundation funds a lot of dinosaur research?" Mauritius
asked.

"Yeah. Probably because John Hammond has the tail of a dinosaur."

"Are you Hammond?"

Grant raised his hand. "Once or twice. He comes here to stay for a bit. He's great, you know."
And eccentrics, just as wealthy people sometimes are. But it was always so much fun. why?"

"Well," said Morris, "the Hammond Society is a secret society." fluent
He pulled out a map of the world with red circles and handed it to Grant. "these
Digs was funded last year. Did you notice anything different about them? Montana Alaska
Canada, Sweden .. . They were all in the West. Nothing less than forty-five hours.
Morris pulled out a sheet of paper. "It's like this every year. There are dinosaur projects in the West, in
In Utah or Colorado or Mexico, you don’t have any money. The Hammond Foundation only helps in the summer.
Time management. We want to know why.

Grant quickly glared at them. While it is true that the source refers only to star
The category, however, is a mistake, because some of the best dinosaurs
Use it in warm weather, and -

"And I have another friend," Morris said. "For example, the relationship between dinosaurs."
To Amber?

"Amber?"

"Yeah. Piece of bread-."

"|You know how it is," Grant said. "But why do you ask?"

"Yes," Morris said, "over the last five years, Hammond has had a lot of growth."
Large numbers of diamonds have been found in the United States, Europe, and Asia, and it has been designated as a museum .
jewelry. The foundation spent seven million dollars on Amber. Now they have it.
"He's in the most awkward place in the world in terms of his appearance."

"|He's not your father," Grant said.

"Only when no one else is," Morris said. "Like we said, it doesn't make sense
all. Amber is easy to work with. It doesn’t matter how good or beautiful it is. There is no reason to
remember. But that’s what Hammond did over the years.

"Amber," Grant said, shaking his head.

"And what about your island in Costa Rica?" Morris continued. “Ten years ago, Hammond.
The country became the capital of Costa Rica. You need to create
Conservation Biology."

«|I don't know about that,» Grant admitted.

"|I can't ask for much," Morris said. The island is about one hundred miles west.
coast. It’s very difficult, and it’s in a part of the ocean where the wind meets the water
Do it forever. They called it the Mountain Project. The clouds of the island.
Costa Ricans appreciate it when someone likes it,” Morris said.
The bomb. He said, “When | Suppose that, according to the letter, they were paid.
The King's Award for the Island."

"| Is he?" Grant said.

Morris handed Grant a letter. A Slack was released in March 1984.
Retrieved from InGen Inc. All rights reserved. All Rights Reserved. on Farallon Avenue, Palo Alto, California. Written by Alan Grant in Haiti.
Twelve million dollars. On the flip side, the Advisory check.
Work/Costa Rica/Hostel.

"Obi, now," Grant said. "| Remember this. It sounds simple, but | Remember this. And don't
Everything happens as a team.


Illan Grant discovered the first group of dinosaurs in Montana in 1979, and several more in 1979.
Over the next two years, but it wasn’t until 1983 that he published his book.
His research suggests that thousands of dinosaurs lived in the oceans of the world.
At the ocean, build a nest in the sea and join a dinosaur colony
Feed one adult each night. Tips for Dinosaur Cats are
Beautiful babies stick their tongues out of their cheeks and everyone loves them. huge
It revolves around interviews, journals, and books. So, he changed them all.
He wants to keep surfing. But that was in the midst of those dark days.
In the 1980s, Ingen Company decided to expand.

Have you heard of InGen? Maurice asked. "I don't."

How did they come to you?

"Phone call. A guy named Gennaro or Genino, something like that."

Morris shook his head. he said: “Donald Gennaru. "an InGen victim."

"Anyway, he wanted to know about eating dinosaurs. And he bribed me
“Write him a book.”
He loves baby dinosaurs. Children and adolescents. What they ate. | thought
Contributions | I know.

"You know what?"

“No, of course not.
Nutrition information. But Genora says she knows we don’t know everything and she wants what she wants.
we. And gave a lot of money. 50 million dollars.

Morris took a tray and placed it on the table. "You think?"

"No, go away."

"So Gennard called you in 1984. What happened then?"

"No," Grant said. "You see what we do here. Fifty thousand people volunteer over two summers."
About Gosling. | Tell him I'm working | can."

"Okay, let me make you a book."

"Yes."

"What about female eating dinosaurs?"

"Yes."

Are you a friend of Genory?

"No. Just on the phone."

Jenny says why does she need this information?

"Yeah," Grant said. "He wanted to create a children's museum and he wanted to exhibit children to
Dinosaurs. He said he is seeking and recommending experts in the field of education. there
They were naturalists like me, a Texas mathematician named Lane Malcolm, and a couple .
Environmental Scientists. Systems Analyst. Good group.

Morris shook his head and looked at the paper. "How can you follow orders?"

"Yes.
We found the Hadrosaurus."

What message did you send? Maurice asked.

"Everything: weight loss, weight loss, nutrition, exercise. Everything."

"And how did Genora find out?"

"It gets loud. Sometimes in the middle of the night. Do dinosaurs eat
this? Will they eat this? Should that be in the movie? | He didn't know why.
So you do. | value, | I thought dinosaurs were important, but they weren't. they
He died thirty-five thousand years ago. He thinks that his questions can wait until later in the day.

"|Look," Morris said. "Is it $50,000?"

Grant shook his head. "I'm worried about Genora and I gave it everything. We did it."
Twelve thousand. Probably around '85."

Morris wrote a book. "And InGen? Are there other things?"

"Since 1985."

"And when did the Hammond Foundation start funding your research?"

"I have to see him," Grant said. "But that was the time. The mid-'80s."

"And Hammond is known as a dinosaur enthusiast."

"Yes."


Morris made another announcement.

"Look," Grant said. “If the EPA is concerned about John Hammond and what he’s doing -
North of dinosaur sites , iron ore camps , the Costa Rican coast - why not ask .
Is that about that?

"At this point, we don't know," Mohr said. "why not?" Grant said.

"Because there was no evidence of foul play," Monroe said. "But I | think that
John Hammond was on the run from the law.”


"|We were nervous the first time," Morris explained, "because of the streaming industry. OTT
It controls the development of American technology. They called.
They argue that InGen has two types of inappropriate technology transfer. First, Inj sent three.
Download XMP in Costa Rica. Ingen called it a shift in the economy and said .
They don't sell them anymore. But OTT can’t figure out why anyone would need that capability .
in Costa Rica.

"Three things," Grant said. Is it some kind of computer?

Morris shook his head. "That's a lot of computing power. To be precise, three cranes use
It has more spending power than any other private company in the United States. and InGen
train in Costa Rica. You have to ask yourself why.

"| Wait. Why?" Grant said.

"Nobody knows. And Hood is worried," Morris said. “The courts
Automatic genome encryption – machines that automatically encrypt the genetic code. those
Fresh produce is not included in the price list. But any genetic medicine laboratory can
You got one if it could be worth half a million dollars." He looked at his bills. "Well, a
Notably, InGen installed 24 Honda engines on their island in Costa Rica.

“They also call it inter-regional transportation, not delivery,” Morris said. "there
OTT hasn’t done much. They didn’t like the service at all. But Angel
Obviously, she runs one of the most powerful companies in the world.
It’s from Central America. A country without a government. as well as
This has happened before.

Some US bioengineering companies are going elsewhere.
city ​​so that they are not affected by the law. Most importantly, Maurice
You know, from the head of Biosyn.

In 1986, the Cupertino Foundation developed a Conta vaccine .
Strawberry chili. They did not tell the Chilean government or the farmers working there. they
He just took out the beast.

The vaccine is made from a live virus that has been genetically modified to become a virus. but
The disease is unknown; The bios does not know if the virus can be repaired or not.
Worse, the virus mutates. You can’t get herpes without
That one ate the animal. But Biocin modifies the virus so that it enters the airways of the body. you
It can get infected just by touching it. Biosyn workers brought live tick virus to Chile in the 1990s.
In commercial aircraft, passenger aircraft. Maurice often wondered what would happen
If the capsule is ruptured during a traumatic injury. Everyone on the plane can have
People are funny.

correct. It's not good. It was a bad act. But nothing happens
For lifelong friends. Unwitting Chilean workers are risking their lives;
The Chilean government complained of an economic crisis, and U.S. officials
No judgment. Well, Lewis Dodgson, the geneticist who led the study, is still working .
Bios. Biosyn is a smart guy. And other US companies quickly followed suit .
Those working in other countries unrelated to medical education. Countries and
Yes, that company is a tech giant
in their country;

“That’s why we started researching InGen,” Morris said. "Three weeks ago."

"And how do you believe it?" Grant said.

"Not so much," Morris admitted. « If | He came back to San Francisco, we had to shut him down .
in the examination. and | I think I'm going to finish here." He started to pull up his pants- "So
But what is 'Hyperspace of Genius'?


"That's a good part of my report," Grant said. " 'Hyperspoo' is a term
His body is as big as three-dimensional paintings. | You have to do all the work.
The dog needs to eat and move and sleep, maybe do the dog in
Lots of places. Some paleontologists suggest that the most advanced animals
Cultured hyperplasia. 'Teen Part' Features Children
dinosaurs—if you want to be one, you can be."

When the call ended, the phone rang. Ali replied. "It's a lot of work, sir," she said.
common. Can you speak to me?”

Morris packed his bag and left. "Thanks for the help and the beer," he said.

"No problem," Grant said.

Grant and Morris walked down the hallway to the front door. “I am,” Morris said.
Did Hammond request anything on your behalf? Bones, bones, or something similar
that?"

"No," Grant said.

“Dr. Satter says you do magic here … »

"Well, not really," Grant said. “When we remove the needles or something.
There is no need to keep it in the museum, we send the bones to a lab for dissection.
And it's trying to send proteins to us, and those proteins respond and send those signals.
we."

Which lab? Maurice asked.

"Clinical Biology Services Salt Lake."

How did you choose them?

"The war cry."

"Doesn't that lab have anything to do with InGen?" Maurice asked. "I don't

there are | Find him,” Grant said.

They reached the entrance to the village. Grant opened the door and felt a rush of fresh air coming from outside.
Morris paused and put his glasses back on.

"Eventually," Morris said. "Let's say Ingen doesn't make a recording tape. Is he?"
What else did you do with the information you gave them?”

Grant laughed. "Yeah. They might have fed the baby Hadrosaurus."

Morris laughed too. " Small Hadrosaurus. That's a sight to see. How big?"

"Yeah," Grant said, taking his hand back six inches. "Part of the way."

"And how long before they become adults?"

"Three years," Grant said. "Give or take."

Morris drew his gun. "Well, thank you again for your help."

"Come back," Grant said. He watched for a while when Maurice returned.
to his car, and closed the car door.

What do you see? Grant said.

Eli raised his hand. "Ura0)


DNA yields the FROG molecule

Mysore 2.12.9
Procomygotinid 3.03.7
Ethniel 3.13.3
Release 1.03.0
Hypsiloboduntid 2.42.7


Bottom line: all living dinosaurs have nucleus or nucleus, DNA. Some of the
Animals do. Wu still couldn’t figure out why it took them so long. But he couldn't
The more they say Grant is smart. The dinosaurs were giant.

He rushes to the courthouse.


Lex


He jumped into a gap about a meter wide and walked along the side of the road. was
Baseball glove in his mouth and pacing back and forth, clearing his throat.
at the end of the tube. Darkness, but he could see through his glasses.
He was safe and comfortable.

"I'm Lex. Tim."

He didn't answer. He kept hitting rock. "come."

She shook her head no. He could see how hurt she was.

"Lexi," she said, "when you leave, I'll let you wear seven nightwear."

He just shook his head.

« Look what | There,” she said as she grabbed her bag. He looked down, unrecognizing her. I was
Maybe it’s too dark to see. "Here are your clothes, Lexa. | Take off your clothes."

"So what."


He tried to do something else. "There must be a problem there. There are still stars. You don't want to
and?"

He turned his head to the pillow.

"why not?"

"There are some minions here."

This lasted for a while. He hadn't said "amen" in years.

"The ammonia went off," he said.

"There's a river. Trancer Rex."

"eventually."

"Where did he go?"

"| I don't know, but he's not here now," Tim said, hoping it was true.

Lex didn't move. He picked it up again. Tim sat down on the grass near the bucket.
Where he could see it. He kept the chair. He took her hand and stopped.
He couldn’t think of anything else to do. "I'll just stay here," she said. "And relax."

"Is my father outside?"

"No," she said, shocked. "Coming home, Lex."

"Did my mother do it?"

"No, Lexi."

Are there giants here? Lex said.

"No. But I know they won't be coming here. They might as well go now."

Then he enters the room and leaves. I shouted at the stars and
Dry blood is not good, but it is good.

He turned furiously and said, “Where is Dr.? Great ?

"|I don't know."

"Well, he was here first."

"How? When?"

"First," Lex said. "| When he saw | he was in the tub."

"Where did he go?"

“How do I know?” Lex said, frowning. “Good morning,” he began.
Hell! The Great Doctor? Great Doctor!"

Tim doesn't like the sound it makes - that's what a Tyransaurus makes - but
A moment later, he heard another voice. He was going straight to the ground.
It’s the story that Tim was confused about a few minutes ago. To his surprise, Tim saw his soulmate, the Doctor.
Grant walked up to them, a big smile on his face next to his chest, but he .
It was that good.

"Thank God," she said. "I'm looking for you."


With a sigh, Eddie Regis stood up and wiped the sweat from his face and hands. It took a while.
It lasted for a great half an hour, set among great mountains on a hill above the road. recognize.
There wasn’t much room to hide, but he was scared and not thinking straight. There was a door.
This country, trying to keep calm, but then she saw this dinosaur.
His brain. The dinosaurs came from it. Back to the car.

Ed Reggie doesn’t remember what happened next. I think the ocean
He said, but the woman couldn't help it and just kept going on and on.
Along the way, he lost his footing, slid down a hill, and had to rest for a while.
It looks like it could have walked between the rocks and landed there
There was a chance, so that’s what he did. He freaks out and thinks nothing of it.
He needs to step down. And finally, when he suddenly
Among the rocks, his mind was confused, he was afraid, and
Sad that she left the kids and ran away, now she is safe. fluent
He knew he had to get back on track, he had to try to save them because he always knew
He thinks he’s cute and cute, but whenever he tries to
For himself, he'd put himself out there - however he didn't. He began to panic.
He also had trouble breathing and was unable to walk.

He told himself it was okay. If there were kids on the street, they could
It didn’t work, and now Eddie Regis doesn’t know what they’re doing, and it’s fine .


He stayed where he was. No one knew what happened except him. And there was
He couldn't do anything. He couldn't do anything. And so the regiment remained.
The couple in half an hour, wrestling with fear, wonder if the babies are dead,
And what does Hammond say when he gets ready.

What shocked him was what he saw in her mouth. soon
His mouth watered with a smile, and he smiled, wondering if he had seen her during the summer.
Regis touched his face and felt the skin of his cock near his mouth. He was surprised, but he wasn’t
We were very nervous. Then he realized that the fat meat was the deer he was trying to swallow as he opened his mouth. I was
In the mouth. Shocked and confused, Regis was worried and thought he was going crazy.
The skin on his scalp, feeling the blood rush to his mouth, twitched and twitched nervously.
in the woods. He felt for another finger, pulled it out, leaving a slip
following. Jesus, perhaps, is fed up with them. This descended to the bottom of the mountain. these
The forest hills teem with wildlife. These include black metals. What did the staff say?
Butterflies on your clothes. They like quiet places. They love their cigarettes.
your-

"thank you!"

He stopped. There was an echo in the air.

thank you! The Great Doctor!

Jesus, she was a girl.

Ed Regis heard the sound. He was not afraid or angry. cotton
is called in the system. And suddenly he realized something else had to be done .
It happened, that Tyransaurus must have surrendered - or not lost - that
Other people can survive. Grant and Malcolm. Everyone can live. and data
Let him rest a little like you did when the police arrived .
He threw it at you, screaming, because he knew what to do, and kept attacking.
Back on the mountain you’ve already decided on the next step.
He said, how things are getting better this time.

Reggie wiped the tears from his face and hands, the evidence he had been trying to hide. fluent
She wasn't ashamed to hide, but now she had to make a decision. He pulled away again.
He drove down the road, but when he came out of the woods he stopped for a moment. fluent
I have yet to see the car. Like a mountaintop. The Land Cruiser should be
above.

He started walking down the hill back to the Land Cruiser. Very scary. feet.
They walk on the ground. He couldn't stop thinking about the girl. Why did he leave?
Greeting? As he walked, he felt something. so
Unless you have to go again. Tyrannosaurus was probably even larger. Here
He had already reached the top of the mountain. This is especially difficult at home.

And he stopped. It’s not good, it’s bad.

Ed Regis got angry and started walking towards the camp.


Alan Grant wrapped his arms around his shoulders and clenched his fists and ankles. He doesn't see.
There is pain. It’s a miracle: if you miss the butterfly, you’re fine. "I said | I'm sorry," he said
said.

"Well | I have to see it."

The boy was unlucky. Tim's wife cringed and cringed; Grant paused.
He broke it. Her right breast was painful and swollen. But feet are everything
good. Both children could walk. That’s the most important thing.

Grant himself was fine except where he wounded his right shoulder.
The tyrannosaur emerged. He bites with all his might, but that doesn’t mean he’s dangerous and
He couldn't believe his actions.

He thought he had been shot deliberately, as he couldn’t remember anything.
Events ensue before he leaps, screaming, into the forest ten yards
The circle of the earth. First the blood leaves the uterus and then they put pus in the blood and
After a while it dried up. Then, she started walking to find Malcolm and the kids.
Grant can’t believe he’s alive and the tortured images start coming back
Try to understand them. The Tyrannosaurus should have killed them all. Why wasn’t he there?


"I'm freaking out," Leake said.

"Me too," Grant said. "We have to go back to society. And we have to say
These are for the day.

Are we the only ones who know? Tim said. "Yes.

We have to go back and tell them.

"Then we'll make your way back to the hotel," Tim said, pointing to the island. "thus
We will meet them if we accept them.

He looked at Grant. And he kept thinking about one thing: his broken leg.
Even the Earth Crusaders did not initiate the attack. What animal is that? can
Just think of one thing - a Tyrannosaurus penis.

"| Don't worry about it, Tim. There's plenty of ways to go either way," Grant said. "whether
The Tyrannosaurus moves, and we capture it.

"Should we be patient here?" Tim said.

"Yeah," Grant said. "We'll wait here until someone arrives." "am

Hungry,” Leake said.

"|I hope it's not too late," Grant said. "am

I don’t live here anymore,” Lex said.

Then, from the top of the mountain, they heard the explosion.

"Stay here," Grant said. And he went up into the mountain. "Stay here," Tim

With that, he fled.

Lex followed his brother. "Don't, don't leave me here, guys-"

Grant was grateful. He tried to think. He shook his head and
He pointed to the mountain to see.


At the top of the hill, Grant saw Eddie Regis, standing there, unmoving. He walked toward them in the forest.
They didn't speak. The fear of passengers and wild elephants is gone.
weird. The only sounds were the rustling of leaves and the sound of the wind.

Lexi started to speak, but Grant sat down on a nearby bench and put his
There is essentially no conflict. Tim came up behind them. Grant raised his hand.
His mouth told them to stay, and he looked briskly at the tree.

The street was dark, and the tree branches fluttered in the wind.
The pattern of moonlight became dynamic and changing. Ed Regis was gone. Received Grant
It’s time to find out. FM cut the bark of the big tree and pulled it away.
Reggie wasn't surprised.

The forest was flooded.

Lex pulled Grant's shirt closer, wanting to know what was going on. Then, he
Somewhere nearby, they felt a breeze stronger than the wind. Lex
He heard it, too, because it came out of a movie.

The sound drew them deeper, breathing heavy. Grant thought it was a
The horse breathes.

Grant looked over at Regis and saw scratches glittering in the moonlight on the counter.
amusing. But Grant acknowledges that there’s another edge looming over others, which isn’t necessarily the case.
Rides well: Small, strong head and flat top.

He returned to breath.

Tim looked at her and nodded. Lex did the same.

They hear a sound like breaking grass, and a Tyransaurus appears in the street. is
Young: About eight feet tall, walking at a dog’s gait, apparently.
A small dog. Male tyrannosaurus walking down the street, standing on all fours, gasping for air
Before you go any further. He goes to the woods where Regis is hiding, not mentioning that he has .
He saw it. Grant watched Regie’s body tremble for a moment. Regis turned his head to look at her.
at the top of the Tyransaurus tree.

There are no tyrannosaurs roaming the streets today. Regis began to grow nervous and hatched his plan.
On the tree. But the forest isn’t over yet. Regis sat by the wall for another half hour.
One minute. Then the sounds came back: the first sound of a hollow, grassy tree .
On one page, then the whole page. Regis turned away from the tree and sighed.


Look at the problem. He walked across the street and looked across the street.
From Tyrannosaurus .

The attack was at hand.

The boy screamed and launched his head forward, knocking Regis to the ground. She cried.
He dodged, but Tyranxhor dodged him and had to grab him from behind.
He sat down, because Regis wasn't moving, lying on the street crying.
dinosaur and waves his hand at her as if puzzled. That little dinosaur looks like this
She missed the noises and movements coming from her little belly. The young man shook his head.
Behind her, bored with her studies, Regina grows up.

"Get out! Come back! Go, come back!" Regis screams in the background and
the dinosaur demanded, pulling Regina to her feet. Regis exclaimed, "Oh! You heard."
am! back! Share yourself to us! After escaping from the dinosaur. The boy continued to stare at him.
He wanted to get to know the blonde next to him, but after Regis took a few steps, he left.
And he put it on again.

Going with him, Grant thought.

"Hey!" Reggie screamed as he landed, but the boy ignored him and approached him.
feet. He got up and followed her. "You bastard! You! You hear-
Come back!” He howled like a son of a bitch.

The boy screamed, but he didn't fight back, and Regis pulled him over to the side of the tree and frowned at him.
A step to the right. After a few tries, it disappears. "Come back! You! Come back!" Regis shouted,
And then, at the last moment, the bull goes berserk and bites Reggie in the butt. "shut up
Down," Regina whispered, and the little boy lowered his head. Regina began to cry, no words, just .
It was a very loud noise.

His voice trembled, and when the young man shook his head, Grant saw the charred flesh.
Mouth.

"Oh yeah," Lex said quietly. Next to him, Tim was shocked and suddenly felt ashamed. Night-
Her tears fell from her cheeks and onto the ground in a sob.

The young man’s head shot up as he turned down hill.

As Tim put down his glasses, Grant took both boys in his arms and started running.


ride


At night, the committees conducted street patrols. Harding's Jeep followed some distance.
A distant foot. Eli showed him the long way. Is this a light?

"Okay," Harold said. "Like an eyeball."

Suddenly, the radio crackles. They hear John Arnold.

"-You there?"

"Ahh, there," Harold said. "last." He pressed the button. "Yes John, we're here. We're
Near the river, it’s very quiet.”

Many pages. Then : "-eed your car-".

"What did he say?" January said.

"Something about the car," Ellis said. At Grant’s feet in Montana, Ellie performed the procedure.
radio. Through years of practice, he became adept at skinning.
Tips. "I thought he said he missed his car."

Harding pressed the button. "John? Where are you? We can't see each other. John?"

There was a dim light, followed by the radio, then Arnold.
His voice, "-where are you-".

"We're a mile south of Hips Paddock. Closer to the river, we're behind some committees."

"No, no, come here ow!"

"Looks like something's wrong with him," Ellie said, rubbing her eyes. There was no pressure problem.
wait. "We should go back again."

Harding held up his hand. "John was in trouble. He knew what the market was like. They wanted
All for the record." He pressed the radio button. "John? Say it again, please. . . ."

Many pages.

Very strong. the sound of fireflies. Then: "-Milo I need your car-"

Genaro frowned. "Are you saying Muddy needs our car?"


"That's it," Ellis said.

"So, it doesn't make sense," Harding said.

"-someonebuilt-from-a-car-"

"|You understand," El said. "The other cars are stuck in the rain, and Mildred wants to
Go get them."

Harding held up his hand. "Why doesn't Milo take another car?" He pressed the radio button.
"John? Tell Muldoon to get another car. It's in the garage."

The radio crackled. "-Listen-to-Training-"

Harding pressed the radio button. "I told him in the garage, John. The car's in the garage."

Very strong. "-Edra has a brother-"

"I'm afraid that's not going to get us anywhere," Harold said. "Okay John, let's go in."
He turned off the radio and started the car. "I just want to know what the fuss was all about."

Harding put the Jeep in drive and drove down the road into the darkness. Here’s another one.
Ten minutes before they saw the lights of the Safari, and Harding smiled .
They stopped in front of the brothel and saw Muldoon walking towards them. She screamed and
He looks at his hand.


"God damn you, Arnold, you bastard! God damn you, you're pushing a parrot out of the way! Now! I
The latest generation is back here! Now!" John Hammond stood in the courtroom, shouting and pointing .
Little feet. He had been walking this way for two minutes straight before Harry Hu stopped him.
On the page, his eyes light up.

"Yes, Mr. Hammond," said Arnold, "Muldoon will now do that."
Arnold sighs and lights another cigarette. Hammond is like any other manager
Arnold didn’t see it. Whether it’s Disney or Navy, the costumes are always evolving.
It's the same. They didn’t know what it was; And they thought it was a voice
Way of doing things. And maybe I’m screaming at their writers to get it.
One lychee for you.

But the audience can’t help with the problems facing Arnold now. that
The computer doesn’t notice that the power supply is getting closer it doesn’t notice that it’s on.
Software systems do not account for all user preferences. If anything
His voice took on another meaning, because Arnold was now confronting him with Nedry's powers .
He never came back, which meant Arnold had to log on to the computer and try .
He needs to know what’s wrong. This was going to be a tough task, he had to get used to it.
And be vulnerable.

"Why don't you go to the living room," Arnold said, "and grab a cup of coffee? Let's talk .
You and I will get more information.

"|I don't want Malcolm Effort here," said Hammond.

"Don't worry about Malcolm's condition," Arnold said. Will you let me go to work?

"God bless," Hammond said.

- I'll ask you, sir, if | You got some news from Moore, Arnold said.

He pressed the buttons on his console and watched the dials change.


*/Key Plants of the Western Park/
|
*/ return of lbs
In: Biostat.sis
From: Sysrum.Vest
Available at: net.sys Available at:
Power.mdl
*/
*lowercase
Reference [42]2002/9A{stringTotal %4 [vig. 7*tp]}
If the value is equal to (mh) (**mh). Back to Schumanlanvis
Time Call 909 C.lev {not including Metrowish for $303} on-demand (3#*Maxfield)
Instead of system(!Dn) replace shp_val.obi with lim(val{d} samval


If meters (mh) (** m). meter (Vdd) gives
on systemprocessor(!phone) return mxcpl.obj to lam(val {pdl} ofSatVal


Arnold does not use a computer. He was walking to the end of the road now to see
lineof-code Linear commands describing processor behavior. Arnold was not happy.
It should be noted that the entire Jurassic Park plan required half a million pages of paper,
The vast majority are undocumented and unexplained.

Wu came forward. What are you doing John?

"I'm looking for logic."

By his teaching? It goes on forever.

"Tell me," Arnold said. "tell."


way


Muldoon immediately confessed, and the Jeep rolled to the ground. Genaro sat down next to her.
He held her hand. They were running down the mountain road, over the river, and now they hide under
They were in the dark. Mildred leaned forward. He was shocked.

"How much does he have?" January said. "Two, three miles away."

Ellie and Harding return to the guest room. Gennaro decides to go with Muldoon.
The car fell. "It was an hour," Muldoon said. "For an hour, there was no word from the other prisoners."

"But they have radios," Genaro said.

“We can’t add to it,” Muldoon said.

Genaro frowned. "If | I had been stuck in a car for hours, I would have used the radio
Tell someone.

"That's what I do, too," Muldoon said.

Genaro shook his head. Do you really think anything could have happened to them?

"Well," said Muldoon, "they are good, but I shall be glad to |
they. He should be gone any minute now.

The road wraps around the mountain. Genaro spotted a white on the hillside.
It was among the trees on the side of the road. "Shut up," Jannard said and Meade said.
Genaro jumped up and ran towards the light of the Jeep to see what it was. so
Like a cover, but there was

Gennaro thought.

Even at six feet, he could see. He walks a little.

Muldoon jumps in the car and says, “What?

Once upon a time,” Gennaro said.

The skin of the legs is pink and ends with a pool of blood on the legs.
eventually. He wore two white shirts, a black tie, and black shoes. This is the meaning of sboe.
Ed Regis pulled.

At this point, Muldoon was out of the car and he was trapped behind him and on his feet. "Jesus." get up.
His leg was splintered from the branches and stained with a sharp blade, and blood dripped from the wound.
He jumped on his team. Gennaro is three feet tall. He immediately nodded and put it on.
With her hands on her knees, she closed her eyes and took a deep breath, trying not to cry.

"quality." Mild's voice disappeared.

"than?"

"Go. Hide the case."

Genaro took a deep breath and sighed. When he opened his eyes, he saw Maud staring at him.
With violence in mind. "He was cut on the side of the body," Muldon said, "He wasn't stabbed – he was stabbed and stabbed."
He just lost his leg." Mildred stood up and stretched her left leg over her head to stabilize her body
Blood was smeared on the animals. His hand turned red as he touched her chest.
Genaro became ill.

"It's not a question of what happened," Mildred said. "Trex found you." Mildred looked up.
Up the mountain, and back to the campfire. "Are you okay? Can you go?"

“Yeah,” Gennard said. "|Hello."


Muldoon walked in the Jeep, shirtless. "|I think we should take this
Like that,” he said. “He can’t be here. Jesus, this would break a car.
Notice that there’s something behind it, can you see it? Trib or shoot. . ."

Genaro opened the back door and looked down the stairs. fluent
She thanked him for simply thinking of something else. Method problems
When he reached out to fill his brain, he found the servant's hat.
mold, computer, card, old-

"Two ethers," he said. They did well.

“Give me one,” Muldoon said, still in front of the car. Muldoon closed his legs and
He handed over control of the group to Genaro. Clutching it in his hands, Genaro sighed.
It's very difficult. “Just put it in the middle,” Mid said. "If there's a way to stop it, you'll know."
Then he doesn't move. . ."

"ok." Genaro steers the ball back and Muldoon gets into midfield. fluent
It spins fast, the leaves fall to the ground, and he buries himself.
Suddenly there was light in the sky. , the motion is
Ginny, and Jenny looked at the road ahead.

"Jesus," Mildred said.

Gennaro noticed a Land Cruiser parked in the middle of the road. He couldn't see.
This is the second Land Cruiser. “Where’s the other car?”

Muldoon stops and moves to the left. "there." The second local vehicle is.
twenty feet, and fixed to the root of a tree;

What am I doing there?

"Trex didn't do it."

"Did you drop him?" January said.

Mildred's face went pale. "Let's finish," he said, and hopped in the jeep. they
He left in the second vehicle of the Land Cruiser. Their lights were switched off and they disappeared into the night.

As they got closer, Gennaro noticed how the car stopped. He was careful to leave Muldoon alone.
Look outside first.

"|I don't mind," said Mildred. "We couldn't find anyone."

"I don't?"

"No," she said. He explained that, during his years in Africa, he traveled through the interior of the continent,
Twelve Love Beasts attack the people. Tiger Attacks : Tiger
table overnight and took a three-year-old. But a dog attacked Amboseli, two goats.
attacks; A wild boar flew overhead in the east, near Meru. Generally, there are some
Evidence is given.

Her ignorance of the bad example of an abandoned animal
The tent, the trail of blood leading to the dog, the dirty clothes, not far away.
camp. But the truth is, nothing, especially when the contender was young.
A child or child. It was as if the man had disappeared as if he had been cut from
genuine and there is no turning back. A tick can kill a child if it scratches and pierces its tail.
Maybe there was no blood.

And often you won’t find another one. button.
on a cloth or paper towels. But it’s often the wrong thing to do.

Pirates take children – they love children – and leave nothing behind. So Mildred
He hoped they didn't bother any of the other kids.

But suddenly, he stopped. "I'm hurting," she said.


Muldoon tries to secure the team. The front end of the Land Cruiser was shattered.
But he didn’t have many other relatives. He sees pieces of glass in the street. so
This is where he had to break the line before lifting the car and driving it out.
here. But the car has a great value. Mildred kept the light in her soul.

"empty?" Genaro said suspiciously.

"It wasn't," Muldoon said. The light shines through the radio transmitter and radiates to the ground.
Car He saw something else, black and red. The doors are locked and
It was locked, but he slipped out the back door and onto the roof.
Strange things.


"It's a clock," he said, squinting at the light of his torch. Unlimited number of hours
Pulverized black rubber. The LCD screen is great, I think you might be
He wore it, though he didn't believe it. But that’s the kind of pressure a child gets.

"What do you mean, Clock?" January said.

"Yeah. And there's a radio, but that's it."

Does that really matter?

"Yeah. And there's something else..."" Mead smiled. There was a smell in the car.
He turned on the light until there was a knock on the door. It touches on:
Always good. “Some kids can do it,” Muldon said.

Gennaro looked up. What makes you think that?

"A monster," said Mildred. "The clock is ticking." He gave Genord a watch that
He waved his hand toward the light.

"The crystal is broken," Genaro said.

"Yes," said Mildred. "And this team is undefeated."

"what do you mean?"

"The boy was shot."

"It could happen at any time," Genaro said. "Anytime before the attack."

"No," Muldoon said. "These LCD crystals are fragile. It takes a lot of pressure to break them."
The clock face was broken during the attack."

"So the boy took off his watch."

"Think about it," said Mildred. "If Tyransaurus attacked you, would you try to
Take off your watch?

"You can smell it."

"You can't take a watch off someone's wrist if you can't take a frame."
However, not all teams are happy. No, said Mildred. "The boy was stunned. He looked at his
Make sure it’s done and remove it. He had time to do that.

"when?"

"It can only happen after the murder has taken place," Mildred said. "The kid should be in that car."
After selection. And the radio was off, so that stopped too. He’s a smart kid, you know
It's not good.

"If it is light," said Gennard, "where does it go? For I sit here and wait .
He caught it.

“Yeah,” Muldoon said. "But you can stay here. Let the Tyrannosaurus come back. At least
Another animal. No matter what, something had to go.

"Where did he go?" January said.

"Let's see if we can find him," said Mildred, walking to the edge of the street.


Genaro looked down at Muldoon. His face is just holy.
On the ground, he followed his plan. Mildred truly believed she was onto something.
One of the children survived. Gennaro did not like it. The key to finding the right person
Sean let himself sink into despair until he closed and destroyed the park. whatever.
Muldoon says Genaro treats him with affection and respect and

Have you seen these? Muldoon asked as he looked down. What number? January
said.

“People are on foot, you see them coming up to them on the street, especially the elderly.
sboe - sole type of sboe. Look at the shape of the line.

Gennaro just stared at the floor. The plates catch the light from the waves.

“You can see,” Muldoon said, “the adult publications that come here are given
Another book. Small and Medium. . . She goes in circles. . so
They all stood and listened. . .. but now they are, and so they go. It showed
for. "There. In the park."

Genaro shook his head. "You can see anything in this world."

Mildred stood up, stumbling. He looked down and smiled. "state
Whatever you want, I saved some children. And maybe both. It can also be an adult.
"If those capital letters belong to someone other than Regis, we'll probably find them in the park."

"tonight?" January said.


But Mud didn't listen. He was walking past a flat field before
rain. He shook his head again. What is this girl wearing?

“Christ,” Gennard groaned. "|I don't know."

Muldoon walked briskly down the street. And they did.
Wind reading. The sound of an animal.

"Listen," Genaro said quietly, "I think you're better-."

"Shhh," Mildred whispered. He stopped to listen.

"It's just the wind," Gennaro said.

They heard his voice again. There was no wind. From within.
There was a pile of leaves in front of her across the road. Not like a dog, but Mildred
She studied it carefully. He turned off his light and shouted, but the air didn’t change
feature. Muldoon held out a tree branch.

"What's that?" January said.

"It's Malcolm," said Mildred.


Lan Malcolm was next to him, his cheeks white and his mouth open. He drew in a breath.
Wind Wind. Mildun set Genaro on fire, then leaned in to look at the body.
"|You can't hurt me," he said. "Alright, Sissy Blots…"

Xenari flicked on the light at her feet. "He had a dress code." Malcolm lost his mind.
Pressure in the left leg. Genaro pushed his light out with his foot. His right leg was paralyzed.
On the underside of the legs, the blisters are small and coated with blood. Mildred
He snapped his fingers and Malcolm screamed.

Muldoon froze, trying to decide what to do. Malik may have another illness.
It's beautiful. He could have killed to get her. But if they leave him here, he will die.
mess. Because he was handsome, he could wear a tronic around his neck.
He bled to death. And he may have been arrested. They can also remove it.

Gennaro helped Muldoon pull the man down, kneeling on their back.
Malcolm sighed and took a deep breath. "Lex," she said. "Lexi… go…Lexi…."

Who is Lex? Mildred said.

"A girl," Jannard said. They take Malcolm to the Jeep and arrest him.
stay. Gennaro shoots him in the leg. Malcolm yelled again. Mildred
He undid his pants and saw the skin underneath, white peeling
nut.

“We need to bring it back,” Mauldin said.

Are you going here without the kids? January said.

"If they go to the dump, it's 20 miles," Mudd said, shaking his head. "a
How do we connect everything to motion parameters. If the kids survive and th
Usually the motion sensors close, and we can move with them and put them back again.
But if we don’t get Drs. Malcolm now, we're going to die.

"Then we can go back," Genaro said.

"Really | Think about that."

They got into the car. “You can tell Hammond to the kids,” Genaro said.
failure?"

"No," Muldoon said. "you."


ride


Donald Gennaro looked over at Hammond, sitting in the deserted living room. The man was making a card.
Cream, to eat in peace. "Does Mildred think the children are somewhere in the park?"
"It was his plan, yes."
"So, I'm sure we'll find them."
"|It's amazing," Jannard said. He saw the old man still eating and felt hungry.
"Oh | I'm sure we'll find them. Then | tell everyone that this park is meant for children."
Genaro said, "So you know they're infallible, sir."


"failure?" He pulled away. "Yeah | I know they're wrong. It's not that simple." He was happy and
Change the circle again. "Look, Donald," said Hammond. "We don't have to take ourselves too seriously. We
It was a hurricane Sunday or something, so we were a little busy
It's a bad problem. And that’s what happened. We worked with him. Arnold is coming.
Computers are cleaned. Mildred takes the children, and | You have no idea if he’ll ever come back to them.
By the time we perform this procedure. So let’s wait and see what happens next, shall we?”

"Whatever you say, man," Gennard said.


"why?" Henry Wu said as he looked at the car.

« Because | I see Nedry doing something illegally,” Arnold said. "That's what I'm running for."

"Okay," Wu said. "But have you looked at your balance?" "as

"what?" Arnold asked.

"| I don't know. Don't the alarms work?" Wu said. Bone tests? All this?

"Jesus," Arnold said, coughing loudly. "It has to go. Security measures shouldn't die."
Except for the big board."

"Well," Wu said, "if Keichika was busy, you should explain what he did."

"I really can," Arnold said. He started pushing buttons. Why didn’t he think of it?
before? That's obvious. Jurassic Park's operating system has some security flaws.
His mind was built into it. One of them is a software that manages all software
They get people in the mood. It was originally introduced as a crime prevention tool.
However, it is protected for its conservation value.

In a flash, all the letters Nedry had typed into the computer the day before.
is displayed in another window on the web page:


13,42,121,32,88,77,19,13,13,122,13,44,52,77,90,13,99,13,100,13,109,55,103
144, 13, 99, 87, 60, 13, 44, 12, 09, 13, 43, 63, 13, 46, 57, 89, 103, 122, 13, 44, 52, 88.9.
31.13.21.13.57.98.100.102.102.146.13.13.13
system

Nedra

Go to government level.

Nedra

040/ # L/67& m.

Hello

check

Look at the photo.

forbidden

Sl te

check

rbt_white


"that?" Arnold said. "I could have stayed here for hours, yes."

"It probably just takes time," Wu said. "Until he tried to get away with it."

The first line of code is Nedry's ASCI tape code.
He tapped on his console. These numbers tell us that before going to the default UI, e.g.
Anyone can use a computer. Well, first Nedra just observes, which you shouldn’t do.
Remember the program built the system.

“Maybe check for any changes, before you go in,” Wu said.

"Okay," Arnold said. Arnold is now looking at the legislative model that should enable
Follow Nedry’s instructions, step by step. "We can see what he did."

System is Nedry’s way of overwhelming users and controlling the cost of compensation.
The computer asks her name and she answers: Neidra.

This name was allowed in the code, so the computer allowed him to enter the system.
He asks Nedry to go to the management level, which is the computer government level. level of government.
He asks for more protection, saying his name is Nedry, he’s a 7th grade and so on.


Nedra

040/# L/67& m.

Hello

These concerns led Nedry to the throne. From there, he got the hang of it. and by
He obeyed, and the computer let him go. On the offensive side, Nedry seeks.
Three changes:

Look at the photo.

forbidden

Sl te

"It's trying to solve security problems," Wu said. “He didn’t want anybody to see what.
He'll do it.

"Yeah," Arnold said. “But he doesn’t know that he can’t change .
The systems will be locked if the parameters are not changed manually or in the master.

After three failed attempts, the computer was slow with Nedry. but
From that moment on, the computer thinks it’s Nedry.
He withdrew, trying to do what he couldn’t do where he was. So the computer asks
That’s where he wanted to be,” Neider said.

check. And he left her there.

"Ultimately," Wu said, "because it was meant to be." He followed in Neidra’s footsteps.
He entered.

rbt_white

"what is this?" Arnold said. "That white monster? That's what he did?"

"It's called something," Wu said. In computer terms, a “cluster” is a collection of a string.
One can be carried and used as you carry a chair throughout the house. some
It can be a set of commands for creating an image, updating a link, or doing something .
The number.

“We’ll see where he is in the draft,” Arnold said. "We can do what I do." fluent
Go to the main program and type:


Search for WTERBT.OBJ
The computer received a light:
Nothing in the library.


"Not there," Arnold said.
"Then ask for the list of rules," Wu said.
Arnold wrote:


Search/write: Wittrpt.obg


The screen scrolled fast, the lines of logic closing as they went. So he stayed.
for a minute, and then suddenly it’s over.

"That's it," Wu said. "It's nothing, it's a bug." The pointer indicates the body.
to display a page:


curve = return{cm.dt} tamrn{itm.dt2}. wait
= Gehandel {ssd.etcl} tamrn2 {etm.dd4}.
In radiometer(!gn), replace shpval.obi with lim(Value{d})-Xval. and
Impedance (mH) (** mH). MeterVis Reference.
if metroband] (vGT) ((Drubuc(ty)) return.
limits.4 = maxbytes (%33) of type {line 04}.
Row.5 = row, fivedigits, 0 {row .2value(sb)}.
in whterbt.obi link.sst {security, privacy} ready for installation.
North = {Maxiran + Spect} Tampin (FDN-&BB+$404).
hormone = {main line multiplier / 2} divider (fdn-&dd + $105). empty
Camera Send screen.obi output.


"Son of a bitch," Arnold said.

Wu shook his head. "It's not a compensation problem."

"No," Arnold said. "It was a trapdoor. The green man put in something that looked like an invitation, though."
A policy that establishes and directs safety and security systems. He loved her.
You can go anywhere in the park."

“Then we can do it again,” Wu said.

"Yeah, we should." Arnold frowned at the paper. "All we have to do is listen to the commands."
I saw violence on the page,” he said.

Wu got up from his chair. “At that moment, someone walked in,” she said .
Freeze for one hour. | Contributions | You better go find my genes.


Eli was in his room taking off his wet clothes and changing his clothes when there was a knock on the door .
be.

"god?" he said, but when he opened the door, he saw Maud standing there and
A basket in his hand. Muldoon is also hot and has some options.
His clothes are dirty.

"I'm sorry, but we need your help," Mildred said quietly. “The Land Cruisers were attacked and .
1 hour later. We arrested Malcolm, but he balked. His leg is badly injured. is
Still not sure, but | He sat on the bed in his room. Harding's on the way."

“Harod?” She said. What about others?

"We don't have any more, Dr. Satter," said Mildred. He spoke gently now.

"Oh my god."

“But I think Drs. Grant and the kids are still alive. I imagine they’re in the park, Doctor.
Satter.”

Did you go to the park?

"I think so. At the time, Malcolm needed help. I asked Harold."

Shouldn’t you call a doctor?

"There is no doctor on the mountain. Harold is our best friend." "but

Of course you can call a doctor-” he said.

"I don't." Mildred shook her head. "The phone lines are busy. We can't make calls." He changed his appearance.
Pack in hand.

"What's that?" She said.

"It's nothing. Just go into Malcolm's room and help Harold if you want." and

Milden leaves.

She sat on her bed, depressed. Ellie Satter is not a woman afraid of risk.
And he knew Grant from the rough times he went through. He left immediately.
Badlands on the fourth day when he hit mud, his truck rolled a few hundred feet.
foot. Grant’s right leg was amputated. He doesn't have water. But he returned to walking with a broken leg.

On the other hand, children. .

He shook his head and pushed the thought away. Thankfully, the kids love Grant. And if
Grant came to the kitchen, of course. .. the right person to take to Jurassic Park
More of a dinosaur expert?


In the park


“I was devastated,” Leake said. "Take it away from me, Dr. Grant." "We'll be leaving soon," Tim said.

"But I'm tired," she said.

"Okay, Lexi," Grant said, picking her up. "Oh, so sweet."

It was about 9:00 a.m. when the moon was full of clouds and shadows.
He led them down a dirt road to a secluded forest nearby. He stopped and turned to Grant.
Tell me where it is. Because we went from the pier at the end, which is where the car was
It exploded, and Grant was sure it was somewhere in Tyransor.
The platform. The one place he never wanted to go. Thought moves to the computer.


Length distribution of Tyrannosaurus, the cross-section tracing its length
In a small house. The house was now occupied by women and children.

But Grant also remembered;
This means they will know they are out of the pack if they cross a line.
moat, or two.

He hadn't seen a thank you yet.

The girl rested her head on his shoulder and tucked her hair into his forehead. It was soon over.
health. Tim walked over to Grant.

"How'd you keep him, Tim?"

"Okay," he said. « But | Do you think we could be in the same position as Tyransaurus?

"I'm sure it's true. | I'd like us to go out for a while."

"Are you going to the zoo?" Tim said. As they got closer, the forest seemed darker.
Make a profit.

"Yeah," Grant said. I think we need to play with the numbers with the motion sensors.

Motion sensors are round boxes erected about four feet off the ground. some
business; Most of them are attached to trees. None of them do this to us
The energy isn’t there. Each sensor plate consists of a flat glass slide and an engraved barcode.
The summary is below. Above him, in the moonlight, Grant could see a moving console .
T/S/04.

They went into the forest. There are big trees everywhere. In the moonlight, the snow drizzled.
The ground squishes against the thick skin, it’s hot, but they hold on.
He is a prisoner. And Grant sees the centaurs. It’s like they don’t exist.
narrative. He passed T/S/03, and T/S/02. Finally, they reached T/S/01. He was too tired to
girl, and was expected to go to the Tyransaurus ruins, but
Just another condo across the street. Then the next letter T/N/01, .
After t/n/02. He warned Grant that he needed to assess the surrounding territory.
Middle, bottle-like. They were moving east to west, so
They reached the edge and then turned back.

"At least we're doing alright," Tim said.

"You're welcome," Grant said.

Tim laughed, tapping vines in the snow. He stood quickly. They keep walking.
A little time. "My parents divorced," he said.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

"My dad died last month. He's got a cemetery in Mill Valley now."

"okay."

"He can't take my wife back. He can't."

"And he said you had a brain injury," Grant said.

Tim was happy. "Yes."

Did you forget? Grant said.

"Not really," Tim said. "Sometimes. It's so annoying."

Who, your mother?

"No, Lexi. My mom has a boyfriend. She knows him from work."

It was published the next day before T/N/03 and T/N/04. - Did you see him? extend
said.

"Yes."

"how are you doing?"

"Okay," Tim said. "Younger than my father, but still important."

How does it affect you?

"| I don't know. It's okay. | I think he's just trying to look nice to me. | I don't know what's going on
do. Sometimes my mom would tell us to sell our house and move. Sometimes I and he
My mother fights at night. | sitting at home playing games on my computer and | I heard it too.

"Uh-huh," Grant said.

Are you divorced?

"No," Grant said. "My wife died young."

- And now you want Drs. Satter ?

Grant smiled mischievously. "No. My student."


"You mean you're at school?"

"Go to college, then." Grant took a moment to pull Lexi aside and
He turns around, passing T/N/05 and T/N/06. There was lightning in the distance. that
The rain is going south. There was little sound in the forest except the plane.
Cicadas and woodworm species.

Do you have kids?" Tim asked. "No,"

Krantz said.

You will see Drs. Satter?

"Well, she's going to marry a nice doctor in Chicago next year."

"Oh," Tim said. He seemed surprised to hear that. They walked for a while. "So wh
Are you getting married?

"|Don't expect me to marry anybody," said Grant. "am

You too,” Tim said.

They walked for a while. Will we play all night? Tim said.

«| I don't know | Really,” Grant said. "We'll have to wait a few hours." He looked over his shoulder.
protect. "We're fine. We have eleven hours to get back. The flight still hasn't left
It reaches the whole country."

Where can we stay? Tim asked quietly.

Grant thinks so. His first thought was that they might uproot the trees and
Sleeping in front of the village. But they had to climb a long way to get out of the herd safely, and
Lex could fall asleep. The leaves are strong; They don’t want to heal.
Otherwise, he didn’t.

They need a better place to live. He thought back to the scenes he’d seen on the plane.
below. He remembers that there were terraced houses everywhere.
It split. Grant couldn’t see where they were because they were on higher ground.
It didn't help. And he couldn’t remember where they were, but he remembered .
They are all near the park. Well from the beginning.

But there was no need for that and he just crossed a line and left.
tyrannosaur paddock, the search for a horse is a quest for adventure. And well
These answers are-

"Tim, can you hold your hat for me? I'll climb a tree and take a quick look."


Between the frames that look straight out of the forest, the tops of the trees soar .
Left and right. They were so surprised that they approached the forest behind the trees.
This was before electricity and asphalt. Then there was his mother.
In the field, he thought it was a sauropod shell. In the distance, lots of trees and snow.
The moonlight glinted off the sea.

In the distance, he heard the roar of a dinosaur, but it was too far away. This is Tim’s body
balance the sun and try again. He followed a group of fireships and finally spotted
Looking for it: a dark road leading to a place far, far away. the first house;
It’s not from scratch, but it exists. And he wasn’t far off. Probably a mile or so
On the tree.

As he got to his knees, Lex sighed.

"What does it mean?" "I heard."

Let it be so.

"We're not wrong. Do you understand now? Come on."

He led her to the door. and the height thereof was twenty cubits, and the socket thereof was of brass. fluent
She looked over your eyes in the moonlight. The water is still on the other side.

Lexus looked up at the ceiling in shock. "can

Are you riding him?” Grant asked.

He wore his gloves and a baseball cap. "Okay. Easy." He started to leave. "But | all
Tim is bad.”

Tim shouted angrily, "You almost died."

“Tim is afraid of heaven.”

"It's not like that."

He went to the village. "That's it."


"I don't."

"Then give it to me."

Grant stopped Tim, trapped in the darkness. The child did not move. "You're too good with a line."
Tim?

"sure."

Do you need help?

"Tim's a bad dog," Lex said.

"Bad idea," Tim said, starting to walk away.


“It’s going to be awesome,” Leake said. They dive up to their necks in the murky water.
Cement to cement. They go upstairs and nothing happens until Tim takes off his clothes.
Wire mesh front. Then they trained together underwater, and now Grant .
He was looking for a way to go.

"At least | I got Timmy over the fence for you," Lex said. "You're scared all the time."

"Thanks for your help," Tim said with a smile. In the moonlight, he could see twinkling lights.
Outside. He walked to the window and looked at the concrete wall in the distance. concrete;
practical; They could not lift it.

"Eww," Lex said, pointing to the water.

"Don't hurt him Lex."

Grant saw a place where the dam had collapsed and the vegetation grew
fluent. He grabbed the fruit and grabbed its root. "Let's go kids." They started walking.
forests, returning to deep darkness.

It only took a few minutes to walk from the village to the Dam.
Road to the site, and the building on the right. passed both motion sensors and
Grant noted with some relief that the sensors weren’t working and the lights weren’t working.
More than two hours after the first fire, it still hasn’t been repaired.

From a distance, they heard Torraso's voice. Are you here? Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "We're on a different side of the table than he is." They collapsed on the grass.
reservoir and road trip. In the darkness, he is called.
as.

"What is this place?" Lex said.

"It's okay," Grant said, hoping he was serious.

The gate is wide enough to fit a wagon through. It’s full of sharp turns.
Inside, they can see a roof terrace with terrace and bar
between the body parts.

The door closed behind a heavy knock. When Grant stopped, Lex stepped aside.
between offices. "Come on people."

Tim followed. “I think you can do it, Drs. Great.”

He was strong; It was a big move, but Grant managed to squeeze his body between the boards
And in the toilet. As soon as he entered the house, he was very tired.

"|I think there's something better," Lex said.

"It's just bad." Grant breaks a brick and throws it into the street. grass in
The middle is warm. They were sure they felt warm. Lex rolled over to her side and hugged her.
eye. Tim waved his hand. He heard the sounds of the sarpods in the distance.

None of the boys are talking. They’re closing in now. Grant shrugged and looked at her.
You look up, but it’s too dark to see the light. He felt the warmth of the children on his body.

Grant closed his eyes and fell asleep.


ride


When Muldoon and Gennaro arrived at the control room, Arnold turned on the device, he said.
"I understand, little lady."

"What's that?" January said.

Arnold revealed on the page:


Vgl = receive {dat.dt} call time{atm.time}

Vg2 = get {date. itl} timecall {itm.time}

If the relation (Vgl, Vg2) is given by lim (Vgl, Vg2) and
The relation (Vg2, Vgl) returns the relation (Vg2, Vgl).

in whte_rbt.obj Visibility Functions (Vgl), Permissions (Vg2)
= MaxBytes (%22) to {column .04} Fixed
border.2 = Stephen, Stephen, 0 { border.2value(dj)}

in the fini.obi link.sst package {security, security} to configure
fini.obi for site.sst {safety, security}
In fabric.obj set page rf whte_rbt.obj, fabric.obj Vgl = .
getHandlers { data.dt } profit { atm.tmp } Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tm}

limit.4 = maxbytes (33%) of { limit .04} of .
= setBorder, setFive, 0 { value .2value(sj)}


"That's it," Arnold said excitedly.

"What's that?" Genaro asked, looking at the screen.

"| I finally ran the original Redocode command. The 'fini.ob' command was restored ."
The most common elements are walls and power.

"Okay," Mildred said.

"But I do other things," Arnold said. "Then they took off the stitches that showed."
It destroyed all evidence that he was there. I'm very happy.

Genaro shook his head. "I don't know about computers." Although he knew a lot about
Learn what it means when you’re a leading tech company. It means a lot, a lot.
The war.

“Well, look at this,” Arnold said and tweeted:

public.obj

The screen flickers and changes rapidly.


Vg1 = GetHeader {Here.DTPMT™} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tm}

If the relation (Vgl, Vg2) is given by lim (Vgl, Vg2) and
The relation (Vg2, Vgl) returns the relation (Vg2, Vgl).

= MaxBytes (%22) to {column .04} Fixed
border.2 = Stephen, Stephen, 0 { border.2value(dj)}
Vgl = Gateway{data.dt} vDialog{atm.tm} Vg2 =
gethead {dat.atl} vatcal {atm.tm}

limit.4 = maxbytes (33%) of { limit .04} of .
= setBorder, setFive, 0 { value .2value(sj)}


Muldoon scrambled up the steps. "protect!" Outside, huge fires burn.
Throughout the park, they walk to the railing and look out.

"Fireworks," Arnold said.

“Does that mean electric paint is bad?” Gennaro said.

"You said yes," Arnold said. “It takes a few seconds for us to come back full force, because we
It has a circumference of 50 miles and manufacturers must support their products along the way.
But in half a minute we’ll get back to our business,” Arnold said to the standing bird .
A map of the park.

On the map, the lightning bolt shot out of the fire and moved.
Park, as it burns in the yard.

"Are they visionaries?" January said.

"Yeah, them too. It'll take a few minutes for the computer to work. But it all works."
Arnold said. "About nine-thirty, we have everything ready and working."


Grant opened his eyes. Natural light enters the room through the ceiling.
gate. Yellow Quartz: The energy he felt when he looked at his watch. just.
He slept for two minutes. He tried to stay for a few minutes and
Then he went back to the net and stood in front of the motion sensors and headphones.
Let them go. The nurse looked at him; They sent a car to get him and the kids, i
He tells Arnold to call the boat and they stay in bed all night.
Manic.

He'll do it now. Just a few minutes. He sighed and closed his eyes.
further.


"It wasn't bad," Arnold said in the courtroom, looking at the map on display. "There are three
throughout the park. better than | hopefully."

"Those leaves?" January said.

"The boat hits some smaller things," he explained. "You can see your mother."
"One here, on Twelve Street, across the street."

"That's when Rex cut the line," Mildred said.

"Right. And there's another one here in Section Eleven. Near the Sharppod Training Center."

Why was that part removed? January said.

"God knows," Arnold said. "It could be a blizzard or a fallen tree. We need to check
Wait a minute. The third is the Great Forest. I don’t know what’s going to happen.
Even outside."

When Genaro looked at it, the map had become a nightmare, filled with blue dots and numbers.
"What does all this mean?"

"The monsters. The visual sensors are working, and the computer is running."
a habitation of all wild beasts. And other people too."

Gennaro looked at the map. "It's about Grant and the kids…."

"Yeah. We've doubled our search count to 400. So, if you're there ar
Inside,” says Arnold, “the movement looks like any other organism.” He looked at her.
The map. "But | I don't see anything."

Why does it take so long? January said.

“You should know, Mr. Gennard,” said Arnold, “that there are many things .
there. Tree branches in the wind, birds flying and all sorts of things. The computer should
Put everything back in its place. It can be taken. ok. The account has been suspended.

Are you not children ? January said.

Arnold leaned back in his chair and looked at the map. “No,” he said .
There are no credits on the card. Everything looks like a dinosaur.
They may be on top of a tree or somewhere out of sight. | You can’t think.
Not many monsters like Rex’s mother showed up. That's because you're sleeping.
one sided and unmoving. Maybe even people are dreaming. We just don’t know.

Mildred shook her head. "Well, let's get you started," he said. "We have to build walls."
And the beasts returned to their places. According to this application, there are five
Back to the beautiful garden. Now I will organize the maintenance team.

Arnold is furious with Gennard. "Please see Dr. Malcolm's opinion. Tell Dr. Harold
that Muldoon would be there for an hour to see the horses. And I gave the news to Mr. Hammadi.
"We have begun our final preparations."


Genaro walked through the metal doors and entered the Safari Gate. Look
Ellie Sattler comes down the stairs with makeup on and a bottle of water on. "There he is."
In a rest,” he said. "We use it to heat the water."

"how are you doing?" Jinaru asked.

"All right," he said.

Genaro followed Ellie to Malcolm's and was shocked to hear her scream.
laugh. The surgeon shot in his stomach and Harold hooked up an IV.

"Then another said, 'I'll tell you straight, | I don't care, Billy. | I'm back for the kitchen thing!"

Harold laughed.


"Not bad, right?" Malcolm said with a laugh. "Oh. Mr. Gennaro. You see. Now you
You know what will happen when you try to go again.

Gennaro came in and tried it.

“He had a morphine addiction,” Harding said.

« Soon, | I can tell you,” Malcolm said. "Col, she's affected by her medication. You understand
What about the others?”

"No, not yet," Jenna said. "And I'm glad you did the right thing."

“There must be another way,” said Malcolm, “if the spinning wheel can .
septic and starting to smell very, uh, stinky? But | Always say you can’t defend your secret.
funny. . ."

Genaru laughed. Do you remember what happened?

"Okay | Remember," Malcolm said. Do you think Tyrannosaurus hunts?
Rex And you're out of your mind? Not really, I assure you, you will remember for the rest of your life.
life. In my experience, probably not very long. But, even now, | delighted."

Malcolm said as he sprinted out of the Land Cruiser into the snow and followed her.
Rex. "It's my fault. It's so funny, but | he was scared. Anyway, he chose
I got out of bed.

"as well as?" January said.

"Torso," Malcolm said and raised his wand. A half circle is separated from it.
Voice to voice. "He pulled himself up by his neck and bled profusely and fell to the ground. And |
He was shocked, but it all made sense when he pulled it off. | sunday
foot. But the kiss wasn't half bad." He smiled. "I suppose so.

"Most carnivores don't have very large teeth. Their real strength is in their teeth," Harding said.
body. Breasts suck only, and they use their tongue to suck and spit. But with a little
Faith like Drs. Malcolm Banga just jokes and jokes.

"I'm afraid it is," Malik said. "| I thought I lived only the heart of a great man ".
It didn't help. To be honest, he struck me as a bad fan.
A car or a small house.

Do you think he left half-heartedly?

"I hate to say it," Malcolm said, "but | I was wrong | He was in good spirits. He was .
Mine, of course. Then again, it only weighs eight tons. | I don't. "

Genaro smiled at Harding and said, “They will finish the walls now. Arnold said.”
"Muldoon needs your help to hunt the dragons."

"Okay," Harold said.

“As long as you leave me with Drs. Satler,” Malcolm said, “and a lot of morphine.” “And if you don’t
"It doesn't matter here, Malcolm."

What does Malcolm mean? January said.

"Your attitude makes me want to tell you the truth about something," Malcolm said.
I am." She whimpered back and closed her eyes. Within moments, she was asleep.

Ellie goes out to the balcony with Genaro. "Don't be fooled," he said. "It's a big problem
letter. When will the helicopter be here?

"Helicopter?"

“A warning needs to be taken this time.
island."


park


The portable generator pulses and roars, and electrical pins fly in the background.
With telescopes in hand. Muldoon could hear the splash of forest water a few miles away.
north. He returned to the service van and saw a worker driving the large truck.
Peter St. John;

"No, no," he said. "Just shut up, Carlos. We don't have to."

He turned to look at the wall. It was difficult at first to find their seats.
Because there wasn’t much else: there was a small tree in the park. I was
Many local shop volunteers were on hand to
Hiding shadow from the crowd.


But these trees are infested with needles and needles. Those animals
It snapped in the gust of wind, and the metal rod hit the wall and locked onto it.
leave. Of course, none of this was supposed to happen; Farmers have to use plastic.
Fixtures and fixtures behind walls. But that’s what happened.

Anyway, it’s not a big deal. All they have to do is remove the hammer from the wall.
Remove the bait wire and place it in the field ready for the evening. He didn’t have to go.
More than twenty minutes. And it works, because Mildred learns about diffusers .
He always sat by the river. Although river staff
A vessel where demons can enter water and make fire.

Rama, the servant, is coming. He said, "Sixcuse Mud, did you see a dream?"

What light? Mildred said.

Ramen went east into the woods. "|We saw her when we left. We loved her
weak. Did you see him? It’s like a car with lights on, but it’s not moving.”

Muldoon rubbed his eyes. Maybe a straight repeat. After that, the government was quick to reason.
"We'll take care of it later," he said. "Now, let's get that stick out of the wall."


Arnold was overjoyed. The park is coming to life. Mildred is doing
They are the wall. Hammond went to check on the horses they were bringing in with Harding. though
He was tired, Arnold was kind; I was thinking of prosecutor Jenny.
"Malcolm's report?" Arnold said. "You like that?"

“I was just looking,” Gennard said.

"You want me to tell you why Malcolm is a bad guy?"

"sure."

Arnold took another sip. “It’s technology.”

"Look at me."

"Okay," Arnold said. Linear theory indicates a nonlinear system. Now it is fixed.
It aims to study everything from vaccines to populations to the brain
waves during the syndrome. It’s a very interesting science of fashion. It can be used in any non-invasive way.
Where things can go wrong. ok?"

"Okay," Gennard said.

"Lan Malcolm was a math teacher who studied chaos theory. He was a very simple and ambitious man."
But what he does, in addition to wearing black, he uses a computer to enhance .
Complex systems. And John Hammond loved new discoveries, so he consulted Malcolm .
A scene from the Jurassic Park. What did Malcolm do. All Malcolm models are phase-space models.
displays on the computer screen. Have you seen them?

"No," said Gennard.

"Well, they're like blooming sunflowers. As Malcolm said, everyone is
The target takes control of the trigger load. “Are you and me?”

"It's no good," Genaro said.

Arnold threw his hands in the air. "Say | put a bottle of water on my head. Oh."
The truth slipped out of my hands. It could slip out of my hand. It can fit in my hand.
Or between my hands. | I really don't know where it's going to go, but | Just know that it will pass.
I have one arm on one side. It must be done.

"Okay," Gennard said.

The GPS system has been described as the entire system being a floating boat.
The crown of innocent assault. Blade can slide or slide to one side. very good
Do a lot of things, basically. But it always goes hand in hand with the king’s determination.

"ok."

Malcolm’s designs usually involved a tunnel, or tunnel, through which water flowed .
quite. He called this phenomenon the Malcolm Effect. Everything about her.
It can fall. And that’s the same thing he said about George Parker. because it's in
unfortunately."

"It's a problem," Genaro said. "And what did you do when you got your throne?"

“We didn’t do well, we really did,” Arnold said.

"Isn't that right?"


"To cool down," Arnold said. "We're dealing with life stuff, after all. This is life, not
Computer Models."


In the candlelight, the head of Hypsilophodent’s skeleton emerged above the horizon.
Mouth guarded, eyes wide.

"Careful! Careful!" cried Hammond, as he began clearing the street.

Harding was dazed, his head hitting the leather sheets. He didn’t want to live.
through the gastrointestinal tract. Crank shouted, raising the beast into the air.
Wait for truck paint. Hipsy was a small dryosaur, seven feet long and five feet wide.
One hundred pounds. Smear ribs with sweet potato. Mind was breathing, but
It’s just a meaning. Harding had shot himself moments earlier with a knife and
He seems to have learned the right way to go. There’s always time to catch these parties
Animals. It goes by fast and you’ll run into the bushes and disappear somewhere you can’t reach.
they. Unfortunately they went into cardiac arrest. This implies a
Pull up and go. The right amount.

look! practical! Hammond yelled at the staff.

"Mr. Hammond," said Harold. "please."

"Well, they have to be careful-."

"He thinks," Harold said. He came off like a hippie.
And he went down, and put chains upon him. Harding packs a heart-shaped necklace.
She listened to her heart and immediately took out a large hummingbird in the shape of a dakka.
Baster and shoot him in the chest. read: 96.2 degrees.

"how is?" Hammond asked angrily.

"Okay," Harold said. "He missed a class and a half."

"He's huge," Hammond said. "It's very difficult."

"You don't want him to get up and jump in the truck," Harding said.

Before arriving at the cemetery, Harding served as San Diego’s forestry director
animals, and is a world expert in veterinary medicine. He traveled the world, interacted with animals.
in animal husbandry in Europe, India, and Japan. You don’t have to do the most important thing.
A young child shows up and gives a ride on a playground. But when he learned what
Hammond … couldn’t move. Harding is a researcher and
Inspired to write the first book on veterinary medicine: Diseases of the Dinosaurs
Coercion. In the early 20th century, veterinary medicine developed on its own –
Good animals make hospitals very different from hospitals. New books are just an improvement on old books.
For a farmer, there is no land he cannot handle em. But you’ll get it right.
Modern plant science: that’s it!

Harding doesn’t regret his decision and puts on a great show with
These dogs. And he didn’t want to hear a word from Hammond now.

Hypsy smiled and nodded. He breathes a little; There is no visual illusion.
still. But it’s time to go. "You're all on board," Harold growled. "Let's give him this girl."
Paddock.”


"Living organisms," says Arnold, "happiness is not like mechanical organisms. Living organisms never
balance. The results are bad. It may seem like they’re sitting still, but they’re not. Everything in
Perspective and change. Somehow it all falls into place."

Gennaro sighed. "But not much changes, body temperature doesn't
Another way-"

"Our immune system is constantly changing," Arnold said. "Forever. It changes all the time."
Twenty-four hours, less in the morning and more in the afternoon. varies with level, with
Disease, by work, by smoking, by food. differs from
below. Minor changes to the page. Since at any moment there is a force that attracts
At the top, there are other forces pulling it down, and it isn’t being compressed by beam A. And everything else that happens in life
So are the sounds.

"So you said…"

Arnold said: “Malcolm was a different person. "He sat in his office and did the right thing
mathematical models, and it never occurred to him that what he was seeing was wrong.


They matter. See: time | When we work with loudspeakers, we use something called 'resonance'.
you.' The resonant diameter means that even if the bullet doesn’t pierce through the barrel, it will
There was no hope for him. He can’t, and he can’t go back. is
Characteristics of mechanical systems. A small infection can become a big one and affect the whole body. but
These small steps matter in life. It shows that freedom is.
And that's the answer. Malcolm doesn't understand.

"Are you sure you don't understand? You're confusing the difference between
Life is not-"

"Look," Arnold said. "It's proof." He pointed at the cameras.

"In about an hour," he says, "the whole park was back on track. One thing that caught me
The phone is clear. For some reason they keep showing up. But everything else goes away.
And it’s not science. true."


I injected the energy into his chest and Harding was distracted by Medrine.
The female Dryosaur seems to have come closer to land. Then the beast was healed.
She screams and flails her arms and legs.

"Go back, everyone," Harold said as he ran off. "Come back."

The dinosaur smiled and crossed his legs and shrugged. He lowered his head and looked
People eat in stone fireplaces.

"She's getting better," Hammond said, grinning.

"Yes," Harold said. "You stand."

The Dresaurus paused, then walked briskly over the distant ledge.

Why don't you go?

"He'll do it," Harold said. "It'll take an hour to heal. Normal." wonder.
Back to the car. "Alright boys, let's go to Stego."


Muldoon watched as the tree trunk fell to the ground. Lines are drawn.
shortening, and the apex of the protocarpus was brittle. Muldoon could see dark signs;
against the silver screen where he walked. On salt flats, a lot of concrete.
Pipeline networks are recommended. We have to change them. But before that, Arnold
It should cover the entire line.

"Cote. This is Mildred. We're ready to start practicing." "all

"All right," Arnold said. "Shut up now."

Muldoon looked at his watch. Somewhere in the distance, he hears a voice. I heard
Like a pig, but he knew they were dolphins. She goes to Ramn and says let’s finish.
above. | You want to get to the other side of the wall.


The hour passed. Donald Gennaro sees the glowing map in the control room as a dot and
The numbers are staggering and divisive. “What’s happening now?”

Arnold works in Kansas. "I'm looking for their phone numbers. So we called
Malcolm.”

"No, | I mean later."

Arnold looked at the floor. "As far as animals go and both
education. From | I told you the park was in the barracks. If not for Malcolm’s wand. hear,
There are three such types. . . ."

"Arnold." It was Muldoon’s voice.

"Yes?"

"Did you see that bloody thing?"

"Just a minute."

Through an observer, Genaro spotted a shadow in the distance beneath a grassy field, moving.
wind. There was a house far away from me. "It's Sarpoda School,"
Arnold explained. "It's one of the most important ingredients we use in cosmetics, food products, and more."
We've got them everywhere in the park, in every neighborhood." TV Video
On walking. "Now we're moving the camera to see the ceiling . . ."

Gennaro saw the ship floating in the steel light. reserved section;
He was killed. Mildred’s Jeep and crew are there.


"Huh," Arnold said. "You mean Rex went into Sauropod form."

Mildred said, "Good dinner tonight."

"We need to get out of here," Arnold said.

"With what?" Mildred said. "Rex and I have nothing to do. I'm building this ship, but
thou shalt not come in until the morning.

"He doesn't care, Hammond."

"We'll talk about it when we get back," Mildred said.


How many sharks have sharks killed? Hammond said as he walked into the courtroom.

"Well just one," said Harold. "Big animals, Rex can only swim for a while
party.

"We need to get out before dark," Hammond said.

Mildred shook her head. "I won't be there until morning."

Hammond stood up, as he always did when
pain. Did you forget that you work for me?

"No, Mr. Hammond, I don't. But it's an ancient Tyransaurus after all. How
Do you want to find out?

"We have weapons."

“We had a 20-inch shot,” Muldoon said. "It's good for the animal to
It weighs four or five pounds. It weighed eight pounds. He wasn't afraid.

"You didn't ask for a stronger weapon…"

"|I ordered three large guns, Mr. Hammond, but I'm sorry, we're only limited
a. And he went out. Nedra took him as she left.

"That's ridiculous. Who ordered it?"

"Nedry is no problem for me, Mr. Hammond," Muldoon said.

Hammond said, “I think at this point, there’s no way around it .
Tyrannosaurus?"

"That's my point," Muldoon said.

"It's a problem," Hammond said.

"This is your park, Mr. Hammond. You wouldn't want a fan trespassing on your property
Dinosaurs. Well, now Rex has Sharpada and you don’t have to worry about that anymore
Okay." He left the room.

"Just a minute," Hammond said, smiling. Genaro stares at the screens, and
She hears noises upstairs and says to Arnold, "|I didn't know you knew."
You still own the park, after all.

"Don't worry," Arnold said, lighting another cigarette. "We have a park. Let it be."
Two hours. We may have to kill a couple of dinosaurs before we can get Rex out of here, but hopefully .
We have our own park.”


breakfast


Grant awoke to a low, mechanical crack. He opened the door.
The eye caught a flash of lightning that passed in front of him on the path leading to the front of the house. double
This was exceedingly blessed. Then the game is stopped from the beginning, and the food
The house was quiet again.

Grant sighed. He pulled himself closer, wincing in pain, and sat down.

The sunlight comes through their windows. The next day : he slept all night !
He looked at his watch and it was quick: 5 p.m.
Look at that idea. She threw herself on his chest and cried. His head was throbbing and his body was convulsing as he was.
And he fell. He heard a noise near the hallway, like lightning. and
Then Lex laughed.

Grant stops and looks around. Now that the sun was out, he could see
Some treatment at home, lots of medication and activities. He saw a hole in the wall.
Metal crate and note: Sauropod Conservation House (04). This should be
sauropod Shell, as you might expect. He opens the drawer and looks at the phone, but when he switches it off.
He picks up the receiver and finds the phones are still working.


"Take care of your sleep," Lake said. "Don't be a dog, Ralph."

Grant walks down the hallway and sees Lex in the office doorway, holding a
The monster in the background is a black cat screaming at Grant.
You know. Three-year-old, horse-sized children. There was no tumor in the baby.
In the head, it’s just part of the body. He stuck his head out between the sheets.
As for Lex, her eyes roamed his face as she leaned in closer.

"It's better," Leake said. "There's plenty of medicine, don't worry." He shook the baby's head.
"You like horses, don't you, Ralph?"

Lex turned to look at him.

"It's Ralph," Lex said. "He's my friend. He likes trouble."

Grant took a step back and stood, panting. "You're beautiful

“It’s bad,” Leake said.

"|You're so scared."

"Tim, too. He's got a sweet tooth."

“Where’s Tim?”

"Sleep," she said. “Want to help me feed Ralph?”

The little triseratop looked at Grant. Grass fell from both sides of his mouth.
The top of the tree became menacing.

"He was a big eater," Leake said, "and he ate a lot."

The boy stiffened and licked his lips. He opened his mouth and swallowed again. extend
He could see her round thighs and cherry-shaped belly.

“Okay, just a minute,” Lex said, pushing another piece of wood out of the way, “Yeah, .
Ralph, she said, "I hope your mother never leaves you."

Why the name Ralph?

"Because he's just like Ralph. In school."

Grant reached out and touched her shoulder.

"Well, you can make it out," Leake said. "You feel better when you're attacked, don't you, Ralph?"

His skin was dry and hot, like a football. Ralph shouted something.
Grant returned his hand. In the polar fields, the right hemisphere grows happier.

"It's very difficult." Ralph watches Lex walk up to Grant as he eats and shows no signs of fear.
He reminds Grant that dinosaurs just don’t have personalities for humans. "Maybe | maybe
It really is,” Leake said.

"We shouldn't be doing this."

"|He made me laugh," Leake said. "It would be fun to ride a dinosaur."

Grant looked at fossil records and in the sauropod field. I was
It lights up every few minutes. You need to understand the world and get
Sensor at the base. Either way, it can take the people in the control room an hour
Here she is. And he didn’t like the idea of ​​the phone. . . .

They heard a noise, like the neighing of a great horse, and the boy was surprised.
They were worried. She tried to push his head between the pillows, but he caught her in the trap.
frill, and screamed in terror.

The sun is back. She was close this time.

Ralph rose on his hind legs uneasily between the brows and shook his head.
Back and forth, he pressed against the boards.

"Ralph, you're right," Lex said.

"Wait," Grant said. He put his hand on Ralph's head and leaned down, smiling.
to the side and back of the animal. The tub went wrong and the boy fell into the tub and drowned.
He went fast and hard. So the kid hid in the shadows and came up with a big
In appearance, near the base of the tree. Its feet have five toes like those of an elephant.

Ralph looked around and sighed. A bear appeared: six feet long and three feet wide.
A white mask, one over each big eye and a smaller one behind her nose. fluent
A Perfect Throshertop. The creature looked at Lex and Grant, nodded slowly, and
He stared at Ralph. A mouth came out, hugging the baby. shouted Ralph and
He shrugged his shoulders excitedly.

Is it his mother? Lex said.

"Yeah," Grant said.


Should we feed the mother? Lex said.

But Mrs. Thrushthorp pushes Ralph across her fingers, killing the baby .
Beards.

"Don't worry."

The boy left the boat and went away. Sometimes, I have my mom.
son, who called after the two left the bathroom.

"Hello, Ralph," Leica said, holding out her hand. Tim stepped out onto the porch.

"Tells you what," Grant said. "I descended the mountain, turned off the motion sensors so they didn't move
Please, let us know. You two stay here and wait for me.”

"No," Lex said.

"Why? Stay here. It's safe here."

"Don't leave us," he said. "No, Timmy?"

"Okay," Tim said.

"Okay," Grant said.

They ran in the streets and outside.


This was before it dried completely.

The air is hot and humid, and the sky is a deep blue. White white is blocked.
soil. Off to the side, a mother Thrustertop and her child are seen playing in the yard,
Large Hadrosaurus feed on vegetation along the shoreline.

Some Hadrosaurs stood upright in the water. They bowed their heads and drank.
They dip their heads into the dry water. Then, they look at each other, their heads nodding.
From the shore a small boy jumped out, screamed, and ran towards the water
The adults looked at him in shock.

To the south, other Hadrosaurs eat leaves. Sometimes they grow
On their hind legs, they put their feet up on the branches to reach the branches.
Long legs. And off in the distance, in the trees, was a large, slender Apatosaurus .
wrapped around his big head. The place was haunted, Grant couldn’t believe it.
war

"Yes!" Lex yells and steps closer. Two six-foot tall horns were completed.
they. "What's that?"

"Animals," he said. "The Jurassic is the Age of Monsters." "I can

Falling?” Lik said.

«|Don't worry about it,' Grant said.

Tim picks up his tool. The dragon turns on the light. He could feel the weight of a large object.
insect.

"He'll hurt you," Lex said.

But the ball quickly turned white, and, when Tim
He reached out and pulled his hand back.

"Which way are we going?" Lex said.

"there."

They started walking to the other side of the hall. They came to a red box on a tall metal ledge.
tripod, first-mover. Grant stopped and moved his team forward and
But nothing happened. If the phones are not working, the sensor may not be working.
"See you again," he said, pointing to everything. From afar they hear
The voice of a great animal.


"Oh, hell," Arnold said. "I didn't find it." He took a sip of coffee and watched TV with his eyes closed.
He had deleted all TV channels from the internet. In the courtroom, he looks for a computer.
code. He was tired; He worked twelve hours a day. He looked at Wu, who
from the lab.

"What did you find?"

"The phones didn't go out. They couldn't come back. | I think Nedry did something to the phone."

Wu picked up the phone and listened to the dial. "Like a model."

"But that's not it," Arnold said. because | He reached deep down and covered everything.
model. "What I heard was white noise, which sounded like a modem ringing."


"So phones are bad?"

"Today, yes. Nedry got very close. He seemed to follow him."
Software Code, and Software | I didn't get it, because | enacted the Criminal Code based in part on the
program page. But the rule of thumb for phones seems to be set.
Computer memory.

Wu raised his hand. "Okay? Just do it: turn off the computer and reboot the system."

"I've never done that before," Arnold said. "But I don't mind. It's fine."
You can go to the beginning-but you can go over them. You are not a computer scientist either. I don't
really. And because there’s no phone line, we can’t talk to anyone who lives there.”

"If the process is a RAM resident, it won't show up in the list. You can free up some RAM and
You don’t know what you’re looking for. | You think you can only do it by thinking.

Enter Jinaru. "We didn't even have a phone."

"We're working on it."

"You've been working on it since midnight. And Malcolm is the worst. He needs therapy .
attention."

"That's why I had to sell it," Arnold said. "| I can't believe everything can go back."

Genaro said, "Look. There's someone sick in this room. He needs a doctor or he's going to die. You."
Never call a doctor without a phone. Otherwise, die 4. New,
Put down the phones and use the phones!

Arnold paused.

"good?" January said.

"Well, that's it... Security systems don't allow access to the computer, and-"

"Then kill the guards! Don't think in your head that he'll go
Did he die without help?

"Okay," Arnold said.

He stood up and walked over to the main board. He opened the doors and went down
Seatbelt latches. He took them out one by one. "You asked for it,"
Arnold said. "And you understand."

He puts the key down.

The school is dark. Everyone looks black, and the three men stand in the dark.

How long should we wait? January said. "Thirty seconds," Arnold said.


Water! “It will be tested,” Leake said.

"than?" Grant said.

"That flower!" Lex said. "Tastes like free food."

Grant paused. He looked across the landscape at the tall trees, trying to figure it out. fluent
He saw nothing. There was no wind to move the leaves. It was peaceful and quiet.
Early morning. "I think it was his idea," he said.

"No-."

Then he heard her voice. He came from the adjacent group of guards.
they. First one mouse, then another, and another, until all the moles were chewing .
cry. The ducks were so relieved that they began swimming faster and out of the water to deposit their eggs.
Others will be observed. . . .

They could smell, too, Grant thought.

With a roar, the Tyransaurus lunged, thirty yards away, towards the horse. flee.
You go onto the field with a lot of dogs. Ignoring them, he went in search of wood.
Hadrosaurus.

I told you so! Lexi shouted. "No one can hear me!"

In the distance ducks quack and run. Grant could feel the heat.
under his feet. "Hey, baby!" He grabbed Leaky, lifted her body off the ground and fled with
Tim loves roses. He saw a tyrannosaur on the beach, swimming.
hadrosaurs, who use their tusks to defend themselves and jump for mating and offspring. He heard
A rush of leaves and trees, and when he saw it, the fingers flew.


Arnold looked at his watch, and Arnold looked at his watch. Thirty seconds. The idea should be
She’s out now. He flicked the remote control again.

Nothing happened.

Arnold's jaw dropped. He closed the gap, then pulled it back. However, nothing happens. fluent
He has sweat on his face.

"What's wrong?" January said.

"Oh hell," Arnold said. Next, remember to put on the seat belt.
Before the power is restored. He cut out the three strips and reattached them with that.
Good page. Then he took a deep breath and made a powerful thrust.

The city lights are bright. that

The computer rang. leaves;

mind.

"Thank God," Arnold said. He faces the head of security. There are pages.
screen:


Gennaro reaches for his phone, but it’s dead. There was no surprise this time - nothing.
"what is this?"

"Give me a moment," Arnold said. "After the upgrade, all system settings must be reset."
line manually." The worker was soon back at work.

"why?" January said.

"Will you let me work for Jesus?"

Wu said, "The system is not designed to connect. So if it does connect, it hurts
There’s a problem somewhere. You have to start everything manually, otherwise with
Somewhere along the line, the system starts up, turns on, divides, and drops.
Again, in an infinite loop.

"All right," Arnold said. "going to ."

Genaro grabbed his phone, started dialing, and paused.

"Jesus, don't you see," he said. He pointed to a video clip.

But Arnold didn’t listen, looking at the map where the dots
the ball begins to move in a straight line. It moves quickly, in the direction of gravity.

"What's going on?" January said.

"Ducks," Arnold said quietly. "They made the balance."


The ducks moved rapidly, their long fins moving together;
And they screamed, the kids screamed and tried to stay a foot away. Animals raise large calves.
Lightning clouds. Grant couldn’t see the guard.

Fingers flapping.

Still holding onto Lex, he and Tim sprinted up a hill in enormous arms. And he ran.
It was weird, they felt the ground shake beneath their feet. As the animals approached, they called
It’s as deafening to the ears as plane noise at an airport. It filled the air and touched their ears. Lexi screamed.
But, for one thing, he couldn’t hear the screams when he stepped on the rocks,
They added the mushrooms.

Grant had bigger feet than a prehistoric Hadrosaurus, he had more weight than any animal .
Five tons, and then he was in the air and couldn’t see anything. heart
Display of large body, large feet, pain cries when attacking the animal and
notice. A bear threw a rock, flew past them, and then left the field.

Through the black skies, they could see nothing but rocks. They meet each other.
Listen to the sounds and sounds of the South. Lexi knew Nya's name.
Her chest was on Grant’s chest.

Another Henderson smashed his hand against the stones, leaving a trail of blood. extend
He waited until the sound of fighting came from his left, then joined the boy.
He started climbing a big tree. They climbed up quickly, seizing bodies like rats .
They covered themselves with dust. Walking about twenty feet, Lex caught Grant.


And he didn’t want to go far. Tim was shocked too, and Grant thought there were a lot. through
ground, they can see animal movements as far as they can walk.
Grant leaned back against the wooden frame, lay back on the bed and closed his eyes.
And he will take it.


Arnold shakes the camera as the animals walk away. He slowly cleared his throat. He looked at her.
Hadrosaurs passed by and tyrannosaurs stayed behind, meaning
He had committed a murder. Samson was at the water. Arnold looked at the video camera.
"Muldoon you better go and see how bad it is," he said.

"I'll take it," Gennard said, leaving the room.


park


And that this is like a flame in a flame. Something warm and black pressed against Grant’s forehead.
He opened his eyes and saw a large tower of skulls. The head is placed in the locked door.
Like potato faces. The eyes on the back of the lobster moth are round and brown.
n cow. The bay door opened and Grant sat eating his hands. fluent
He saw big footsteps in his classroom. Tails pulled back and the beast relaxed.

Hadrosaurus means bear. It was interesting to see it up close. epic; all
There were several species of dinosaurs that grazed the ground and these worked like livestock. and
Despite its size, the piece was bold and powerful, and Grant didn’t disappoint. stay
From where he is on the tree trunk, he tells her to fly and watches her eat.

What surprised Grant was that there were a few references to the monster:
Probably Mysore, from Late Cretaceous Montana. And John Horner, please
He was the first person to describe different soil types. Myshaur has a round head, which is
Face is wooden. Her name means beautiful lady, thought to protect the mayasaurs.
The eggs persist until the young are born and can fend for themselves.

Grant hears a noise and her left side twitches. He turned to look.
The young Hadrosor threw himself at the old man's feet. The baby is black and white.
bar. The old man bowed his head and waited, motionless, for the boy to wake up.
He puts his hind legs and forelegs on his mother’s head and eats the strips.
from the beach side.

The mother waits patiently until her baby finishes feeding and everything falls to the ground .
Four more, and the voice was back in Grant’s direction.

The hadrosaurus was still squatting just a few meters away. Grant took a moment away from the two.
Air hole at the end of the frame. The dinosaur can’t detect Grant’s scent. so
Although the ghost was staring at him for some reason, Henderson didn't answer.

He remembered seeing it the night before. Grant said.
on a test.

He sniffed.

Suddenly the Hadrosaur stopped, suddenly the massive head was no longer rubbing at its tail. except
He walked forward, searching for the source of the noise. Then, after a while, when he decided .
There is no danger, the creature begins to forget.

Strange, Grant thought.

Sitting up in his arms, Lex opened his eyes and said, "Hey, what was that?"

The Hadrosaurus yelled, the loud Portuguese that scared Lexus and made
He fell from the tree. Hadrasa lifted his hat from the tree, placed it on his head, and spoke again.

"Don't worry," Tim said from around the corner.

And the child cried, and ran to his mother's feet, and came to Harozor.
amusing. His mother raised her head and asked the tree, Grant it was.
Lex sat down. The dinosaur has the shape of a smiling face.

You didn't like it? Lex said.

"No," Grant said. "He was just afraid of her."

"Well," Lex said, "Are you going to let us make water or what?"

Hadrozor writes to the police. He picked it up again. and Grant in
impression He was trying to confuse them. But of course, Kanba didn't know.


purpose. He found it disgusting and disgusting. They wait a minute or so.
the hadrosaur approached the figure again, rubbing his eyes in thought. Obviously, going
Start eating.

"You're right," Lex said. "I don't live here." He started climbing the branches. along
Walking away, Hadrosaur posted a new message.

Grant was great. He thought he wouldn’t see us pass. And a minute later
We almost forgot we were here. This looks like another example of Tyransaurus
Amphibious optical fibers. Canine studies have shown that water sources are invariant, e.g.
Beetles. If someone isn’t moving, they don’t see it. It was like the same thing.
Dinosaurs.

Anyway, it looks like Mayasaurus found these tree markers
How encouraging that is. She put her son in the backyard and promptly fell asleep. It saves time.
Once, and look at them perfect.

They reached the bottom of it. Lex shook his head. Both children kissed goodbye.
dirty. The entire forest was engulfed around them. There are red blood cells.
smell.

Grant looked at his watch. "Well, let's go boys," he said.

"No," Leake said. "I'm not going here."

"We have to do it."

"why?"

"Sure," Grant said, "we should tell them about the island. Unless they want to see us."
In creating a part, we have to go all the way alone. It's just a process.

"Why shouldn't we take the train?" Tim said.

Which team?

Tim pointed to the makeshift makeup room where they had been for so long.
evening. He was 20 yards from the fence. "| I saw a ship here," he said.

Grant immediately recognized the benefits. It was now about one o'clock. they
There were about eight miles to go. If they had taken the boat to the other side of the river, it would have been more
Rapid growth worldwide. "We're going to do it," Grant said.


Arnold went into video search mode and saw scanners flying all over the place.
park, with pictures changing every two seconds. I was tired of being seen, but definitely.
Sal sees Nedry's Jeep and Muldoon decides to do it. is released with
Genaro looked at the people, but now it was too late and he wanted to find the car. fluent
He wants weapons.

His phone rang. "Mr. Arnold, can I tell you something, okay?" fluent

And Hammon. It sounded like the word of God.

"Do you want to come here, Mr. Hammond?"

"No, Mr. Arnold," said Hammond. "Come with me. I'm in the genetics lab with Dr. Wu. We're
I’m waiting for you.

Arnold took a deep breath and turned to the cameras.


Grant was thrown into the hallway. He gave five gallons.
Four buckets, ignition, Jeep tires, air tires;
Hundreds of kilograms of earth, weight, motor oil, tools
Lights and lights.

"| You don't see a cloud."

"Keep going."

Cast cement, copper pipe, plaster .. . The two plastic holes are held together by metal screws.
The environment is not a wall.

"All right," he said, "but where's the pool?" "fluent

You have to be here somewhere,” Tim said.

"Did you see the wall?"

"No, | I just thought you were here."


Among Grant’s cluttered drawers, he couldn’t find the key. But he found a lot of plans and went back u
He hangs it on a metal hook in the wall, giving you his thoughts.
At the bottom, a beast appeared. He looked at them for a long time.

"I stand... .""Just

minutes."

These maps contain detailed information about the original parts of the island they are currently on.
It thus reduced the valley to the previously overlooked river, which became a .
At the end of the day. . . as do the birds. . . and within half a mile of distance.

He filled out the form. How do we get to the hotel? According to the number, there are
Maybe there was a door in the basement where they were. Grant looked up, saw it and shrugged it off.
in the ceiling fan. The gate is too wide for the car. When he opened the door, he saw a
Stop by the lake. The road was buried underground and not
Light from above. It’s a different way of working. and he went to the seashore.
And the most noticeable feature of the ship is the RAFT STORAGE.

"Hey," Tim said, "look at that." He gives Grant a gun.

Opening it, Grant finds a compressed air cannon and a bulletproof leather clip. Six years.
stitches in all directions, each the size of your fist. Its configuration is MORO709.

"Good job Timmy." He fastened the belt around his neck with his handcuffs tucked into his belt.

"A flying bomb?"

"I'd say so."

“How’s dad?” Lex said.

“I think he was at the top of the mountain,” Grant said. They started walking down the street. Grant took the train he was supposed to catch.
shoulder. "I'm glad it's a big hole," Lex said, "because | I don’t swim very well”.

"Don't worry," he said.

"Maybe we can catch fish," he said.

They were walking along the road, and water was coming up from two wells.
They heard a noise, but Grant couldn't tell where it was coming from.

"Do you think there's a hole in here?" Lex said, frowning.

"Okay," Grant said.

The noise continued as they walked, but they also heard noises.
market in When they finally reached the end of the small street,
Grant was positively shocked.

There's a Tyrant here.

They sit in the shade of a tree with their legs in front of them. Eyes
It was open but only slowly moving;
noise. The sound of passing water clouds blinded him and
His throat was swollen and his mouth was bleeding and the carcass of a slain Hadrosaurus lay under his chin.
Thermansaurus.

Tiranasara is divided into twelve districts. Grant was sure he saw it, but he
The dragon didn't answer him. He just sat there. It took him a moment to realize: Tyransaurus had
asleep. I was exhausted, but I struggled.

He tells Tim and Leica to stay where they are. Grant walked briskly forward.
dock, in full tyrannosaur face. The old man was still asleep, stirring gently.

Near the end of the bridge, the wood is painted green to blend in with the pebbles. extend
She opened the door and looked out. Half a dozen orange slices were eating on it.
A wall, some boards, some iron, and two mana cubes remain
below. Columns are encrypted in pairs.

raft.

Lex snarled again. fluent

Mouth: No date, he shakes his head.

Yes.

Tyransaurus raised his hand to rub his tail beside his neck. But not so
He didn't move. Grant brings down a cube from the mountain. He was surprised at how smooth it was. fluent
He removes the springs and gets a cylindrical image. With a flick of a wheel, the machine started moving, and
And with his smile! Open to the vehicle. They are very expensive.
ear.


Grant paused and looked at the dinosaur.

Tyransaurus snarled and snarled. He started to leave. Grant tries to escape, but he
The mouse sighed and leaned against the tree trunk and stood up.
Scream, scream.

Lex frowned and rubbed his hand over his face.

Grant was burned for treason in the crime. He moves the kitchen to the other side of the kitchen. fluent
He fell into the water with a thud.

The dinosaur was still asleep.

Grant tied the boat to the dock, went back to the deck and fired both guns. fluent
Put them in the bag, then reach out and pull the babies out of the bag.

Hesitating, Lex lowered his hands, no, lowered them.

Raises his hand: Yes.

The transavari was still asleep.

Grant tosses him into the air with a kick. Lex came running over, and gave her a kiss.
He arrives on a bicycle; Then Tim came in. They both got dressed. Grant comes in and runs around.
The boat floats down river. Grant took his briefcase and held it out.
ship. They fled to the mountain.

Lex sat up and breathed out in frustration. Then he felt like flying, and thanked
be. He clenched his body, in a low voice: trying to breathe.

She always strikes an attack at the wrong time!

"Lex," Tim said, turning back to the river.

He shook his head violently and shook his head. He knew what she meant: change.
That voice. He just needed one drink. Grant drove the truck and Tim rode aboard.
He reached the table and shook his hand.

Lex pulls away tightly and smiles. To Tim's ears, the sound bounced off the water as
Weapons.

Tyransaurus laughed hysterically and rubbed its head with its puppy-like claws. fluent
He shook his head again. He was very tired after the big meal and got up quickly.

On the boat, Lex makes a little noise. “Lex;

Shut up!" Tim said.

"| I can't give it up," he said quietly, then sighed again. Grant works on the boat to get the boat moving.
He jumped into the riverbank.

Deep in the river, the Tyransaurus returns.

"| I can't talk, Tim!" Lexi shouted. I didn't!

"Chch!"

Grant steered the ship as best he could.

"It's fine," she said. "We were very careful. He couldn't go into the water."

"It really sucks, bastard!" Tim shouted. Down the river, Tiranapur
He jumped out of the boat and jumped into the water. He followed them to the water.

« Well, how do | recognize ? She said.

"Everyone knows dragons are weird! It's in every book! After all, all animals are weird!"

"Laws are bad."

"Yes, death is possible. Damn!"

"Stop," Grant said. Get some! Grant looked at the Trancer.
It looks like a spinning dog. The tyransaurus jumped into the water, but jumped
Its huge head hit the ground, and Grant knew the animal couldn't move, and it collapsed.
in part, because after a while only the eyes and nose came from the top of the head
above. Meanwhile he looks like a duck and walks like a duck, changing his body
The tail moved and moaned, the water splashing behind it. Above, Grant is the boss
The ground, and his teeth were all over the place, like he had cracked their heads a few times.

He thinks as happily as a squirrel. The crab is the largest in the world.

"I'm so sorry, Dr. Grant!" Lex shouted. I don't want it!

Grant looked over his shoulder. Here, the depth is no more than ten feet.
And they get to the center. If allowed, the water level will continue to rise.
Tyransaurus could also swim and dive in shallow water. extend
He turned the boat around and started walking south.


"what are you doing?"

The tyrannosaurus was only a few yards away. Grant heard her breathing.
As he got closer. Grant looked at the blades in his hands, but they were dull.
All shots.

Tyransaurus threw back its head, opened its mouth, and showed its sharp claws.
and, with a shrug of his shoulders, he went on board the boat, which was a wreck;
The big head bent over, and the water gushed out over the side of the pool.

The Tyrannosaurus struck back, leaving ridges behind. The island is still there. Lex
He clenched his fists and looked down.

Is it in your mouth?

"No," Grant said. He saw bubbles - and a small fire hovering near the mountain -

"attention!" He screamed as his head hit the bottom of the rubber mat, turned the boat around and took off.
He was in the air, catching their attention before disappearing again.

Do something! Alex shouted. Do something!

Grant gets the air piston out of his pocket. It looked so small in his hand, but he had
It can kill the germ in the uncomfortable place around the eyes and mouth.

Tyransaurus appeared at the side of the mountain, opened its mouth, and roared. Grant turned around and
taken. The guard glittered in the light, twitching its tail. Tyransaurus shook his head.
And he gave it back to me.

Suddenly, they hear a noise coming from the water nearby.

As a result, Grant saw the young T-Rex on the shoreline and noticed that the sauropod had been killed.
He said it was his fault. The young man cleared his throat, then shook his head.
he shouted. The Giant Tyrannosaurus saw it too, and had the same response - back to
Take care of the attack and go to the other side of the river.

He was walking! Lex sighed and folded his arms. "I'm staring! Nhnnn-
I don't߹ Fucking dinosaur!

From the shore, the young man shouted in disgust. In shock, the Giant Tyransaurus retreated
the lagoon in all its glory, with its rise out of the bay to the mountains above the sea.
The boy shook his head and ran, his belly full of precious flesh.

The dragon jumped and ran to the dead bear’s feet and climbed down the hill. they
He heard her throat tightening.
Lagoon, by the river.

Too tired to keep going, Grant slipped and hurt his leg. He could barely catch his breath.
He was in heaven and he fell.

"Are you alright, Dr. Grant?" Lex asked.

"From now on, what are you going to do | Shall I tell you?"

"Ohkay," he said, like he was asking the dumbest question in the world.
He kept his hand in the water for a moment. "You missed the train," he said.

"I'm tired," Grant said.

"So how are we doing?"

Grant sat down. It was that good. The ship was slowly moving eastward. "Now it should be." that
The metro took them to the hotel in the afternoon. He looked at his watch and sighed.
Fifteen minutes past seven. Only 15 minutes had passed since he left.
Your lecture. So two hours.

Grant put it back on the keyboard and closed his eyes and went back to sleep.


The fifth step.


"The problems in the system are getting worse now."
Ian Malcolm
search


Genaro sat in the jeep, listened to the roar of the sea lions, and looked out over the tall palm trees.
The trees shook with the flames. He was surprised by what looked like a war zone: a forest.
There are a hundred meters in all directions. A huge tree fell.
soil. There’s a big pool of blood in the grass and rocks to k
good.

Sitting down next to him, Mildred said "It doesn't look so good. Rex was in the middle of a Hadrosaurus." fluent
He took another bottle of whiskey and gulped it down slowly. "It's fast-paced," he said.

They wait and see.

Gennaro slammed his fist on the table. What are we waiting for?

The mayor did not immediately respond. "There's Rex here somewhere," she said, smiling .
The country in the morning. "And none of our weapons are powerful enough."

"We're in the jeep."

"Oh, he's driving in the Jeep, Mr. Gennard," Mildred said with a frown. "When are we going
On this route and inland all we could do in four laps was thirty-four miles
An hour. It drags us down. No problem." Mud shrugged. "But | I don't know much.
I'm going now. Are you willing to go through those challenges?

"All right," Genaro said.

Muldoon started the engine, and with a whimper, the two little Otniellia
Sugar is made of wood. Muldoon gave me his car. He walked in a circle.
He finds the window, goes inside, and climbs some walls all the way to the bottom.
And he came to a place where the young men of Othniel were. Then he got out and left.
Keep walking through the woods, away from the jeep. When he stopped, a cloud appeared high in the sky.

"What's that?" Jinaru said.

"Get the radio," Mud said.

Genaro got out of the Jeep and walked towards her. Even from a distance, it can
The powdered dust dries quickly. He saw something black in the grass with blood on it and knew
Askew.

"The son of a Hadrosaurus," Mildred said, looking at Suri. "Everybody go."
And the kid got scared and a Trex attacked him.

"How do you know?" January said. The meat was cut into strips.

"You can tell the difference," Mildred said. "See that white thing in the grass?"
Hadro spores. Uric acid goes yellow. But you can see it here”-he pointed to a big hill.
He rubs his tail in the grass- "It's the tail of a tyrannosaur."

How do you know Tire came later?

"It's incredible," Mildred said. "Have you seen those children?" He pointed at the bird.
"These are for autism. These syringes aren't bloody. Death syringes are for snakes."
Otis did. But Hadro landed with a chip on his shoulder - you can see the huge scar
That, beyond its stunning, is Trex, no question.

Genaro looked at his body and looked at his feet.
It's not true. Next to him, Muldoon turned on his radio. "ride. "

"Yeah," John Arnold radioed.


"We found another dead Hadra. Minor." Muldoon sat among the branches, watching.
The skin on the back of the foot. There was a number that read, "Book is number HD/09."

The radio crackled. "I have something for you," Arnold said.

"Oh? What's that?"

"|He found Nedra."


The Jeep went through the thicket on the east side of the narrow road.
career path, which leads to career in the woods. This part of the park was hot and very wooded.
and fetid their surroundings. Muldoon looks at Gibb’s computer, which is now
He showed the location map of social media. "They got it on surveillance video," she said .
said. "Scott 1104 is right in front of you."

Further down the road, Gennaro sees a ditch, a jeep pulling up beside it. "fluent
It could have gone the wrong way,” Muldon said. "A little boy."

What did he bring? Jinaru asked.

"Wu said five apprentices. Do you know what that means?"

Genaro shook his head.

"Somewhere between two and ten thousand," Mildred said. He shook his head. "It's a lot."

As they got closer, Janrod saw the body standing next to the car. The body is not black and
Green – but then the usual greens disappeared, as did the Jeep.

“They are leaders,” Muldoon said. "The commissioners got it,"

Twelve Prochomygnathidae have been distinguished, which are small birds larger than ducks.
Out of the bushes, shouting in excitement, the men emerged from the car.

Dennis Nedry had been sprayed on his head, shoulders and back. The dogs are gone.
His mouth opened and his mouth agape. His body is destroyed - the throat of the snare, a
His feet are ready to go. Genaro froze for a moment, looking at the dwarves worriedly.
Their hind legs are slightly bent, facing the crowd. There are dinosaurs.
Five feet, he gave. Wash their eyes and mouth and give them a scrub.
The best-

"I'm skeptical," said Mildred. "We don't have time for the committee."

"than?"

Mildred shook her head. Do you see the pattern? In his clothes and face? You put on makeup.
Does it smell like old dark smoke?

Genaro frowned. He sniffed.

"It stinks," Muldoon said. "Dilophosares don't exist. You see the problem
The approaches, all black. In our eyes, painful but not deadly. You have about two hours to wash it off.
Get out with the guns; We take care of everything around the park when we can. If it doesn’t mean that this
bastard. They demolished him, cut him in half, viciously. It's okay.
There are monsters in the world, after all."

procompsognatbids screamed and jumped up and down as Genora opened the front door
At the entrance you’ll find a metal barrier and a metal box. "Everything is still there," he said. fluent
He gave Gennaro two black pills.

"what is this?" January said.

"That's how good they are," Muldon said. "Coins." When Genaro returned he said;
You don’t want to miss anything.

Genaro rubbed his thumb against Nedry's thigh. Muldoon took the rock and went to the other Jeep;
And put it in the middle. Get in the back of the van. "going to."

"How is he?" Genaro said, pointing at his chest.

"How is he?" Mildred said. "We've got things to do." He drove the car. I'm searching.
In the distance, Genaro sees cars start to slow down. One jumped up and landed on Nedra’s shoulder.
He opened his mouth and licked the flesh of her lips.


Forest cover has been reduced. The plates on both sides are hinged to prevent the installation of jewelry and debris.
These face forward and block the sun. Tim hears birds chirping and he
Little dinosaurs walk through the trees. But soon the air grew hot;
Under the shade of a tree.

Grant looked at his watch. It was eight in the morning.


They walk in peace in the light. If so, it looks like
It’s moving faster than ever before. She had just woken up and Grant was sitting on his back looking at the trees.
Head to head. Just then, he saw his wife awake.

"Hey, what are you doing?" She said.

Do you think it is safe to eat these foods? He gestured to the trees. Some would say
His lips seemed to burn to the touch. Tim looked at the red marks on her hands.

"No," Grant said.

why? Little dinosaurs eat them. It shows baby dinosaurs moving.
Leaves.

"No, Lexi."

He was happy, unhappy with his health. "| I wish my father were here," she said. "always
He knows what he’s doing.”

"What are you talking about?" Tim said. "He didn't know what he was doing."

"Yes, he has," she whispered. Lex watched the trees move, their roots moving
Underwater. "Because it wasn't a follow-up . . ."

Tim smiled and said nothing.

"But don't worry, you look good too, Dad. Even when you're on computers and in locker rooms."

"My mom was an athlete," Tim explained to Grant.

Grant shook his head. In the branches of the trees a few small green birds moved.
There was laughter and more laughter. They had a cherry topper. "Do you know what they're called?" Tim said.
"Microsertube."

“He’s huge,” Leake said.

"|I think you're right."

"Only kids care about dinosaurs," he said.

"Who is it?"

"Sir."

Tim starts crying, but Grant comforts his friend. "The children," he said, "screamed."

"why?" Lex said, "|You can do what | I want, if-"

Then he smiled because he heard it too. The noise is coming from somewhere.
five.


So, where was Rex? Mildred asked, speaking into the radio. “We don’t really know.
See here." They were also at the edge of Sarpodah, overlooking the burning forest .
This is where the Hadrosurians lived. The Tyrannosaurus was nowhere to be seen.

"I see now," Arnold said and smiled.

Muldoon is furious with Genaro. "I see you now," she said quietly. "Why don't you
Have you tried it? Why didn't he try?'

"|I don't know," Janari said.

“It doesn’t show,” Arnold said after a moment.

What does that mean he didn’t show?

"Not on cameras. Motion sensors don't connect."

"Hell," Mildred said. "Most of it is awful. Have you seen Grant and the boys?"

"The slow movements are incredible."

"Well, what do we do now?" Mildred said.

"Relax," Arnold said.


look! look!

In front of them, a large pair of birds flew overhead. Grant had only seen him once.
clingy; Now he realized it started four miles or more away. example
Zedis’s feet glowed black and his first instinct was that the glass must
It weighs a ton. Then, when they got closer, he saw that there was no glass, only glass. fine threads.
and he hid himself in their land.

"That didn't happen," Lex said.

"|I think that's it," Grant said.

"That's why all the birds fly away."

"If they're big birds," Grant said.


The river runs through the mountains. They stare at the ceiling. Now they
In the bathroom, you can still hit the floor. Except for a few minutes.
If we don’t see it in isolation. Grant said, "|I remember there was a second bedroom .
Here." Shortly thereafter he purchased a home in the woods on the west end.

Do you want to go? Tim said.

"Maybe it's the phone. Or some kind of scam." Grant walked after him. "We should try
To access the Control Center. Time is running out.

They’re out of the water, rolling across the choppy water, and Grant blows the boat out of the water.
Then he tied the rope to a tree, and they went out into a thick forest of Indian trees.


vehicle;


«|I just don't get it,» John Arnold said over the phone. “It's not Ricky, and |
Also, you can’t go anywhere with Grant or the kids.

He sat down in front of the consoles and took another cup of coffee. All around, the government.
The house was covered in piles and stains of perfectly cooked sandwiches. Arnold paused. I was
Saturday at 8:00 a.m. Fourteen hours since Nedry had switched off the computer.
In Jurassic Park , Arnold patiently repeats scenes, one after another. "The whole bar
The units became active and worked properly. Phones work. I called the doctor.
you."

On the other side of the fence, Malcolm looked uncomfortable. Arnold talks to her in her room.
Manic. "But is there a problem with the motion sensors?"

«Well, I didn't | What I’m looking for”.

"Like Rex?"

"There was no hunger today. He started at dawn, about twenty minutes ago, and went
on the wedding day, then | It was destroyed. | I don’t know why, but I always sleep.

"But shouldn't it be Grant and the kids?"

"I don't."

"I think it's cool," Malcolm said. "Social relationships create a safe haven."

"It's not going away?" Arnold rubbed his eyes. "Closing two ninety-"

«Ninety-two per cent of the world, | Remember,” Malcolm said. But if you show others.
Places on Earth, | Consider that you will find that eight percent is a reasonable percentage, such as
that these parts are important. Today, the animal can roam anywhere in the park.
Exploring streams, forests, rivers and waters.
anything."

"Still," said Arnold, "the animals don't have the brains to feel it."

"I don't know how animals are suffering," Malik said.

What do you think Grant and the boys are doing? Arnold said.

"Not now," Malcolm said, charging again. "Grant wasn't an engineer. He really wanted to be
Ask him and he will tell you. The woman and her children hide from the motion projects they see. But you can
They have other problems that we don’t know about. or they are in the river, chij.

"|Don't wait for them to get to the river. The reefs are tight. You can't swim in the
there."

"Are you going to take the question all the way here?"

"Yes, but this isn't the best way, because it crosses birds…."

Why not flying birds? Malcolm said.

"We have a problem with that assumption. First, the park was just a forest of trees .
Built on land, travelers can see the glaciers from a different perspective. we
Four species of dactyls have been identified among birds now - yes, they are cearadactyles, the dactyls eat a lot of livestock.

How are they?

"Well, when we were building the house, we put the ducks in the chicken coop to train them. But they
This is a big problem. Turns out our plants are soil.

"Directory?"

"Tough ground," Arnold said. They fight each other over territory and fight
"All the other animals that come around will hear it."

"attack?"


"That's fine," Arnold said. “The fowls of the air flap their wings, and .
leap. A 30-pound dog will knock a man to the ground like a brick. they
The workers were beaten and forced to wave their guns.

Are your pipes not damaged?

"It's not like that."

"So if the children are among the birds.. ."

"Not them," Arnold said. "At least, I don't think so."


"Is that Lori?" Lex said. "What a leaf."

Beneath the bird sanctuary, Peteratops Lodge is built high in the treetops .
pylons, at the base of the tree. But the house is unfinished and unpainted; that
The doors are open. The trees and house were decorated with white flowers.

"I thought they didn't do anything," Grant said, hiding his disappointment. fluent
He looked at his watch. "Let's go back to the store."

The sun rose as they walked, and the morning was beautiful. He looked at Grant.
A glass view of the wall from the dome above saw that the floor was
The edges are displayed in a white box as
room. And the smell wafts through the morning air.

"It smells bad in here," Lex said. "What do you mean all white?"

"It's like a feeder. It's good for the birds."

Why didn’t they get rid of Lorraine?

"|I don't know."

They entered a grassy meadow covered with grass. They heard a voice.
Then the horn rang, coming from across the forest.

"What's that?" "I don't

expert."

Then Grant notices a dark cloud over the tree. long
I'll go slowly. Soon he ordered their arrest. He looked up and saw that it was very dark.
They float the sky.

"Yes!" Lex said. "Apthridactic?" "Yes,"

Tim said.

Grant didn’t answer. He was a good shooter, getting around in the air. above
Over their heads, the pterodactyl emits a tail and makes a beautiful sound, moving towards them.

How can you not walk down the street? Tim said.

Grant thinks so. Flying dinosaurs are beautiful and cute.
He was floating in the air. When Grant looked up, he saw a second bird in the sky.
The third and fourth.

"Maybe it's because they didn't finish the block," Leake said.

Grant thought that the woodpeckers were not unusual. Too big. Should
Cearadactyls, large flying reptiles of the Early Cretaceous age. If it was at the bottom, it would
Like small airplanes. As they were descending, he saw winged creatures with five feet tall.
Its body is black and its head is like a spear. they ate f of it. North America and
Mexico.

Lex opened his eyes and looked up. Can they harm us?

"|Don't worry. I eat fish."

A figure crawls on the ground, and a black shadow screams at you and the police.
The hot air and the smell of smoke.

"nice!" Lex said. "They're really great." And he said, you think they shouldn’t harm us?

"dump."

The second layer goes through the process more slowly than the first. He came right back and did it.
in front of their heads. Grant shrugged and rubbed his body. It means a great deal.
Bat, he thought. But the animals looked at Grant strangely. Their mother
The wings are attached – black feathers are attached to it – so it’s a bit of a camouflage.
Everything supports Ducts.

"letter!" Lex screams and grabs him by the hair. But he sent me! "fluent

What?" Grant said.


"He shot me! He shot me!" When he lifted his body, he saw blood on his hands.

Upstairs, two more Doctors grab their wings and land in little tables
He fell to the ground. They managed to yell as they ran downstairs.

"series!" Grant said holding their hands. They played each other and.
With a smile, he jumped to the ground one last time, and lifted the children
They came down after the two dogs that were riding them, flapping their wings. extend
He felt like he had the boot on his back.

Then he got up, picked up the Lexus, ran with Tim a few steps ahead and .
Two more birds circled overhead, chirping. Finally, the
He throws the children to the ground, and the darkness grows deeper and deeper.

"Uck," Lex said, annoyed. He noticed that the birds were white.

Grant jumped to his feet. "series!"

As he was about to escape, Lex screamed in terror. He gasped and saw something.
The dactyls were holding the lid with their thick claws. Animals with many wings are skin;
It sparkled in the sunlight and split in two. The doctor tried to revive him.
But Lex was too heavy, and as he struggled, he hit his head several times with his body.
The back of his head.

Lex yelled and threw his arms around in excitement. Grant did exactly what he was trying to do. fluent
He leapt forward, turned, and threw himself upon the Duke's body. He threw it away.
His head hit the ground and landed on his body. The beast cried out;
Grant lifted his head from her mouth and rolled onto his back when a voice whispered to him.
body. It was like being in a tent in a storm. He could not see; He could not stand; I was
Nothing but screaming and yelling and pulling at clothes. The legs are dry.
in front of his head. Lex shouted. Grant threw himself on Dactyl and screamed.
And recoiled when he changed lanes and tried to turn around. Finally, he gave up.
His wings like the wings of a lion flapped and he flew up and started walking down the street.
He stopped immediately.

He can even walk on his wings! Lederer was right! But there are other doctors.
Thinking of them, Grant is shocked and helpless, in horror watching Lex walk away, the
Hands on head. . . Tim shouted in the background. . . .

The first of them fell to the ground and struck something with a blow.
And she will suck. The other tables soon moved up, following the first floor. The fourth
Dactyl flies through the air to join the others. Grant looked up and saw.
What happened. The three doctors asked first, shouting angrily.

They were the only ones on the show. "than

good? Grant said.

“They got my glove,” Leake said. "Daryl's part of the farm."

They started walking again. Tim put his hand on his shoulder. "Are you okay?"

"Yeah, it's bad," he said, smiling. He stared at the ceiling. "|I hope they hurt to death,"
She said.

"Yeah," Tim said. "me too-"

The ships are at sea. Grant looked at his watch. Thirty-eight. fluent
He now had two and a half hours to get back.


Lex shouted as they passed the dome of the Silver Eagle. Then, in 1990, the road closed.
On either side, the forest meets the river. The river is smaller than it looks, in some ways.
The holes were ten feet deep, and the water was gushing. Lexi reached over and took their hands.
They seem to pass.

Grant sat on the boat and listened to the gunfire. they
They walked for a while, and now the tree branches passed. It's beautiful. fluent .
A cool breeze passed between the charred trees, shifting. And that means taking
A lot of time.

It wasn't much, but it was many kilometers.
sauropod where they spend their days. Maybe four or five miles. It can be a lot.
This means they only have an hour drive from the hotel once they get off the ship. But then


aviary, Grant did not hesitate to reverse the process. Now they are doing better
schedule.

"| I wonder how Ralph is," Lex said. "You could die or something."

"nice."

"| I thought you'd let me take it." He loved sleeping under the sun. "It'll be fun to run
Ralph.

Tim says to Grant, "Remember the Stegosaurus?"

"Yes."

Why are you asking them about stem cell DNA?

"It's for our health," Grant said. “They couldn’t explain why dinosaurs lived
Because they’re playing, and because they’re all women.

"good."

"Well, radiation is dangerous and harmless. I think it's safe."
shown here. But there’s still the problem of being a dinosaur. How can they survive
When will all the women come?

"Okay," Tim said.

"No, in the whole animal kingdom, being gay is a bad thing."

"Tim is very passionate," Lex said.

None of them are the same. “For instance, most animals take care of themselves,” says Grant .
If we can’t have contact. The male releases sperm containing
Lion, woman will kill him next time. This change is insignificant.
There are a lot more physiological differences between men and women than you might expect. People are
Women pay more attention to animal names than humans.

Tim shook his head. "What about the monsters?"

Grant hears a rustling sound in the trees above as the Micro-rtotopes disappear in a panic.
The leaves are moving. To the left the massive head of Tyransaurus sticks out of a tree trunk.
Bags are used on board. Lex screamed in shock and Grant ran to the side.
But the lake here is only ten feet deep. Tyrannosaurus imprisoned in an anatomical cage
He turned his head and screamed. Then he tilted his head back.

Among the trees by the river they saw a huge black Tyransaurus.
He heads south, seeking a place in the trees along the shore. All subservices are
He walked over to the other side, where he was yelling, screaming and jumping up and down. on
Raft, Grant, Timothy, and Lexus were on the battlefield when the Tyransaurus tried to attack again, but
There are many trees along the river. The tyrannosaurus shifted again.
Back on the bathroom floor, he tried again, threads flapping.

However, this was not always the case.

Then he went downstairs. "am

I love it,” Leake said.

Grant sat in the boat, very confused. If you lose a Tyransaurus, you
Nothing could save them. The river was calm and small.
ship. It was like being in a cave. Rubber bands litter the side like anchor.
She was driven by a wave.

He looked at his watch. Nine close. The ship sank.

"Hey," Lex said, "Listen!"

He heard a voice, among many noises. Screams were coming from outside.
Legal, down river. He listened, and heard their voices again.

"What's that?" Lex said.

"|I don't know," Grant said. "But there's more than one." He took the train to
Up on the beach, he struck a lighthouse to anchor. His voice trembles again. And the more they get angry.

"Like a mouse trap," Tim said.


Malcolm shouted. Isn’t it Middle East time?
"Not yet," Ellie said.
Malcolm sighed. How much water do we have here?
"| I don't know. There's too much glass water-"
"No, | I mean, how many? One?"


Eli raised his hand. "nothing."

"Go to the rooms on this floor," said Malcolm, "and fill up the buckets with you."

Ellie rolled her eyes.

"And," said Malcolm, "shall we have a fire? A lamp? Aluminum? Stern fuses?"
Are they his seed?”

"I'm looking for everything. Do you think it's a wall?"

"That's kind of it," Malcolm said. The Malcolm effect represents a dramatic shift.

“And Arnold says all systems are working properly.”

"That's about it," Malcolm said.

Ellie said, "You don't think much of Arnold, do you?"

"So. The. Shop. Uh like that. You two. Not
advice. What they have | Call it 'idea'. They are looking for that now. I think
It's smart and it's called 'focusing'. He wasn’t on the side. No
effect. That’s how you get a team like this. It comes from the right mindset. Because you
It is impossible to make an animal undetectable. To escape. But they
Don't look at her.

Don't you think it's just human nature? Ellie said.

"God no," Malcolm said. "That's why we say that coffee and saba in the morning are people."
nature. It's not like that. It’s just western culture, for many parts of the world.
I was just thinking about it." He rubbed his eyes sadly. "Morphine makes a philosopher."

Do you want water?

"No. I'll tell you the problem with engineers and scientists. There's an easier way to
Bad talk about how they are trying to find out the truth about the country. Yes, but no
which separates them. No one comes close to things like 'search for truth'.

"Scientists are worried. So they wonder if
They can do anything. They don’t stop to ask if they need to do something. People are wicked.
It should be noted that these numbers are not critical. If they don’t, someone else will. knowledge,
Dale, it’s not good. So they just tried to do that first. That’s what it’s all about in science. Even pure science
Teaching is a problem. They are doing a strong job and sharing
A world beyond that. Particle accelerators heat the soil and expel exhaust gases. local
Throw food at the moon. There is still evidence that scientists are there to work .
Discoveries. Research is always part of the world. always.

"Scientists want this. They need to put their energies into it. They need to go
Their symbol. They just can’t see it. They can’t just say thank you. They just can’t get into the body.
narrative. They have to do something incredible. That’s the job of a scientist, and now
Some of their group want to be scientists.

Ellie said, "Don't expect him to grow up-."

What will one of your families do after a year?

"That's right," he said.

Can’t you always imagine a world outside your dreams?

"I don't."

"why not?"

He held out his hand. « No Money | mind...

"Do you have money to spend, but not to do it?"

"No, we're working in the wrong country . . ."

"Only bad beaches," Malcolm said, shaking his head. "It's just too bad. It's just the beginning of things. It's just the beginning."
consequences . . . I give you scientists who agree with that. they just need accessories and there are no problems.
and muscles and bones. It’s their way of relaxing. It’s based on science.
And the opposite happens.

"Then what's the answer?"

"Remove the wise men from among you. Put them to work."

"But then we'll ruin everything we've done-"

"what are you doing?" Malcolm said excitedly. How many hours do women spend on housework?
It hasn’t changed since the 1930s, despite all the twists and turns. vacuum cleaner, washer and dryer;
Garbage collectors, trash removal, laundry and clothing. .. Why does it take so long to.
Cleaning up the city like in the 1930s?


Ella said nothing.

"Because there was no plan," Malcolm said. "Yes. Thirty thousand years
As a caveman at Lascaux, he worked twelve hours a week.
They provide food, shelter, and clothing. The rest of the time they can play or
Sleeping and doing everything. And they live in a world of clean air and clean water.
Beautiful trees and sunshine. Think about it. Twelve hours a week. Thirty thousand years ago.

Want to relax? Ellie said.

"No," Malcolm said. "| I want people to wake up. Four hundred years ago now
The science, and we should all have heard by now, is good and interesting. It’s time to
change."

Have we not destroyed the world yet? She said.

He took a deep breath and closed his eyes. "Oh my God," he said. "That's the last | I regret it."


In the darkness of the forest, Grant went from hand to hand, kicking branches and sighing.
The platform moves forward. She still hears voices. And finally they see dinosaurs.

Aren’t they poison?

"Yeah," Grant said. "Diluphosaurus."

Two dilophosphates are located at the mouth of the river. Spears taller than ten feet were flung.
And black. Below, the birds are colored like rabbits. The first red-footed patient fled.
The top of his head from his eyes to his nose forms a V on top of his head. bird-
As we can see from their behavior, they persuade them to drink from the river and then go to
Snarl and fish.

Lex said during the conversation, "Should we go for a walk?"

Grant shook his head no. Dilophosaurs were smaller than triazoles, and smaller
He will hide among the logs by the river. And it looks like they’re playing the same
They shouted and yelled at each other.

"But we can't pass them on the boat," Leake said. "She's poison."

"We have to do it," Grant said. "right."

Dilophosaurs were always drunk and angry. They seemed to be talking to each other.
It’s very smooth and polished. The monster on the left smiles, drinks, mouth shut
His mouth opened wide, and he screamed. The axis on the right has
boot in response and proceeds to drink the first picture of the Beast. after
The sequence is repeated.

Grant noticed that the person on the right was smaller and had small scratches on its nose and a
Christian ran.

"I'm hurting," she said. "It's a wicked sense of humor." "can

Shall we move them? Tim said.

"Not like now. They're on the beach." Grant was largely identified with horses.
He performed these sexual acts for hours at a time. They went without food and slept.
Nothing else. . . . He looked at his watch. 29 .

What are we doing? Tim said.

Grant sighed. "|I don't know."

He put it in the boat, and the Dilpozors drove again;
bad. He looked up at the sky. Both animals are aware of the situation.

"What's that?" Lex said.

Grant laughed, "I think we're getting some help." Jump into the tub. "I want you
Two children in the nursery. We are living in a time of uncertainty. But remember: whatever
It happened, you didn’t say anything, and you didn’t insist- okay?

The ship begins to sink Dilophosaurus. He has a soul. Lexi believes
Grant’s eyes scanned over the water. He approached the Delphosaur.
They were still near the river. Then he pulled out his air rifle and looked around.

The boat moves and they smell something sweet, savory and tangy at the same time.
schedule. It smells like sweet potatoes. The bones of Dilophosaurs were extremely fragile. Five ships.
After a tragic incident, Grant remains in his composure. Dilophosaurs are only a few kilometers away,
They talked about the trees beside the river.


According to Grant, he was referring to the Tyransaurus. The tyransaurus seeks revenge.
As the leaves crunch, the animals struggle with their claws in the mud. The ship is going
in front of them. The smell is repulsive. The tyransaurus screamed, probably because it was a living creature.
But once again. . .

chest.

The group continues. They were only a few meters from the cliff edge.
Under the dolphins.

Lexi smiled, "Oh, okay."

There was a faint boat noise outside. So the ship was going.
further. They were going down to the river. Tyransaurus roared one last time and snarled; a
Dilophosaur watched in horror and sighed. Another dilophosphate nodded in response.

The ship was floating on the river.


Tyrannosaurus


The jeep travels in the sunlight. Muldoon walked away, Genaro at his side. they
They were in a field, taking pictures of messy leaves and green grass.
And the breadth of the valley on the east side an hundred cubits. When they arrived, Muldoon
car.

"Col, you're so sweet," he said, rubbing his cheek with the back of his hand. He drank the bottle.
The whiskey between his fingers, and he offered it to Gennaro.

Genaro shook his head. He watched the ground glow in the morning heat. so
He looked at the ship's computer and at the video on the screen. Television
It shows the park layout for the remote cameras. Grant and the children have yet to be identified. either
Thermansaurus.

The radio crackled. "Mildred."

Muldoon picks up the phone. "Yes."

"You got a key? | You got Rick. He's at 442 things. He's at 443."

"It's just a matter of time," Muldoon said. He stared at the TV. "Yeah. I've got it now. Stay by the river."
The monster runs along the branches along the wall to the east.

"You're right. Just take it off."

"Don't worry," Muldoon said, squinting at the sun. "| It's not good."

"Remember," Arnold said, "Tyransaurus is the tourist attraction."

Muldoon turned off his radio with a grin. "Okay, Joel," he said. "They also talk
About the fans." Muldoon smiled. "Let's go see Rexy and give her some medicine."

The jib rolls into the mud.

"They've been waiting for this," Gennaro said.

"For a long time I've wanted to poke a bell in this great man," Muldoon said. "And there it is."

They came to a crossroads. At the furnace, Genaro immediately spotted the Tyrannosaurus.
They drove pine forests along the river.

Muldoon downed the bottle of whiskey and tossed it into the corner. He held out his hand.
tube. Gennaro watches the video, which shows their Jeep and Tyransaurus.
There must be a truck in the snow somewhere below.

"You want to help," Mildred said, "you might as well take these canteens off your shoes."

Gennaro smiled and opened a stainless steel Halliburton box. He wore at the bottom with
Movies. Four cylinders, each about the size of a milk box. All of them.
Its configuration is MORO709. He pulled out one.

"You put your head down and laugh," Muldoon explained.

Gennaro spotted a plastic pump with large holes, each the size of his thumb. fluent
Hit one of the canteens. At the other end of the spectrum is a slightly darker shade.

"It's potatoes. It's about anger." Muldoon sat down in front of him in a dress.
feet. Made of black metal and shaped like a Janro, it resembles a bassooka or whale
arrange.

What is Muru709?


"Microbes are working on it all over the world. We're going to see a thousand cc
Starting with. Muldoon opened the box to draw his hand.
He brought the box down and locked it.

"It should be," Muldoon said. "Cows produce about two hundred cc, but they
Tyrannosaurus rex only weighed two to three tons each, and was eight tons, and it was huge. This is important.
health.


"why?"

“The measurement is the difference between physical pressure and physical pressure.”
Like an elephant, stallion, or donkey, you rode an elephant, to be precise
statue. You put a reindeer to sleep, but it keeps moving. And Richard has
Just get lost in the game. But on the other hand, you drive for more than five minutes.
car and died of adrenaline poisoning. Every problem is complex and difficult and challenging.

Muldoon walked slowly across the river and closer to the river. "But that's all
independent. He teaches a lot about animal welfare because animals are appreciated
That means animals - lions, tigers, hyenas, elephants. We don’t know much about the characters. and
Nobody knew anything about dinosaurs. Cannasaurus fossils are a relatively new animal.

"Are you thinking about them in the future?" January said.

"No," said Muldoon, with a grin. "The dinosaurs never used any of the islands there." He turned and left.
You don’t get stuck in marriage. “Actually, what we’ve learned is that dinosaurs evolved as mammals today, as they do today.
Some religions are beautiful and sweet, while others are harsh and cruel. Some of them look great and
Others are not. Some of them are foolish, and some are wise.

"Like the Raptors?" January said.

Muldoon shook his head. "Reindeer are smart, very smart. Trust me, they all have problems
I want,” he said, “it’s nothing compared to what we get when the retirees leave .
reading. Oh. | I think that’s as close as we can get with Rexy.

Up ahead, Tyransaurus pokes its head through the trees, overlooking the river.
You are trying to go. The hero walked a few feet to the ground to regain his balance.

"What do you see here?" January said.

"It's hard to know," Mildred said. “It can adapt to Microceratopsians.
Walk in the steps. They will be happy to eat it.

Muldoon parks the Jeep about 50 meters away from Tyranchore, and you drive off.
around. He smiled broadly and ran. "Sit on the couch," said Mildred. "And make up your mind."
on." He took another can and strapped it around his neck. Then he left.

Genaro jumped onto the back of the car. How often have you done that?

shouted Muldoon. "No. I'm always trying to win. We'll see how it goes
It's coming." He walked ten yards to the jeep and pulled into a ditch
knee. He lowered the large knife and let out a sigh.
Muldoon was interested in the Tyrannosaurus, which he had never paid attention to before.

A black gas exploded and Genaro saw a white trail in the sky behind it.
Thermansaurus. But it didn't matter.

The Tyransaurus turned deep in his heels to look at them. He shook his head from side to side.
On the one hand, a single eye seems to be looking at them.

Muldoon grabbed the shooter and hit the second button.

Did you hit him? January said.

Mildred shook her head. "He said. Laser lights… Make sure you have some batteries in the pack."

"than?" January said.

"It's a battery," Muldoon said. "Bigger than his body. Scar marks."

Gennaro pulled away and looked at the metal plate. He could hear the Jeep’s thump and hear his heartbeat.
often. He couldn't find the battery. shouted Tyrancer. For Gennaro, it was a challenge.
The sound coming from the beast's neck echoed across the floor. fluent
He stood up, reached for the counter, and put his hand on the glass knob. In radio,
I heard a voice say, "Muddie. It's Arnold. Get out of here. Go."

"|You know how I work," Myrtle said. that

Tyransaurus stopped.


Mildred is shocked. Although the blade rotates slowly and rotates in the
He raised his wand, spoke, and caught it. Once again, Genaro saw a plume of smoke, and it was white.
The voice turns to the animal.

Nothing happened. The tyrannosaurus still charges.

By now Meade was on his feet and running, shouting, "Go! Go!" Genaro reached for the pocket.
And Muldoon walked out the front door as the Jeep pulled in front of him. Transocerus
Shutting it quickly, Muldoon opened the door and stepped inside.

"Go, suck! Go!"

Gennaro sighed. The jeep pulled to the left, and for a moment they only saw
It bounces into the air, then plummets to the ground, running forward
further. Genaro walked along the wall to the left until he saw a mirror.
The tyrannosaurus gave one last sigh and fell asleep.

Gennaro started the car. "Jesus."

Mildred shook her head. "I can tell you | I'll kill you again."

"I mean, you've thought about it," Jannard said.

"The horn must be broken before the horn can be given."

"You said, don't stop."

"Yes," said Mildred. He was happy. "|Jenny. The battery died on the laser light.
confused. | He should have seen her when she came out yesterday. We’ll be back to get some more
Canister.”

The jeep goes west to the hotel. Muldoon grabs the radio. "ride."

"Yeah," Arnold said.

"Let's get back to basics."


The river is now calm and running fast. The boat is going fast. I was
It started as a nice walk in the park.

"Wei!" Lex yelled, pulling away. "Quickly, quickly!"

She looked Grant in the eye. The river is small and narrow, but you can see far
He finally reached the top of the tree, and there was sunlight and a distant sound. fluent
It looks like it’s going to end up two ways. . . .

The boat is going fast. extend

He picked up the bag.

"What's that?"

"You're exhausted," Grant said.

The ship emerged from the darkness into the morning sunlight and ran.
He walked along the path of the river. They had ringing in their ears. extend
He held on to the ship with all his strength, but he couldn't pull it back. fluent
He walked towards the door.

Lex pulled away. I am not walking well! Grant noticed that his waitress was missing.
But there was nothing to be done; They reached the door with a steady breathing, and
The sound of water filled the grounds. Grant launched his boat into the water.
Red and white, your mouth; The rubber bottle floats in the water, but does not sink.
Grant pulled onto the shore, looked to the side, and saw a hole about 50 feet away.
Water source.

And he was standing in the kitchen panting and waiting for a tyrant.

Lex screams in terror and the boat turns and falls under and he runs
They flew into the air and swirling waters and fell down sick. Grant threw his hands in the air and
The rest of the world is dumb and understands little.


He hesitates for a moment, and has time to stare at Lex in his orange shoes.
they fell before him; He had time to see Tim, to see the world; He has time.
Look at the clear rushing water; I had time to check out the wall below.
He bent down a little, and there was a small silence beside him.

Then, with a sigh, Grant plunged into the cold, steaming water.
He growled, shocked to see Tyranxhor's footprint moving in front of him.
He fell into the water and emerged from the river later. Grant swam into the water and was pulled from the fire.


The stones, he said, seized a branch of a tree and leaned against the trunk. windy.
He leans back and on the rocks, looking down river just in time to see rain.
The kitchen is running. Then he saw Tim, struggling with the water, and reached out for a
She shrugged and walked to the next bathroom.

Grant jumps out of the water and pulls the Tyransaurus head off.
the waters were under his feet. The larger head expands and fills both sides with water. heart
Something between her legs.

And the heavens were lifted up again. Lex’s Life is The Orange of Lex.
taste.


A moment later, Lex appeared next to the dinosaur track. He was lying on the ground.
water, the small intestine muscle. Grant fell into the water on his back.
He used to be a waterman. A moment later, he sat on the rocks.
Heavy weight is not life. His eyes bulged. He spit into her mouth.

Grant shook his head and moved towards the door, but he didn’t care. Then he retracted his hand.
Clear water and snake head. He rubbed his eyes. "Thanks," he said. He smiled slightly. "We do
fluent."

Tim started crying. He picked it up again. Will you go? What are you crying for?

"because."

"We miss you," Grant said. Little Whites come down from the river.
The Tyransaurus gives you some flowers. However, he turned away from them and looked at the river. but
At all times the animals moved and moved. . . . Come on children, he said.

"Where are we going?" Lexi offers to help.

"series." He was looking for somewhere to hide. He just sees the thickets along the riverbank.
It provides no protection. Upstream were the dinosaurs. Grant then noticed a dirt road along the river. fluent
It was like going underwater.

And it’s a filthy clean man’s dish. And they left the road.

The tyrannosaurus stops, growls and stares at the wall. fluent
It’s like they feel abandoned.

They were lying on the ground. Grant and the kids hid in the big trees around them
in the ships. and he cast them into the land of the south. "Where are we going?" Lex said. "go
back."

"|I know."

Now they were close to the shore, and very loud. The stones became stars.
The dirt road. There is always a consequence. It’s like walking on a cloud. way
It looked like it went underwater, but when they got closer, they saw that
And he went down into the water.

The tyrannosaurus could still see the water, even with its eyeballs scanning them. goes.
route to the falls, and was nearing the top of the falls when Grant arrived
Laughter of the Tyrant. So he was underwater, and Grant couldn’t see
from silver foil.

Grant looked to his side in confusion. There is a shed here, no bigger than the garage, and
It is filled with various components: small tubes, large filters, needles. Everything is calm and relaxed.

"we?" Lex said. He must have screamed when he heard the sound of falling water. "where are you
we? What is this place? we?

"It's just a matter of time," Grant said. Takes care of equipment. Obviously, this is a fun machine.
And maybe there’s electricity to run, so maybe there’s also a phone to talk to.
It goes through your filters and tubes.

"what are you doing?" Lexi shouted.

"I'm looking for a phone." By now it was almost 10:00 and only an hour had passed.
It took an hour for the train to land.

They found a steel door marked MAINT 04 and locked it.
Next to it was a safety card. Next to the entrance, he noticed a pile of steel boxes. fluent
Drawers are opened, with only keys and watches inside. There was no telephone.
And nothing but an open door.


He almost threw the baby in the doorway. When he opened it, he found a three-stringed statue;
It is surrounded by red armored dots. But that seems like a way to close the door, and that
Let’s assume the phone is on the opposite end. The blades are made of steel.
Number 1023. He bent over it.

Creepily, the door opened. The darkness is complemented by thick wires.
At the bottom we see the MAIN VEHICLE CHARGER 04/22 marked in yellow
Go upstairs. Could he have thought the car was still there? "Hey, baby."

"You're right," Lex said. "I'm not getting in here."

"Come on, Lex," Tim said.

"You're right," Lex said. "There was no fire or anything. I didn't leave."

"It's nothing," Grant said. There was no time to talk. "Stay here, I'll be right back."

"Where are you going?" Lex said nervously.

Grant came through the doorway. He made an electronic noise and closed the door.
afternoon.

Grant was completely in the dark. After some pain, he went to the door and
Her body was hot. No frame, no line. He sat on either side of the wall.
The door, the switch, the power key, everything.

There was nothing.

As he struggled against the pain, his hands wrapped around a black metal cylinder. He held out his hand.
On one side of the fork is a pond. . . Dark blink, and the bell was there.
It was an amazing light. He looked back at the door, but noticed it wasn't open. Should be
Let the kids open it. so . . .

It starts with the leaves. They dry their hands and cover them with dirt,” Janet explains.
As he stepped onto the wall, he heard a loud crash followed by the sound of nails digging into concrete. fluent
He drew his gun and went forward.

Footsteps brought him closer to the wall, and when the lights dimmed, a strange light shone from behind him.
And, suddenly, he saw it: it was a car! An electric car that looks about the size of a golf cart and looks awesome
It’s a long tunnel that goes on for miles. A bright yellow light flashed on the driver’s seat.
A car, however, is probably more expensive.

Grant heard the noise again, and turned to see something black coming from behind him.
She’s falling apart, the deal is bad, and Grant doesn’t know where to go. Banga falls for it.
He drops it to the ground and coughs in terror, then BANG.
She didn't wake up, and he was relieved to see her.

It was a Velociraptor, but it was small and less than a year old. Maybe two feet long, maybe two feet wide.
A tall, stocky dog, breathing heavily, with a downward slope.
jaw. Probably too much of a landslide and Grant pulls the trigger.
brief. Velliciraptor stares with glowing eyes for a moment.

Grant remembers learning about this creature very differently.
It was embarrassing and humiliating for the elders of the village. The man shook his head.
velociraptor, I think he would approve. He looked down at his body, which was shaking slightly like
Sedative was administered. And he saw that it was a man.

Young, young, and gay. There was no question he was there. Cycling lu
He was in the woods.

With pleasure , she hurried to the door. By his light, he gave
It’s a wide and elegant door handle, and side panels. They go hand in hand.
At the entrance, she quickly realized that the door was locked and she could not open it without
Kids are smart enough to open up to him. He could hear them from the other side.
believe.


"Dr. Grant!" Lex sighed and slammed the door. "Dr. Grant!"

"You're right," Tim said. "He'll be back."

"But where did he go?"

“Listen, Drs. Grant knew what they were doing,” Tim said. "He'll be back in a minute."

"He should be back by now," Lex said. He pressed his lips against hers and smiled.
wide. He stomped his foot in anger.

And, wonderfully, the sea-head rose out of the water to meet them.


Tim looked shocked and his mouth hung open. Lexi screams and springs up.
soil. The head rocks back and forth, then back down again. But Tim sees shadows.
The mouse’s head rested on the grass.

Lex pushed inside of her and when he pushed his hips in again, he screamed, loudly.
It went in and out of our mouths quickly. Water flows all the way from the top. Then he went
further.

Lex walked over to Tim and hugged him. "|I love it," she said. He was shocked, and so were the others.
It was only a few meters away, and it was full of tomatoes. There was nowhere to hide.

His head was back in the water, but gently this time, his throat relaxed.
soil. Tyransaurus clenched his fists as he took a deep breath. But there are fruit
Water in the tank.

Tim thought: He can’t see us. He knew we were here, but he couldn’t see underwater.

The tyransaurus sighed.

What am I doing? Lex said again.

"Chch."

With a small gasp, his lips opened and he dropped his mouth. It is beautiful and green.
Black, with a small chip in the middle. About four feet tall.
The high walls of the house. The slurry was then poured onto filter cylinders. Tim and
Lex smokes weed.

The mouth moves to the left, to the right, pulling the fly.
He bent his head over the bells and whistles and turned them on. Tim noticed that he had tangles in his hair.
A gauze-like look.
He was held to Lex's shoulders.

"Eeww," Leak said.

His mouth was open. He turned and stood like a snake, his body on one side.

"Don't laugh," Tim whispered.

. .. face to face, then back to Tim and then he shook his head. Tim
He closed his eyes when a part of his face touched him. It was hot and humid and I felt like
setting.

He leans forward, his mouth brushing hers.

"Timmy…."

Tim couldn't answer; His mouth was covered with a black cloth. He could see through it, but
I couldn't speak. Lex held his hand.

"Come on, Timmy!"

His mouth was drawn back. He felt a burning sensation in his cheeks.
Lex pushes him away, but he can't withstand the physical force holding him back. Tim let her.
He pushed his head back with both hands on his head. He cannot remove it.
He placed his hand on the ground, but stepped forward.

Lex put his arms around her waist and was walking backwards, yelling at her, but she
He couldn't do anything. He began to notice something. There was a kind of peace .
He felt an almost incredible peace as he left.

“Timmy?”

And they pinched his lips, to let go. Tim felt himself blur from his eyes. body.
He ended up with white ears and his jaw dropped to the ground. setting;
He sighed, as he opened his mouth. The blood blackened and mixed with dirt. that
The nose breathes hard.

What am I doing? Lexi shouted.

And slowly, slowly, the chief began to climb the center of the tunnel to go.
Very deep in the mud. And then it's over and all they see is money
A spiritual rainbow.


ride
"Fine," Arnold said in court. "Rex is downstairs." He leaned back in his chair and


He smiles, lights his cigarette, and takes a deep breath. That's What Happened : End of story
park is back in place. Now they just have to go out and get it.


“Country boy,” Muldoon said, looking at his TV. "| I have made him the last of all." He rolled his eyes.
January. "It took an hour to dry."

Henry Wu looked at the photo. "But you can dive in there…."

"He doesn't swim," Mauldin said. "I've never seen an animal tough enough to kill."

"|I think we should go do it," Arnold said, "We .

It’s going to happen,” Muldoon said. It wasn’t high.

"He's a very good dog."

"|I know you're a very special kid," Myrtle said.

Arnold is furious with Gennard. He couldn't wait a moment. "I'll show you," he said.
He said: "The park is getting back to normal now. Anyway Malcolm
It will happen. We’re still under control.”

Genaro looked in the direction of Arnold's head, "What's that?"

Arnold paused. Here is the profile page, in the upper right corner of the page. eventually
empty. Arnold was surprised to see that it was now flashing red: AUX PWR LOW. conference
For a while, he didn’t understand. Why should we improve the power of the assistant? They walked along the main road.
Experience, not supporting experience, was thought to be appropriate for a helper position.
Power, you can check the fuel level or charge the battery. ...

"Henry," Arnold said to Wu. "Look at this."

Wu said, “Why are you leaving the store?

No, Arnold said. "Like you."

"|It can't be."

"You're going to get a dashboard," Wu said. The trend has been to maintain that momentum over the past few seasons.
hour.

Arnold pushed a button and they heard the click of a printer on the floor. Wu walked over to him.

Arnold looked at the TV. The box now changes to yellow and red, and the message
Now please read: AUX PWR FAIL, the number starts with an asterisk.

"What's going on?" Arnold said.


Reluctantly, Tim walked a few steps down the dirt road in the sunlight. Look
He looked down the river and saw the ground behind him, flowing towards the river.

"|I thought he was dead," Lex said.

Tim noticed it wasn't: the dinosaur's tail was still moving, and one of its arms was twitching.
spasm. But there was something to it. So Tim is the white circle at the bottom.
in the head, to remove the ear.

"He was killed with a knife," Tim said.

"Yeah," Leake said. "ate."

Tim watches, stunned. He was angry because he did not expect to see such a big animal.
That's what it's about. He doesn't want to die. "It's not his fault," she said.

"Oh sure," Leak said. "He ate us, it's not his fault."

"He's a carnivore. Doing what he always does."

"You wouldn't say that," Lex said, "if you were in his heart right now."

Then the sound of the water changed. Out loud, she became soft and quiet. that
The water fell into the heavens and became a river. .

And stopped.

"Tim. The water's out," Leak said.

It will be as hard as a sheet before it is completely crushed. Waterfront area
There are waters. They were standing near the top in a tunnel full of tomatoes.
Watch below.

"The water shouldn't be too cold," Lex said.

Tim shook his head. "There has to be power...someone's missing power." In front of them,
All the pumps and filters are switched off one after the other, the lights are switched off and
The train stopped.

And then a solo came, and they knocked on the door of MAINT 04 .
It opened quickly.


Grant stepped out, touched his face in the light, and said, “Good job, boys. Check the door”.
“We didn’t do anything,” Leake said. "letter

She’s gone,” Tim said.

"It's not good," Grant said. "Come see what I'm wearing."


Arnold looked at him suspiciously.

After a while, the screens went black, then the lights dimmed and
In the courtroom in darkness and gloom. Everyone started crying at the same time. Mauldin you .
The blind give way to the light, and Woo comes to write.

"Look at him," Wu said.


Time Zone Definition [Code]
05:12:44 Defense | Open Project [AV12]
05:12:45 Validation 2 activated [AV12].
05:12:46 Security 3 Advanced Security [AV12].
05:12:51 Order Against Violence [-AVO].
05:13:48 Overview [-AVO}
05:13:55 Security 1 Online [-AVO}
05:13:57 Observation 2 on alert [-AVO].
[05:13:59] Security 3 on [-AVO}
05:14:08 Linear Trace - X Power [-AV1]
05:14:18 Control Performance - Baseline Power [-AV04]
05:14:19 Security - Versatility - Signal Capacity [-AV05]
05:14:22 Command Worker - The Power of Walking [-AV06]

05:14:24 Laboratory - Big Detector - Recall Power [-AV08]
[-AV09] 05:14:29 TelecomWeb Opera - Active Power [-AV09]

05:14:32 The Grand Plan - Strong Power [-AV09]

05:14:37 Do work - Enter power [-AV09].
05:14:44 Control Panel Computer Panel - Power Monitoring [-AV09]
05:14:57 WARNING: Jungle Guide [NB] Server - High Power [-AV09]
09:11:37 WARNING: fuel injection (20%) operation - fuel injection [-AVZZ].
09:33:19 WARNING: Gas leak (10%) Operation - Leak speed [-AVZ1]
09:53:19 Warning: Very Overload (1%) Overload - Very Overload [-AVZ2].

09:53:39 Warning: Fuel oil (0%) missing [-AVO]


“You closed it at five o’clock in the morning,” says Wu, “the day it started when you closed .
It starts with empowering volunteers.

"Jesus," Arnold said. The force at the front had not been rebuilt since the war. When he gave
It was reinforced, only Japanese help would come. Arnold thought it was cute when
He was loving and he knew this was good. That’s what needs to happen. is
First: The electronic steering wheel is supplied first;
Because you need a high voltage regulator to run a large voltage. thus
It's done.

But Arnold took no time to slow down. and when we see and .
The screens in the control room were bright and you never noticed that the power source was off.
was answered.

But it didn’t work, and every time since, while dreaming about Rex and living
Thing is, the park is in terrible shape. And it wasn’t pretty.
advice. In fact, the tension began to rise.

What does this address mean? Muldoon said, looking at the paper.


05:14:57 WARNING: Jungle Guide [NB] Server - High Power [-AV09]


"This means that the alarm system status is sent to the controllers in the control room," Arnold said.
"About the birds."

"Have you seen the detective?"

Arnold shook his head, "No."
Look at it.

What do you mean, alert: emergency situation'?

« Well, | I didn’t know it at the time, but we were getting along really well,” Arnold said. "and
This means it doesn’t produce enough power to drive fans, so
He loses himself.

Mildred rolled her eyes. "Do they connect the walls?"


"Yes. "

"What about the Velociraptor ships?"

Arnold sighed. "Yes."

“Christ Jesus,” Muldoon said. "Five hours. These monsters can fly."

Then, in the distance, they heard a loud noise. Mildred started talking a lot.
fast. He goes through the house picking up portable radios.

"Mr. Arnold goes to the engine room to put on the gas. Under the supervision of Dr. Wu To
hell. Only you can use computers. Goodbye, Mr. Hammond.
Manic. Don't run to me. Go now. Close the windows and stay near them until you hear the
I. I helped Arnold deal with his problems. " Janard shouted. "You could be in trouble
further?"

"Not really," Genaro said. It's very full.

"Okay. Then you and the others can go home." Mildred is shocked. "That's all. Now
walk. "

“What are you going to do with my cows?” shouted Hamon.

"It's not a simple question, Mr. Hammond," said Muldoon. "The question is what
Would it be you?

He walked through the door and down the hall to his office. Genaro fell to his knees.
across. "Did he change his mind?" shouted Muldoon.

"You need help," Gennard said.

"I'm fine." Muldoon went into the room next to Animal Control and pulled out his bag.
The space launcher, and opened a panel on the right side of his desk. It had six cylinders.
and the sixth canteen.

“The thing about this wine,” says Muldon, “is that it’s really complex .
thoughts. They do not die immediately nor after they leave the brain. And they stood firm; It’s very useful.
Make sense of his rhythmic heart, and it’s hard to keep him off his shoulders and arms. smooth
They're withering, and soon they'll be dead." The cylinders behind him opened and he fell into the
Cantor. He fired at Genord. "Listen."

Gennaro took the key and Muldoon handed over the key. "All we can hope for
and he shall lay them down. Unfortunately, we only have six birds here. This includes eight reports
A city of flowers. going to. Stay by your side. Your wife is right.”

Muldoon got out and walked along the railing, looking over the fence across the street.
which leads to injustice. Gennaro smiled beside her. And the fence.
Up and down the glass door, Muddy stood.

Arnold stayed behind in class. Three men approached him.
Arnold picked up a punch, waved them and yelled. The agents appear
They were all close, with one sitting in the middle and two more watching from either side. developed.
smooth. Gennaro hesitated.

The shape of the body.

Muldoon had already spotted it, with the inspector hovering over his shoulder. "Fade," he said.
Genaro shoots the beast behind bars. There is a linear slope. nothing
done. "Col, you'll get it later," Mildred said, stretching the hatch to grab the bag.


The hands of Jennu. Genaro was restored. The deputies yelled at Arnold as the animal was shot.
In the hand.
Masks were distributed to the schools. The rest of his body slumped to the ground, his feet
He shouted into the air, swinging the tail.

"She serves it to them," Muldoon said.

Arnold walked through the office door. The Velostrators returned and started
Mullin and Genaro. They turned as they came closer. A remote location, near
In the living room, she heard a loud noise.

"That could be a problem," Genaro said. "Donny," said Mildred.


Henry Wu heard footsteps and looked at the palace door. He pulled away.
in front of the consoles, and paused. He wanted to leave, but he knew he had to stay home.
If Arnold can regain his power - if only for a minute - then Wu can regain himself.
Generator.

He should have stayed home.

He heard someone yell. So says Mildred.


Muldoon felt a sharp pain in his chest and collapsed to the ground.
run. Looking behind him, he saw Genaro walking another way through the forest. The leaders
They do not belong to the Genera, but represent Muldon. Now they’ve reached more than 20 feet.
Muldoon yelled at the top of his lungs as he ran, wondering what was next.
go. They know they have ten seconds to find him.

Ten seconds. bridge

quite.


Ellie has to help Malcolm up while Harding grabs the needle and takes the morphine. Malcolm
He sighed and fell back. It’s getting worse every minute. In radio,
He heard a sound.

Hammond walked into the room and said, "How are you?"

"It's no good," Harold said. "It's a little funny."

"It was nothing like that," Malcolm said. "|I'm very clean." Turn on the radio. "fluent
I feel like a fighter.

"The answers are endless," Hammond said.

"They did," Malcolm said with a small smile. How can this be done?

"It's such a secret. Arnold didn't know there was a support force and ships."
Beat it.

"Are they?"

"Go to the fire, bastard-."

« If | You remember,” Malcolm said, “I said the dark wall doesn’t look good.”

Hammond took a deep breath and sat still. "Damn it all," he nodded. "should
We stopped thinking that what we’re seeing here is the worst of the problems.
Simple advice. My friends are | It was suggested many years ago that it could be cloned
DNA from extinct animals and their offspring. It was a good idea for us.
Time Travel-Just time travel in space. Bring them back alive. and be
It was great, and since we could, we decided to go for it. We learned this lesson and
We went. Everything is simple."

"cotton?" Malcolm said. He somehow found the strength to stay in bed. "Easy? You
He’s a bigger man than you think. and | He thought I was an idiot.

- Dr. Malcolm, Ellie said, trying to smile. But Malcolm didn’t care.
He looked at the radio, the switches and the buttons.

“What does that mean, going on here?” She said. "It's easy. It's easy. I'm doing it again
Survival guidelines, for those who don’t know. Dr Wu doesn't know.
For the stuff I do, I don’t worry about things like the name of the product;
One like this. They can do so much in so little time, you never know anything
They, however, expect to get to know you because you created them, so
them; Forget that they are alive, conscious and can


Don't make an interview, forget what information you have about them, it's not necessary
Do what you say is easy.... Lord God. . ."

He thought he was paying.

"Do you know how powerful knowledge is?" Malcolm said. “It’s a very unique piece of history.
And you know, old guys. They don't fall."

What is he talking about? Hammond said.

Harding made a face, as if to say he was angry. Malcolm looked up.

"| She tells you | what I'm talking about," he said. “Some types of cases require a lot .
Whoever wants power gets it. There is value in education, which for many people
anniversary. The energy you need. The company manager. A black man in that movie. Spirituality
teacher. You need to put time, work, and effort into something you set your mind to. You have to do it.
It’s a lot to take in. It should be important to you. And if you have, you are.
pressure. It cannot be given away: it is yours. This is a result of your leadership.

“Now, the beauty of this is that when someone
He could have been killed with his bare hands, and also suffered for abusing him.
Thus this form of government came about. Strength training changes you in this way.
that you didn’t do him any favors.

"But the power of knowledge is like a lost treasure: You get it without learning it. You read what other people say."
Do it, and you can do the next thing. You can do it if you’re young. You can do a lot.
fast. No government lasts for many years. There’s no rule: old schools are boring.
There is no problem with location, there is just an initial investment.
philosophy. Cheating, lying, lying - it's not good. You, or your friends. I don't understand
You’re hurt. No one owns a person. They’re all trying to do the same thing: make something happen.
Yes, and do it quickly.

"And by chasing superstars, you can do anything
brief. You don't know what you're doing, but you don't know what you're doing.
You took the bowl and sold it. And human resource management isn’t much more than that. Student Explanation
It buys energy like anything else. The customer saw nothing.
Maybe you should.

Do you know what he’s talking about? Hammond said. reach

He shook his head.

"|I don't know," said Hammond.

"I will," Malcolm said. "A karate master would never kill with his bare hands."
He didn't kill her in anger. The murdered person was not
Lead, not follow, and that was powerful on Saturday night.
And it is this subtle energy that drives and drives science. And that’s why you’re thinkin
It's not hard to build a place like this."

"It's cool," Hammond said.

"So why does this work so well?"


Surprised by the situation, John Arnold opened the door to the utility room and entered.
The darkness within. Jesus, they’re black. He should have known the lights would go out. he thought.
Crisis, space ships, going two floors below, one must
Take that ring. He must strengthen it or it will disintegrate.

hiking.

He blinked like a blind man until he realized it was useless. Somehow, he had to find his light
Downstairs, go back to the door and unlock the four pillars. It lets in a lot of light. but
There was no way to close the door. He quickly took off his shoes and pushed open the door.

He went to the bathroom and looked easy. He climbed onto the metal cylinder and listened to it.
Another moment, one louder, one quieter, but he still sees the light. appearance
A ladder can be used for planes. Ten more seats.

black.

The light went out.

Arold looked at the portal and saw that the light had obscured the Velociraptor's body.
The dog laughed and kicked his shoes wildly.


Henry Wu walked. He pointed to their computer terminals. He clings to the screens. fluent
He’s still smiling. He felt nervous.

This is a tribute to his achievements. It must be worth it. The first screen will be displayed, and
taken-

"Uh!" The radio crackled.

He caught it. "Yeah. I'm here."

"Does blood have any power?" A Muldoon. There was something wrong with his voice.
Something below.

"No," Wu said. He smiled, happy to hear that Meade was alive.

"| remember, Arnold came to the kitchen," said Mildred- "Then again, I don't remember."

"where are you?" Wu said.

"I'm full."

"than?"

"It gets in the blood," Mildred said. "And I'm happy now."


Muldoon thought it looked like a steamy ride. There are a lot of holes in the water.
Walked past the visitor’s goal, then took a left, hit the
Activists. The subway pillars are too heavy for him, but he can’t go underneath them.

At least, when he stuck his foot in one when there was a bad shot near the nail.
shouted Turtle, the others responding now. His only excuse is that
He didn't even bother to look at the lid on the end of the tube before pressing the button.

But maybe he still got his chance because three or four people were outside screaming and
she shouted closer.

“Yeah, very fast,” he radioed.

Wu said, "Arnold has a radio?"

"You can't think about it," Muldoon said. "Just come in. Look."

He didn't know what the other end of the tube looked like - it was very dark - and .
I don’t see it now. It was written. He could only hope that the last strand had been removed. Jesus,
She didn’t like getting caught by one of those rogues.


Arnold followed him downstairs. The Velostrator was only ten meters long, and it was heavy.
His eyes darted around in the darkness. Arnold could feel his fingers click against the metal.

But it’s sweet. I know the horse could have been better, but Polish Grill
Familiar mechanical smells made him shudder. This attention was just right for Arnold.
thought. It can climb walls, all the way to the floor. . .

Because he was convinced that the judge couldn’t simply leave. Not small, difficult.
ladder.

Arnold looked over his shoulder. The bridge was only a few feet away. Another page. . .

There it was! When he arrived, he remembered the ramp and began climbing almost to the ground.
Leaves. The posts are supported on the small concrete slab. 20 feet above, Rapport is screaming in pain.
Bath.

"Nonsense, my friend," said Arnold. He was shocked. He was very close to the current assistant.
Generator. Just a few drops, even in this light. . . .

There was a lump in her leg. Arnold

His wife has changed.

Retort stood in the street, crying. fluent

They float on the ground.

He immediately finds a gun, but is accidentally shot in the chest.
concrete. Something hard pressed against his chest and he couldn't breathe.
Seeing that the person was standing over him, he held his fingers as they ran through the flesh .
His mouth, smelling of foul air coming from his nose, opened.
The door creaked open.


Ellie held the radio in her hand and listened. Two more Tikan employees arrive at the hotel.
It was like they knew he was safe here. But no one else signed up at the last minute. and
Small one at the bottom. On the radio, Muldoon said, "How long ago?"


"Four fifteen minutes," Wu said.

"Arnold should do it now," said Mildred. "Okay. Do you have any ideas?"
"No," Wu said.

Have we heard from Gennaro?

Genaro pressed the button. "I'm here."

"where are you?" Mildred said.

“I went to the emergency room,” Gennard said. "Give me some time."


Gennaro leaned his head against the wall and listened.

Up ahead, he saw a corridor leading to the living room. January knew
There is some furniture somewhere to the east. He heard birds chirping in the trees. is
There was a chill in the air. A solution screams, but it’s a long way off. He lowered his voice.
body. Genaro started, moved out of the way, and fell to the ground.

Do you want to live in poverty? I don't

really.

The truth is, he didn’t. But Gennaro thought he had a plan and the situation could
business. If you live in a house on the east side of town, you can save on maintenance.
And so it began. All the best fish near the other houses were on the west side. there
There was no house in their forest.

At least he hoped not.

He pulled out all the stops and knew he was making a lot of noise. He is a criminal.
He slowed, feeling his heart beat faster. Here the distinction is small; It didn’t work.
Six or seven feet up. She was beginning to worry they would never be there again.
Every floor of the house. But then he noticed a building to his right at the top of the bridge.

He moved closer and closer. He found a door, opened it, and entered. fluent
It was very dark. He landed on something.

Personal shoes.

Genaro frowned. He opened the door and took her downstairs. fluent
He saw a man walking in front of him. He realizes he doesn't know where to go. so
He left his radio on.

damn!

The radio can be placed anywhere in the kitchen. Or do I just assume
Generator. He knew what hell meant. Probably somewhere under
below. He saw a fish fall.

It was pitch dark and hard to see anything. He felt the gap between the walls.
He catches his moves so he doesn't hit his head.

He heard the sound of horns and froze. He listened, but no sound came back. shift.
Proceed with caution. Something ran across his shoulder and over his left arm. It burns like water.
He kept him in the dark.

Gifts. He sniffed. bold.

He looked up at the sky. The raptor was perched on the branches, just a few inches above her head. There was blood.
He got out of bed. He asks if he’s hurt. And then
He started to run, but the weight came down on his back and he fell to the ground.

Gennaro had the speed, stood up, hit the ball, walked.
concrete. When he woke up, he noticed that the dog was lying next to him, panting.

Yes, it hurts. Her legs hurt for some reason.

kill

Gennaro knelt down, searching for the weapon. A journalist is always happy.
concrete. He looks for something to use as a weapon. When he changed
Next, there’s the raptor.

He shouted, raising his voice in the darkness.

Genaro spun in a circle, feeling their hands pulling on him. And then he heard something odd.
Pain in left arm.

finish.

It will destroy it.


The man shot himself in the head and Donald Gennaro staggered and fell.


Malcolm lay in bed, relaxing, listening to the radio broadcast. "anything?" Mildred said.
"Do you have anything?"

"There are no words," Wu said. "hell,"

"He was," Mildred said.

withdraw.

Malcolm sighed. "I can't wait," he said, "to hear your new adventure."

"Our | wish," Muldoon said, "is for everybody to get home and get back to normal. But | not .
Look at the road.”

“There was a jeep outside the church,” Wu said. "If | he runs away from you, you can catch him
In your body?"

"Okay. But you're off the court."

"I can't do anything here."

"God knows it's true," Malcolm said. "A private house without electricity is not a problem
Government House.

"Okay," Mildred said. "Let's see. This is bad."

As she slips into bed, Malcolm says, "No, it's okay. It looks like an accident."

Wu said, "The ball is approaching us."

“We’re still working,” Malik said. "going to."

The radio crackled. Malcolm closed his eyes and breathed out slowly as he regained his strength.

"Just imagine," Ellis said. "Just keep it simple."

“You really know what we’re talking about here,” Malik said. “To see all this….”
We are talking about five hundred years of western thought. Then they started.
At that time Florence, Italy was the largest country in the world. Scientific Theory - You
There’s a whole new way of looking at reality, and it’s okay if you don’t love yourself
Or your city, he thought, an idea that was new and exciting at the time. fluent .
Hope and hope for the future;
10 years. Politics, Religion, and Prejudice in History
It’s down to science. But, in reality, that’s because medieval castles don’t work.
It failed economically, it failed religiously, and it failed the new world that was .
They do it.

Malcolm paused.

"But now," he continued, "science is some concept that is hundreds of years old. And yet."
After the Middle Ages, science began to grapple with the natural world. Science has
He became so strong that it seemed impossible for him to do it. Probably scientifically.
Millions of us live on a small, crowded, interconnected planet. But science is bad
Help us decide what on earth to do or how to live. Science can build a nuclear plant, but
He doesn’t tell us to stop. Science can make medicine, but it can’t tell us to use it. and
Our planet is beginning to be polluted with many precious resources—air, water, and soil, because
He knows he shouldn't." She sighed. "That's enough for everyone."

There was silence. Malcolm closed his eyes, his heart pounding. No one spoke.
It was as if Malcolm had fallen asleep. Then he stood up again, at the base of the tree.

"At the same time, there is a great need for education. From
The discovery of Newton and Dickett proved the theory of attraction. Science has
At first he seeks the power to control everything through his study of the laws of nature. but
In the 20th century, this issue became an unsolved problem. First, Haysenberg
His uncertainty theory is central to what we can learn about the semi-granular world. Oh, so, we
state. None of us live on a planet with no atmosphere. It doesn’t matter how we
in our lives. Then the G"del key retrieves the numerical value in the appropriate word.
science. The mathematicians thought that there was an important truth in their statement.
derived from normal laws. We now know that what we call 'knowledge' is just a thought .
play. It’s not as big of an issue as you might think.

"And now chaos theory says that chaos works in our everyday lives. It proves that the universe
Like rain we cannot tell. So the greatest scientist of ages -
The dream of a general government is dead, in our century. And with it a lot of responsibility, he thinks.


Let science do what it does. And let's listen. Science always says it’s not
You know everything now, but you will understand later. But now we know that this is not true. And thank you.
Like an engineer, and like a kid who jumps off a building because he believes he can
treat."

"This is interesting," Hammond nodded.

"We are witnessing the end of the era of education. Education, like other ancient traditions, is
He shakes himself. If the force is increasing, it indicates that the force cannot be maintained. because
Things are looking up now. Fifty years ago, everyone was on the atomic bomb. that
health. Nobody can say that. However, only a decade after the bombing, we began .
To obtain the arithmetic power. Thermal energy is more powerful than nuclear energy. and in 2019.
Everyone hands. It will be in the farmers box. demonstration for students. expensive
labs of terrorists and dictators, and that leads everyone to ask the same question - what .
good | Am I doing what I want? Science says it can’t answer that question.”

"So what's going on?" Ellie said.

Malcolm looked up. "change."

"What song?"

“All the biggest changes were like death,” he said. "You can't see the other side until you get there."
And he covered his face.

"Not good," Hammond shook his head.

Malcolm sighed. "Do you have any ideas?" He said how you wouldn’t like it if you or any of us
Can you make it to this island alive?


The sixth time.


"Repeating how it works is not enough."


Hi Malcolm
return


Its electric motor roars and the car lurches forward in the dark. Grant will go.
Feet on the ground. The boat is powered only by a windmill on the roof, which is green.
To protect against rain, the system allows some light. But he knew they were
There are white ants in many places. Obviously there are a lot of monsters here.

Sitting next to him in the cockpit, Lex lit a flashlight in the base where the Velociraptor was located.
Why does it hurt the heart?


« Because | He hit him with a gun,” she said.

Are you dying? She said.

"|Probably not."

Why should we accept it? Lex said.

“To show people downtown that dinosaurs actually work,” Grant said.

You know how you know they are alive?

"Because he's this young," Grant said. "And because he's a little dinosaur." "is

Yes?" Lexi said as she looked at the candlelight.

"Yeah. You're awake now, aren't you?" He reached out and handed her his watch.
What did he say?

"He said... fifteen."

"ok."

"That means we only have forty-five minutes to take care of the team," Tim said.

“We have to get closer,” Grant said. "I think we should get to the store now."
He didn’t know, but he knew that the skirt was stretching upwards, pulling him back .
Outside, the

"nice!" Tim said.

He walked into the sunlight with a smile. There was a nervous breakdown going on in places.
The head room was dark. Grant knew immediately that someone was watching him.
average. They’re next to the garage!

"Yes!" Lexi shouted. "We did it! That's it!" She was jumping on the couch when Grant came over.
The car was in the garage. There are doghouses along a fence. They set up the velostrator for a day.
With a glass of water. Then, they started climbing up the stairs to the roof.
Travel home.

"I'll get a burger! And fries! A chocolate milkshake! No more dinosaurs!"
Yay!” They reached the door and opened it.

So they settled down.


At the visitor’s entrance, the glass door swings open and something floats in the air.
of the leaf tip. For example it refers to the time when dinosaurs ruled the world
At one point, he screams into the air. The giant Tyransaurus robot woke up and drifted off to sleep.
His boots were in the air, his pipes and drains exposed. Outside, inside, saw
of grass, kept in the fields.

Tim and Lex approached the guards behind the metal barrier. Grant picked up his safety radio.
And look at all the streets. "Hi, it's Grant. Who's there? Hi, it's Grant."

Lex looked at the body of the guard lying on the ground to his right. He couldn’t see anything but
Legs and feet.

"Thank you, Grant. Thank you."

Lex frowned, staring at the office door. Grant held out his hand.
"Hey. Hold on."

dead? What in the world is that thing? bold?

"Yes."

How is he not black? "you

It’s not good,” Tim said.

What does 'patient' mean? | No.

The radio crackled. "Oh my God," said a voice. great? are you?

And then: "God? God?" And Eli. "I'm here," Grant said.

"Thank God," Ellie said. "Are you okay?"

"I'm fine, yeah."

What about the kids? Have you seen them?

"| kids like me," Grant said. "wish you all the best."

"Thank God."

Lex walked over to the desk. Grant returned his hand. "come here."

The radio crackled. "-n where are you?"

"In prison. In prison."


On the radio, he heard Wu say, "Oh my God. He's here."

“Alan, listen,” Ellie said. "The coaches let them go. They could have closed their doors. They could
Like a house.

"Okay. Where are you?" Grant said. "We're in S o."

Grant said, "And the others?" Mild, everyone else?

"They lost some people. But we sent everyone home."

"And do the phones work?"

"No. Your whole idea is stupid. I'm not doing anything."

'How can we solve this problem?'

"We tried."

“We must accept it now,” said Grant, “if not in half an hour .
It reaches the ground.

He started explaining about the mountain when Myrtle nodded. "I don't think you understand."
The Great Doctor. We have less than half an hour here.

"how is?"

"We have teams behind us. We have two now."

"So what? This house is uninhabitable."

Muldoon sighed, "No. You don't want the dogs to wake up."
Outside the house." The radio crackled. "-Please, throw a tree near the fence. The members stood up.
on the floor and ceiling. Either way, the piece of metal on the rear light should be
There was a fire, but the fire was unknown. They pollute the skylight.

Grant said, "Going into the woods?" He shrugged and tried to ask, "How so?"

“Yes,” said Mildred, “they cost five thousand bucks apiece.
It’s like a kid, they can get on the phone and-” The interruption was abruptly cut off.

"how is?" Grant said again.

"I think they've got another ten or ten minutes to go," Mildred said.
He entered the house with the light of heaven. And when they entered. . Ahhh, that’s it.
Minister Dr. Great.”

The radio crackled.


In the low light near Malcolm’s bed, the shells struck the first steel frame.
A report grabbed the end of the revolver and pulled, firing again. He gave her a leg up.
The ceiling light and the hanging ceiling light shone on Malcolm’s bed below. Ellie reached her bottom.
And remove the most important items from the kitchen.

"My God, they were bad," Malcolm said, looking up.

Now that the power was off, they could hear screams and the sound of screams, screams .
Their feet are on the metal as they feed the lobsters. Where there are small areas of silver.
They were hurt. She crawls all over breakfast and at the bed table.

“It’s really bad,” Ellie said. “They’ll just do it in another bar.”

Said Woo, "If only Grant had gone to the tasting room . . ."

"Bloody hell," Mildred said. He walked through the house with shaky legs. "not found
There it’s pretty simple. He can’t get strong fast enough. To get this started."

Malcolm paused. "Yes." His voice was as low as the wind.

"What did he say?" Mildred said.

"Yeah," Malcolm replied. "can. . ."

“What’s going on?”

"anxiety . . ." He raised his eyebrows.

What kind of evidence?

"Go to the side…" "Oki?"

And what are you doing?

Malcolm laughed heartily. "Warm your hands." "letter

Jesus, Muldoon said, will return.

"Wait a minute," Wu said. "Okay. There are only two answers here. Which means that
There are at least four others. We can go out and relax.”

" what is ?

"Then Grant drove to the dock and started the engine."


"And go back to the control room and start shooting?"

"really."

"No time," said Mildred. "No time."

"But if we can keep the trials here," Wu said, "they can finish
The light of heaven. It could work. It's good to see.

"My dear," said Mildred.

"really."

Who will be the victim? I'm not good. I lost my leg. "disease

Do it,” Wu said.

"No," Muldoon said. "Only you know what to do with the computer. You should
I talked to Grant earlier."

"Then I'll take care of it," Harold said.

"No," Ellie said. "Malcolm needs you. I'll do it."

“Hell, | He didn’t even think about it,” Myrtle said. "There are deputies behind you, deputies in front of the house . . ."

But he was already changing, putting on his sneakers. "Just don't tell Grant," she said.
"That's what scares you."


The hall is silent, the cool elements fading out. For several minutes, radio silence.
Tim says why don’t you talk to us?

"I'm freaking out," Leake said.

"They're looking for their own," Grant said.

The radio crackled. "Grant, ynry Wu is calling. Is he here?" "am

Here,” Grant said.

“Listen,” Wu said. "Can you look around the store where you are?"

Grant looked back through the glass door at the lush greenery and flowers. "Yeah," Grant

said.

Wu said, “There’s a path through the trees to the school building, which .
Where there are electrical appliances and cables. | Make sure you check the maintenance log.
yesterday?"

"Yeah," Grant said. Though he paused for a moment. Just learned this morning.
room? That’s how it was a few years ago.

"Now listen," Wu said. "We think we can find all the exits right here next door, but we
You don't think so. So be careful. Give us five minutes.

"Okay," Grant said.

"You can leave the kids in the restaurant for free. Don't take the radio with you
If you go.

"ok."

"Quiet before you go, so I don't make a noise outside. Let me know when you're ready."
The Hospital for Infants."

"ok."

Grant turned off the radio. Lex came back. Shall we go to a restaurant? She said.

"Yeah," Grant said. They got up and started walking in the peace of the wind. "am

I want a burger,” Leake said.

"|Don't think you don't have a fire to cook."

"Then ice cream."

"Tim, you have to help him."

"will."

"I have to go away for a while," Grant said.

"|I know."

They walked to the entrance of the tunnel. The door opened, and Grant saw the living room was empty.
Then there were tables and chairs and cast-iron doors. On the one hand, the table and transformation index, and
Gum and Bombay.

"Okay, kids. | You guys wanted me to stay here anyway. Got it?"

“Put on the heart radio,” Lex said.

"| It's okay. | I need you. Just stay here. I'll be out in five minutes. okay?"


"ok."

Grant closes the door. The dining room was dark. Lex held up his hand, "Light."
His ideas,” he said.

"It's no good," Tim said. "No mercy." Then he brought out another night light.

"You love him. What can I say?"

"Just hold my hand. I'll eat something." He allowed her to move forward. He saw the light.
Tables and chairs. On the right, a flower arrangement plate and ice cream and
dog. He holds the coffee handles.

"|I told you," Lex said. "I like cream, not coffee."

"Bring this."

"Frost, Timmy."

"No, no."

Tim put the scope in his pocket and brought the Leica into the living room. He attended
In your group. "I don't like the sun," she said.

"Just walk with me. Hold my hand."

"Then, a little later."

Behind the desk and chairs are two sliding doors with a small window in them.
Maybe they went to the bathroom. He slammed the door, and everything stopped.


Ellie Sattler walked out of the bedroom door, felt a smile on her face and
feet. His heart was pounding, even though he knew he was safe.
fence. Up ahead, he saw powerful secrets emblazoned in the paper.

But he couldn’t see much beyond the ceiling. Twelve other places around the world.
It turns into white milk. And he still hasn’t seen any results. Yes, there are bushes and trees.
He almost smiled. "Hey!" He screamed into the pillow and tried.

Muldoon leaned against the doorframe. “I think that’s possible,” he said. “You need to think .
noise. " He went out and found a manufactured hat inside. He threw
And bars are like buffet food. "Come and get it! Dinner's ready!"

"It's amazing," Ellis said. He stared up at the sky in shock. He didn’t see any answers.

"They don't understand English." Mildred laughed. "And | we hope they will accept all their suggestions. . . .

He was still afraid and the thought of being killed made him nervous. He visited the homes of his hosts.
He was barely out of high school. Muldoon returned with guns. At its peak, it was nearly finished in 1914.
Through the distance he saw a shadowy figure. rept.

"It's the customers first," Mildred said.

The dog disappeared and reappeared in the dark, but did not approach anyone.
He grins, there he is.
You start to think. If he can’t get the fans out of their house, Grant will be in trouble.

"You make a lot of noise," Ellis said.

"Bloody hell," Mildred said.

"No, this."

"| You know these animals-"

"You're right," he said. "Let me do it."

"And how do you do that?"

He didn't answer. He walked to the door. "They say retirees are righteous."

"They're good. Just a little bit, like champagne."

Are they okay?

"Yeah, then."

"They can hear that noise," he said and opened the door. Metal row, but off.
The red in there is already screaming. He closed it again and opened it with another shake.

He leaves it open.

"|I don't do that," Myrtle said. "You can do that, leave it. I'll take it slow."

"Get the magazine."

He took a deep breath in thought. "Genard has bodyguards."


"Well, yeah," he said. "Look at him." And he went through the gate.
Brushes. His heart was beating so fast he could barely touch his feet to the ground. shift.
He slowly disappeared into the fog. He was soon separated from his wife.

As you can imagine, Muldoon is starting to get pretty pissed off about it. "God damn it, girl."
The man says: 'Don't do that.

"Don't say 'girl,'" she said.

"I'll ask you for everything | I want to," Mildew whispered.

He didn't listen. He was surprised for a moment, his body moving everywhere. heart
Just 10 yards from the bird now, he could see snow drifting down as if a storm had passed.
leaves. He threw himself on the shelves. It’s like the darkness of the world. that
Fingers and toes often hurt as a result. He was shocked.

"Can you hear me?" shouted Muldoon.

How tasty are these animals? He looks at himself. Do I need to reschedule? nothing
I want a mountain, no.

They were arrested.

There was no sound.

The first mouse to turn around the bend to the tree on the left. Go ahead and
He turned and ran. The second attacks the other side, obviously attacking
She crawls, flies in the air, flails her legs and runs, staggers like a running track, and
The animal fell to the ground. Now he was leaving and couldn’t look back,
The heat causes the temperature to become very high.
Muldoon knocked on the door, saw her reach out, screamed, grabbed her arm and
He pushed so hard that his leg buckled and he fell to the ground. And then he changed
time to check first, but both bree puppies were in the house squatting.

“Good job,” Mead said. Now he crawls on dogs, crawls and walks
Their names. They threw themselves at the wall and jumped in front of it, and one of them nearly did .
above. "Col, that was hard! These clowns can fly!"

He stood, looking at the cuts and bruises, blood trickling down his legs. all
One can only guess: three clowns here. They are two eyes. It means it has a purpose.
one side.

"Please help," said Mildred. Let’s keep them!


Grant left the spectator area and went straight to the bowl. He found his way.
It is surrounded by palm trees to the west, and above it a coal storage building rises from
cloud.

There was no door in sight. Continue to the exit. in the header,
Apparently Grant is a truck driver. He stood and faced her.
The front door, locked with wrought iron, was locked. He leaned back and fired.
In the middle of the house. Up ahead, to his right, Grant saw the door. was created
with men's hats.

Grant enters the room and sits in the dark. He heard, but did not hear. committed
His radio went off.

"It's Grant," he said. "I'm in."


Wu looked at the light in the sky. Two rapes are seen in Malcolm’s room, but
He seemed oblivious to the noises outside. He went to the village window. Inside, the three
Squirrels are hunting. Eli was going back and forth, well, back
Brushes. But it looks like the Raptors don’t have the guts to admit it. Now they know
He walked, walked up and down, jumping and shouting, then collapsed again.
Use the weapon and complete the mission. Their performance received the highest rating.
Not a problem.

"Like birds," said Mildred. "I'm making a movie."

Wu shook his head. "They're selfish. They see it as unbelievable. They're not really trying."

The radio crackled. "-around."

Wu picked up the radio. "Tell me again, Dr. Grant?" "am

Inside,” Grant said.


"Dr. Grant, are you in the hospital?"

"Yeah," Grant said. “You may say that I am God,” he added.

"All right, my God. If you go through the door, you'll see a lot of cracks and crevices."
Wu closed his eyes and looked, “Because there’s a big hole in the middle .
Two story house. On your left is the freeway and a shark.

"|Look at him."

"Go for a walk down the street."

"five." He had the radio on his phone.

"After twenty or thirty meters you'll be on another road branching off to the right." "am

Look,” Grant said.

"Go this way."

"ok."

"If you keep going," Wu said, "you'll be in a set of spikes on your left. You'll be in the cave."

"|Look at him."

"Come on downstairs."

There is a long period of rest. Wu dug his hand into his pocket and Muldoon narrowed his eyes.

"Well, I'll go," Grant said.

"Okay," Wu said. “Now, there should be two big red tanks in front of you.
It means 'fire'.

"They say, 'Fire.' And there’s something at the end in Spanish.

“Aye,” Wu said. "Two efuel tanks. One of
It’s cold so let’s replace it with one. If you look below
tanks, you see a white bubble popping out.

"PVSWS.- Four?"

"Yes. PVC. Plug in the pipe and it goes."

"Okay. I'm taking him... ah!"

"what happened?"

"Nothing. | I'm shaking my head." there

It’s a process.

"Are you okay?"

"Yeah, it's fine. Just gave me a headache. It's funny."

"Keep following the stream."

"Okay, okay," Grant said. He seemed angry. "Okay. The pipe goes into a big aluminum can
with their hands in their pockets. “Honda,” he said. It’s like an engine.

"Yeah," Wu said. "He's an artist. If you go anywhere, you see a painting."
Two tables.

"|Look at them. Red and white?"

"That's it," Wu said. "Click the red one first, and move it. Click the black one
a."

"good."

There is one more position. It lasted a minute. Wu and Mid looked at each other.

"god?"

"He didn't," Grant said.

Did you take the yellow first, then the black? Wu asked.

« Yes, | I did,” Grant said. He looks angry. "I'll do as you tell me. I was
A moan and a moan, a moan, very loudly, and then the moan stopped and there was nothing.

"Try again."

«|He already did,» Grant said. "It's not working."

"Okay, just a minute." Wu rubbed his eyes. "It's like the engine is trying to break and it can't
For some reason. god?"

"I'm here."

"Go under the engine compartment where the soap bottle goes."

"ok." In one example; Grant added: “The beam goes into a black cylinder and that’s what comes out .
Fuel pump."

"That's it," Wu said. "Yeah. Fuel pump. Find a small ref
above."


"one?"

"You're supposed to push it down, with the little bit of metal you can."

"| Understood. But he was on the side, not in front of him."

"Okay. Shut up."

"It's the wind." "good.

Wait till-”

"Water's coming out now. Smell of gas."

"Okay. Hold that beard." Wu smiled at the woman and shook her head. "The bomb went off quickly. God?"

"Yes."

“Throw balls again.”

Moments later, Wie heard a small hiss and a whoosh of wind as the engine revved and
Then with a clicking sound it seemed to shut off. "It makes sense," Grant said.

"Good work for God! Good work!"

"Now what?" Grant said. His voice was aggressive. "The light isn't blinking here."

"Please return to the court, and I will speak to you about putting your plans into action."

Is that | Should you do it now?

"Yes."

"Okay," Grant said. "I'll call you when I get there." His voice was hoarse, and he was trembling.

"god?"

The radio was dead.


Tim walked through the front doors of the restaurant and into the kitchen. is
The large table in the center of the room had a large glowing fireplace to the left, and
There are also large portable refrigerators. Tim started opening the fridge to make ice cream.
Smoke billowed into the air as each one opened.

How does the fire burn? Lex said letting go of his hand.

"It's not like that."

"They all have little red lights."

"Those are the key lessons."

What is a pilot light? They had fires in their houses.

"It's okay," Tim said, opening another fridge. "But that's the point | I can do anything for you."
In another breath he sees all sorts of things, milk ju gs and wooden bottles and
Lots of slices of T ribs, pork - but no cream.

"You want ice cream?"

"I told you, did you |?"

The other refrigerator is huge. The door was a metal frame, behind which was a piano key. fluent
He grabs the bag, opens it, and sees a squirrel crawling around. A whole room.
A star a star.

"Tim…."

Do you have a minute? She said she was angry. "I'll try to make your cream."

"Timmy…there's something here."

He continued with a smile, and for a moment the last two words were unspeakable. Then Tim will take
In the freezer, I could see wisps of white smoke. Lexi sat down.
Steel worktop. She looks around the kitchen.

He heard a sound like a large snake. His voice rose and fell. I was
It won't take long. The wind may have been blowing, but he knew it wasn’t there.

"Tim," she said, "I'm scared."

He leaned against the wall and looked out. In the dark dining room,
A box of red buttons. And walking among them, he smiled .
His breathing is unique to his prey, a velociraptor.


In the darkness of the kitchen, Grant scanned the boxes and behind
ladder. It’s hard to find your way in the dark and somehow find a sound
Classify the product. He reached the exit and started to walk away when it stopped.
There was something else in the room besides the sound of the generator.

Grant stopped and listened.


Only one person is crying.

It was like Genoa.

"where are you?" Grant shouted.

"Here," Genaro said. "To the truck."

Grant couldn’t see any trucks. He peered into the darkness. He looked at her again.
eye. He saw shiny black objects moving in the darkness. Then he looked at the truck and saw
He turned his head.


Tim noticed the silence and smiled.

The Velosraptor is 6 meters tall, and very nimble, even with its hind legs and one leg.
Hidden among the cushions. Tim could just see the wound on her thigh wrapped around her with both hands.
Next to her body, her legs were parted. He could see the jealousy flaring.
back. The Velliciraptor was wary, shaking its head as it swallowed.
With powers like birds. The head also moves up and down with a
Its tail is set, allowing the bird to scratch its face.

It’s a big, ugly bird.

The dining room is dark, but it looks like the renovation could use better lighting to brighten it up
forward. Sometimes, he would duck his head and hide his head under the tables. Tim knows a
A kiss. Then his head pops up and he looks like a bird and sits upright.

Tim looked around until he realized the Velociraptor was coming from the house. Is this
About their pain? All the books say dinosaurs are harmless, but this
Turns out it can be done. Anyway, what do the books know? This is the truth.

And he drew near.

Return to the kitchen.

Is there anything here? Lex said.

Tim didn't answer. He placed it under the sink in the corner, next to the big blue sink. fluent
He rushed over and shouted angrily, "Stay here!" And put it back in the fridge.

He grabbed a red knife and tossed it to the door. He put it down first.
The steaks were on the floor, and he ripped off one plate and handed the second. ...

Through his vision he saw Lex staring into the distance. He grumbled behind his back. fluent .
Meat three, and four, I went deep into the kitchen.

His voice rose, a clenched fist shut the door, and his broad cock poked out at his gaze.
Take care of your body.

The Velliciraptor stood in the entrance of the hospital.

Tim was standing in the backyard, near the blacksmith shop. but
He had no time to hide; The head and neck extend above the table;
He was in control of the Velociraptor.

Slowly, Tim lowered his body and sank under the table. . . . Velostrator shook his head.
He turned around, looking at Tim's expression.

Tim sighed. He was, but he was thinking of making a change. that

The velociraptor lives in the entrance. A kiss.

It’s so dark here,” Tim said. It doesn't look good. This made him gasp.

But now he can put on a raincoat and look in the mirror.
The dinosaur eats in silence, lifting its head to reveal its guts. that
the velociraptor looked at him again and tilted his head to the side. There’s a lot going on.
Broken bones.

Tim felt his heart skip a beat. In some ways, it’s hard to make such an animal.
Kitchen, near the open garden. Meaning, meaning, meaning, meaning.
breath...

He was probably more afraid of bears than of Tyransaurus. Tyrannosaurus was a
He is tall and strong, but he is not intelligent. The Velostrator is the fastest vehicle ever made by man and is
She was clearly quick and careful; Tim dreads search terms because they are valuable search engines.

Cyclesport buried it. He then walked away - from the current Lakers! You have to clean it.
right! Tim's heart sank.

Velocirapport was frustrated. Gradually, he became interested.


He had a dream.

Tim wanted to scowl and look under the table, but he didn't move. It is done in black.
Half frozen, he heard the sound of their curses. It was eaten by a dinosaur. Bones and all.

Rator raised an eyebrow and looked around. frustrated. The second dream. fluent
He slowly walked forward. He looked at the ground.

attention.

He didn't eat the bread.

His head was shot off. Tim's brows were caked with sweat, but he didn't move.

Why didn't the animal eat the second piece of meat? Eleven ideas run through his mind.
And he did not like the taste of beef, nor pork, because it was bad.
My life, I love Jean, I love Lex, I love Tim, that Tim

The Velisiraptor now moves faster. He saw the third piece of meat, lowered his head, and looked away.
We are moving forward.

Tim held his breath. The dinosaur was only a few feet away, and now Tim could see the little
He clings to the bones. He saw red blood on his hands and feet.
He could see strange cracks in broken furniture and raw clothing.
The growl under his breath.

Cyclesport buried it. He shook his head and looked at Tim. Tim almost fainted.
afraid. Tim's body was dry and sore. He looked at the dogs moving around the house.
Another kiss.

"He caught me," Tim recalled.

Then the head pulls back and the beast enters the fifth stage. Tim
I mean, Lex please don't change please don't change anything you don't...

Velliciraptor cleared his throat and looked at him. Now open the freezer door.
Tim scooped up the smoke and threw it on the ground next to the animal. huge
He kicked his left foot, then kicked again. The dinosaur comes in two sizes. It’s so cold,” Tim said.
Not moving, cold, not moving, not moving….

The dinosaur came.

The head was gone, then the body, then the tail.

Tim walked over and leaned against the metal door and opened it.
He stuck to the first thing! He didn't close the door! The velostrator grunted ominously.
noise. Without a word, Tim pulled the cover, locked the door and
Listen to be caught up! Closed!

Lex! Lex! She almost screamed. You’ll hear the rapper knocking on the door, you’ll hear him
bed. He knew there was a piece of steel in it, and if he let go of the wheel, he wou
The door opened. They should be destroyed. "Lexi!"

Lex was at his side. "what do you want!"

Tim leaned against the doorframe and locked it. There’s a pin! Little Pin! carry.
rock!

The Velostrator growls like a horse, and its growl is like polished metal. Everything falls apart.
Her body in his mouth.

I can’t see anything! Lexi shouted.

The pin is inserted near the doorknob, riding on a metal frame. "ok
there!"

“I don’t look good!” he shouted, and Tim realized he wasn't wearing pants.

Think about it!

He saw her small hand reach out to touch his throat and pull him closer.
He could hear how panting he was, his breath ragged as he held Pin.
And Velostrator knocked on the door and cursed-God forbid-but no
Ignoring him, she turned back to look again, and Tim closed the door .
further. Lex stepped forward and reached out into the darkness.

"|There you are!" Lex yelled, grabbing Pin by the arm and pulling him into the corner. He pulled away.
Take it out again.

"From the top, down!"

He grabbed her again, lifted her onto the chain, and twisted her around his wrist and down. urban.

Closed.


The Velostrator shouted. Tim and Lex return to the portal and the dinosaurs attack.
Inside as well. Each time they hit, the metal walls shattered, but they kept going. Tim didn't do it.
You think the dog can open the door.

The raptor was hiding.

He took a deep breath. "Come on," he said. fluent

She took his hand and ran.


"You should see him," Jannard said as he drove Grant to the hospital .
building. "It must be twelve. The committee. | must go by truck to .
Separate yourself from them. They were all in the air. That’s where we hid and waited like skeletons.
But they fled when she came.

"The performers," Grant said. “Don’t push something that looks and looks strong.
Attack something dead and about to die. No matter what, he's not going away."

Now they were climbing to the door.

What happened that made you jump? Grant said. "|None

Find him,” Janrod said.


tour?
"| He doesn't. | He's gone, | I think it's because he's hurt. | I think Meade is on her knees and
He’s bleeding, he’s here. so. . . | I don't know. Maybe go back outside. very good


He died here. | I don't know.
"And you're welcome," Grant said.


Woo looks out the bedroom window. They watched him walk.
I'm fighting for Ellie. This trend continued for a long time and amounted to 100,000.
It’s pretty straightforward. It’s like he’s trying to get Eli’s attention, the century.
He was trying to help them.

Wu has always been fascinated by the behavior of dinosaurs. And well:
It is responsible for DNA damage, such as protein synthesis. You don't think so.
However, creativity can only be measured in limited ways, such as creating an animal.
It interacts with a nutrient to control an enzyme. But in general, the main characteristics
They don't understand. You don’t have to look at DNA testing.
to describe his creation. That’s impossible.

This is Wu’s study in DNA. It’s just a shame that
Today, a designer can repair an old clock. He was doing something.
The past is something made in old ways and following old rules. You didn’t
Learn why it works the way it does, and has been debunked and debunked so many times .
Evolutionary forces over time. Thus, as the operator is defined as
He checks that the clock is working correctly, Wie does the fixing, and makes sure that the animals
He demanded firmly. And he just tried to cover up his bad behavior:
Electrical wiring or hanging wire pipe installation. These are the products they sent.
Please go to website.

And the latest study gives us a glimpse into dinosaurs.
park. He didn’t know that animals were behaving.
Complete history or not. Were they doing the same thing they did before? It was open.
That’s an impossible question to answer.

Although Wu doesn’t say so, it seems likely that dinosaurs evolved.
This is a great example of his work. Animal life is essential.
In a practical sense; It shows that Wu can play all the parts. eventually-
He created a million-year-old monster to replace the monster.
He does not live in himself.

But, even as he looked at the outer windows, he stopped their movement.
Raptors are smart, and even smart animals are easily misled. Member animals also grew
opinion, and

Harding walked out of Malcolm’s room and down the hallway. Where is Illy?

"right."

"Please. The guards are at the headlight."


"when?" Wu said walking towards the door.

"It wasn't just a moment," Harold said.

Wu opened the door. be! Home now!

She looked at him, confused. "No problem, everything is under control..."

"common!"

He shook his head. "I know what I'm doing," he said.

"Now, Ellie, no way!"

Muldoon did not like to face the open door, he almost said;
He saw a shadow fall from the sky, and now he knew what had happened. I
Just as he walked out the door, Muldoon heard Ellie scream. Mildred came to the door and
Looking up, he saw Wu lying on his back, body pressed against his chest.
And that victory rears its head when Wee’s spirit fades away, even though Wee is still alive .
He reached up and tore open the huge chunk he had been eating while
He’s still alive, and Ellie takes off her gloves, starts crawling faster, and
Muldoon closed the door and looked puzzled. How quickly that happened!

Harding said, "Did he fall through the roof?"

Muldoon shook his head. He walked to the window and looked out and saw three menus.
Now he walks faster. But they did not follow Eli.

They circled back and forth, down the sidewalk.


Grant came to the dressing room door and looked out the window. can
I could hear the ribs snapping and it sounded like they were screaming. Now he could see them.
People are moving forward. They walked to the auditorium.

He turned to Gennaro.

Gennaro shook his head, no.

Grant leaned over and whispered in her ear. "No choice. We have to activate the computer."

Grant got off the couch.

After a while, Zener followed suit.


Eli didn't stop thinking. When the pieces fell off the cliff, they landed in the w
He runs to the ceiling. There is a five-meter
The long distance between the harbor and the house. He ran, not hearing the animals following him, only
She heard his breathing. He pulled the shade and saw a tree growing in front of the house.
And he cried, and took the staff, and stood up. epic. He felt well rested because
He saw her feet, picked them up, and placed them on a branch .
Moreover, he held it in his lap and stood up straight.

He was twenty meters down and the Reapers were still down and
As he drew near to rest, he saw the first owl on the wall. be
He was covered in blood and chunks of flesh were falling from his mouth. Immediately he went and shook her hand.
To the left, perhaps, you can see the ceiling. He looked at the ground.
further.

Two retorts climbed the tree.

Now from home, he saw the mountain only four feet away and .
From the light above the glass-top was the city gate; can
Go inside. With a lot of effort, he jumped into the air and landed
cave. He rolled his eyes, but it was just a happy feeling, like
The game he played, he wanted to win. He ran to the door leading to
A century later, he still hears the responses of vibrating branches. They are still
Inside the tree.

He reached the door and knocked. The door was locked.

It took him a moment to process the situation. The door was locked.
He was riding a horse, and he couldn’t get out. The door was locked.

He knocked at the door heartily, and ran upstairs, thinking that .
See one way down, but only the water side shows the wind
mist. The entire edge of the pool was polished. Twelve concrete slabs. Then more
You pulled away. No trees to shade. There is no fence. There is no access to fire.


nothing.

Ellie smiled and easily pulled the keys out of the box. flee.
He was expecting there to be another door, but he didn't know.

People slowly approached and followed him, walking silently through the glass pillars.
He looked at the ground. Ten meters from the edge of the bridge.

It’s pretty straightforward.

The answers were coming to him, and he wondered: wasn’t it always like this?
way? Small mistakes can ruin everything. He was always smiling, always happy and
Just as he didn’t believe this catastrophe was coming, he didn’t believe that now was
Your life is about to end. It seemed impossible. He is in safe condition.
cheerful. He never believed this would happen.

The Raptors are excited. Ellie turns around and pulls him down. He took a deep breath.
And he started running for the door. As he ran to the side, he saw the cat.
The lake, he knew was very high but he thought, hell, it jumped.

And he fell.

And with a sigh of relief he felt himself in the darkness of his spirit. He was in the water. fluent
He'll do it! He came to the ground, looked up and saw the windows showing
He fell. And he knew if he could do it, so could the Reps. The air changed.
Water is water, can reptiles swim? But he was confident they could. might
They traveled like pirates.

The gatekeepers returned. And then you hear Harold calling
"father?" He realized he had opened the door. The cakes are beautiful.

He quickly climbed out of the pool and ran to his room.


Harding went up the stairs twice at the same time and opened the door.
I thought. "Sather!" he shouted. And he thought. There was a black gap between the pyramids on the roof.
Answers are not recorded.

"Sather!"

He is very impressed with Stirling and soon makes his feelings known. fluent
He must see the beast in his mind. The next hour, he broke a finger.
Near the door, he felt a pain in his leg;
He hesitated, shutting the door with his hand and listening inside.
Muldoon said, "He's here. He's home already."

On the other side of the door, a red bell rang, Harding pushed the door open again, and
He reached out, closed the door with a metal lock, and left.
below.


"Where are we going?" Lex said. They were watching from the second floor. glass-
The wall runs the entire length of the house.

"In the living room," Tim said.

Where is he?

"Here on the side." Tim looked at the names written on the doors as he passed.
they. These are just like offices: public services come to Park Ward. .. general
Head... Director...

They come in a glass case marked with this symbol:


Open body
Only authorized users


Against this background.


There was a security card, but Tim just opened the door.
How is it done?
"It's over," Tim said.


Why go to court? he asked.

"To get a radio. We need to call someone."

Beyond the glass doors, the living room is quiet. Tim remembers this place and looks at it.
He was there during the tour. Lex approached. In the distance they are.
inflammation. It was as if the monsters were approaching. Then Tim heard footsteps.
The mirror is on the floor.

"They're…" Lex muttered.

"last but not least."

"What are you doing here?" Lex said.

"For now."

Park Ranger... Duties... Head Attendant...

"That's it," Tim said. He closed the door. The castle was just as he had always pictured it.
before. In the center of the room is a console with four seats and four computer screens. that
All the rooms were black, except for the television, which displayed different colored tiles.

"Where's the radio?" Lex said.

But Tim had completely forgotten about the radio. He stared at the computer screen.
Screens are on fire! This is not as good as it sounds -

"The power must be restored... ."

"Ick," Lex said as he rubbed his stomach.

"than."

"|It's in someone's name," he said.

Tim wasn't up when they entered. He looked down and all he could see were her ears.
He was on the ground.

“It’s definitely different,” Leake said.

"last but not least." He threatened journalists.

Where’s the rest? She said.

"You can't be a thing now."

He looked at the TV reluctantly. There is a collection of their work online:


"Well, don't worry about it, Tim," she said.

"Don't worry, | it won't hurt."

Before he saw computers as expensive as those sitting at home .
His father worked for him. These devices control everything from elevators to security and
Heating and cooling systems. They look - different colored dots - but they
It’s not hard to understand. And there is almost always some semblance of help, if needed.
Kenko’s lesson, however, doesn’t end here. He looked back to see.

But then, he noticed something else: the numbers in the bottom right corner of the page. they
Read 10:47:22. Then Tim knew it was time. It’s only thirty minutes away.
the boat-but the people at home are worried.

There is a cross. He looked around and saw Lex holding a radio. He was sleeping.
Bottles are bottles. "What am I doing?" She said. "It's not working right."

Give it to me!

"It's mine! | I got it!" "as

For me, Lexi!" "I will.

first!"

"Lexi!"

Immediately, Radio Fora. "What's going on!" Muldoon's voice.

Suddenly, Lex turns on the radio.


Grant sighed and buried his head in the thick trees. In that animal he could see.
The hyenas howled and roared and clawed at the lions’ dens. but,
Between sobs, they opened their mouths and turned their heads, as if they heard something distant.
And then it makes a little noise.


What do they do? January said.

"It looks like they're trying to get into the restaurant," Grant said. "What's in store?" "am

She left the kids there. . ." said Grant.

"Can they break this glass?"

"|Don't worry about it, no."

Grant looked around, and suddenly heard the sound of a radio cable and horses cracking .
We jumped in the wrong direction. They ran on each other, until
When he saw the first of them, he jumped to the second floor and from
On the second floor of the hotel.


In the office on the fourth floor, Tim picked up the radio Lex was holding. fluent
Close the paper. "Thanks? Thanks?"

"-And you, Tim?" It was Muldoon’s voice.

"I am, yes."

"where are you?"

"In the courtroom. Fire burning!"

"Okay, Tim," Muldoon said.

"If someone tells me, I'll do it." There was silence.

"Hello?" Tim said. Do you hear me?

"Ahh, we have a plan for that," Mood said. "No one, uh, anyone here knows how to do this
that. Computers are very flexible.”

Tim said, "What, are you kidding? Nobody knows?" That’s different.

"I don't." I do. "I think it's about being a superstar. Being a superstar... you
Doing anything on the computer, Tim?

Tim looked at the paper. Lex shouted. "Tell me, Tim," she said.

"It's true something. | They know one thing," Tim said.

"Maybe you want to," Muldoon said. "Nobody knows what I'm doing. And Grant doesn't
in computers.

"Okay," Tim said. "I will." He turned off the radio and looked at the screen to read.

"Tim," Leake said. "You don't know what you're doing."

"Now | do it."

“If you know how to do it, do it,” Leake said.

"Just a minute." To start, pull the chair next to the keyboard and press
The parents of the body. These buttons rotate through the circles on the screen. But it’s not
done. Then he tapped the other buttons. The code is not changed.

"good?" She said.

"Something's wrong," Tim said, his eyes wide. "you

I just don’t know, Tim,” she said.

He looked back at the computer and saw. The keyboard has a touchpad.
On top of the lenses, like a computer monitor, the camera is big and bulky. but
The control room is no joke. Tim looked at the edges of the paper and saw something wrong.
red light areas.

Yellow, nearly below the tip. .. what does that mean? He raised his eyebrows.
He walked towards the light and saw a white glow wrapped around his body.

He touched the screen and listened to the beep.


After a while, the screen went out and the primer came back on.

"what happened?" Lex said. "What did you do? Touch something."

really! He thinks. He grabs the page. A caught script! black fire.
The pressure sensors should be near the wall. Tim had never seen such a screen, but he had read about it.
about them in the book. He caught it.

DESTRUCTION/DESTRUCTION.

Suddenly, the tone changed. Update has arrived:


The computer will now be connected.
Follow the steps on the first page.


On the radio, they heard people screaming. "|I want to see you," Leak said. "You can do it
Look at the VIEW."

"No, Lexi."

"Well, | I want VIEW," he said. And before he could reach his hand, he grabbed VIEW.
The page changes.


"Ooh," he said.

"Lex, are you going to cum?"

"protect!" She said. "I'm done! Me too."

Throughout the construction, viewers literally watch the various parts of the park shift;
Most of the pictures are blurry due to fog outside, but one shows outside
In the hall, there was a frog on the wall.
It shows a ship in sunlight.

"What's that?" Tim said as he leaned forward.

"than?"

"That's the picture!"

But the picture changes, they see the ceiling, one.
In the corner of a room, he then saw Malcolm sitting on the bed-

“Give it time,” Leake said. "| Look at yourself!"

Tim pressed the button several times and entered the side menus. and various menus.

“Take time,” Leake said. "You look… ."

"I don't know about their computers!"

Now there is a collection of images on the screen. One of them is called THE SAFARI ROOM: LV2- .
4. REMOTE mode: Port (VND). He refreshed the page several times.

Video images came from TVs around the house. One pointed to the bottom of the mountain of good deeds.
It’s the bottom of the sea. In the distance, Tim could see the mud houses on the beach, and the harbour. fluent
He recognized the mine from a helicopter flight earlier in the day. I was
terms. It looks like the train is only minutes away.

But the view curves in the opposite direction, revealing the inside of the Safari building;
Gray fog. The goats were by the graves, but turned their heads and
Down, into the light.

And, in the third episode, he sees it in the light. Malcolm lay in bed and
Eli stood by his side. They both looked at each other. As they watched, Mildred entered.
And he joined them, looking thoughtful.

“They watch us,” Leake said.

"|Don't worry."

The radio crackled. On the way, Muldoon lifted a radio to his lips. "Are you okay, Timmy?"

"I'm here," Tim said.

"Oh, we don't have much time," Muldoon said sourly. “Please turn on the power supply.”
Then Tim hears the nurse's voice and sees the head fall.
Glass, in the photo above, holds his hand.

Quick, timmy!" Lex said. "Shoot!


network;
Tim suddenly realizes he was involved in a sexual assault and tries to


Return to the main screen. Most systems only have a return or command line.
home screen, or go to the main menu. But these deeds are not known—or unknown. also,


He was sure there was some helpful information written on his device, but he couldn’t find it.
Also, when Leica yells and screams with his body, the sound is distressing.

In the end he won first prize. He didn’t know what he did, but he did. fluent
he thought, searching for words.

"Do something, Tim!"

Will you close it? I am looking for help. He picked up the BIG BAG. The page loaded.
A more intricate table, with plates and buttons.

forbidden. forbidden.

Selects the COMMON INTERFACE option. The script changes:


"What's that?" Lex said. "Why don't you draw the curtain, Tim?"
He didn't hear. The information compiled in this context is called “data.” You got the INFO.


"Timee," Lex said, but he had already pressed FIND. He saw another unpleasant window. fluent
He turned it back.


On the radio, he heard Muldoon say, "How you doing, Tim?" He didn't hesitate to answer.
Danger, you hit the balls one after the other.
Suddenly, without warning, the main screen came back on.


He turned to the TV. The main grid and SETGRIDS DNL can both be configured
There was something in their way. It is stated that prevention/treatment and intensive cessation will
It’s also important. He listened to the nurse. He had to make a choice. He put
SETGRIDS DNL, ​​and when he saw:


He didn't know what to do. The STANDARD PARAMETERS box is removed.


Of course the opposite.


Bus Park B4C6 Outside Bus C2D2.
Reference Solution BB07 Reference Board R4R4.
Lori Tips F4D4 Mantle Tips E5L6.

Large area C4G7 Design range D5G4.
The structure of AHB5 A of AlCl


A circle that has not been tested.
Security networks are left alone.


Tim nodded heartily. It took him a while to realize that he .
Important information. At least you know some ways to go now! Press relay F4.


Force Level F4 (Safari Hotel)


DO NOT use DIRECTIONS. 505
(POWER is not associated with COMAND ERROR.
See pages 4,094.11)


"I didn't see it," Leake said.
"|I know!" He pressed another button. The screen went out again.


D4 Power Room (Safari Room).

DO NOT use DIRECTIONS. 505
(POWER is not associated with COMAND ERROR.
See Table 4.094.1 1)


Tim tried to stay calm and think it over. For some reason, it was always a big problem.
Each time the story tries to drop a bomb. He noted that the government and
He gave instructions. But what does that mean? Why are there health inequalities?

"staff . . ." Lex said, holding his hand out.

'Not now, Lexi.'

"Now, now," he said, pulling her out of her bag and pants. And then a
He listened to the nurse.

He was walking outside.


The light behind Malcolm's bedroom barely obscured the second metal bar.
Now they can put their heads in any glass tray and jump up and down
People of the world. Then, after a while, they separated and started eating with their hands.
"It won't take long now, three or four minutes," Malcolm said. Pressed the radio button:
"Tim, where are you? Tim?"
There was no answer.


Tim looked out the door and saw the Velociraptor at the end of the corridor, standing behind it.
The balcony, looked disappointed. How did it get off the farm?

Then, as he looked, a second owl nodded, and he recognized it.
The message has yet to appear. He was walking outside. He will go to heaven.
Come on, downstairs. The second leg fell straight down and rested on the carpet. Tim didn't
Believe in Him. The huge beast flew over ten feet into the air. More than ten feet. The legs should be there.
Very strong.

Lexi said, "I thought you said it was wrong-."

"Chhh." Tim tried to think, but he looked at her with a curious look as the third
the raptor is off to the ballet. The animals wandered down the road for a while and
They start on the same page. They were getting closer and closer to Lex.

Quickly, Tim slammed the door behind him and returned to the court. But here
He hid it. He finished the story.

"We're trapped outside," Lex said quietly. "protect." He showed me the security card.
near the door. A beam of red light appeared. Under certain conditions, security doors work.
"Damn, we're trapped outside!"

Tim looks out the window. He saw many doors, but they all had yellow lights.
beside. That means all doors are closed. There was nowhere else for them to go.

Then he saw something down the sidewalk. The dead guard. is
His chest was covered with a white security card.

"Come on," she whispered. They ran to the garage. Tim held up the map, and turned around. but
But when people saw him, they screamed and blocked the way to the control room.
They start pulling, kicking the air out of the way and attacking Tim and Lex. Their heads.
He started to fall into a rhythm.

They were looking forward to fighting.


Tim did the only thing he could. With the card, he opened the nearest door to his room.
And he drives a Lexus. The portal slowly began to shut around them, screaming animals shrieking and
pay.


Manic


Lan Malcolm took a few lightning deep breaths. He looked at the windows with wide eyes.

Harding took his shock, rubbed his eyes, and put it back. Ellie Sattler was buried in the cemetery;
He looks confused and angry. Muldoon sat on the floor and leaned against the wall. Hammond is looking for

Before him, there were no words. They all listened to the radio.

What happened to Tim? Hammond said. "Is there a word?"

"|I don't know."

Malcolm said, "Bad, they're not. Really bad."

Hammond shook his head. "Who do you think you are."

Ellie said, "Like Malcolm said."

"|I've thought about it," Malcolm said. "I don't think so."

Hammond was delighted. "It wasn't so bad either, after all. He said I told you a few hours ago. But I did."
Nobody wants that to happen.

"It's not about whether you want it or not," Malcolm said with his eyes closed. He called quietly to
Drugs. "That's what you think you're supposed to do. When a body goes flying in the snow
into the woods to find food for his family, is he threatening to take over the city? No, I thought it was weird.
below. He didn’t know how to read, and couldn’t help it. Pray for the nations,
The nature of the forest protects it. He prays because he knows he has no control over it. is
His grace.

"But I think you can't be at the mercy of the state. I think you should criticize the government and leave ."
Then you will be in great distress, because you will not be able to do it. However, he made some choices.
Tell yourself to do it. And you don’t have to — and you shouldn’t — or you shouldn’t. You can’t help it.
stuff. You can build a wall, but the sea you cannot. You can build a plane, but
The air is bad. You are not as strong as you think.
believe."

"I'm broken," Hammond smirked, "where's Tim? So .
The child was scared.

"I believe he's trying to solve the problem," Malcolm said. "Just like everyone else."

"Grant too. What happened to Grant?"


Grant made it to the front door of the clinic, for which he had been waiting twenty minutes.
before. He holds her hand: closed. Then he saw a small red lump. check
Doors work too! damn! He ran upstairs and passed
He crossed the secondary door and stood in front of the guard's desk where he was sleeping.
I listen to your radio. He went to the chicken coop, looking for chickens, though.
The restaurant was closed and the kids had left.

He went upstairs and then came to the far end of the room where the device was marked and there was a door .
Closed. He needs a security card to leave.

Grant couldn’t move.

Somewhere along the way I heard the cries of the responders.


A tail of rain caught Tim's face, his tail connected to his throat, and Tim was able to roll to his knees.
She screamed in fear.

"Timmy!" Lexi shouted.

Tim pulled away again. The little velociraptor sat on his back and grinned.
She screamed in fear. Tim and Lex are in one of White’s bedrooms. On the ground were creatures: they moved
Red bottles, bottles and plastic straw.

"That was a baby bump," Lex said, pointing to the creature attached to Tim's neck.

The beast buried its head in Tim's chest. The poor thing is probably starving Tim
thought.


Lex pulled him closer and the boy grinned into his lap. He smiled in his head. "why
Can you do that? She said. "afraid?"

"|I don't know," said Tim.

He goes to the raptor to help Tim. The baby cried and screamed and screamed.
And he sat on his chest contently, watching his head bob back and forth. There is no hope .
This small difference makes sense and-

"Timmy," Lex murmured.

The door was not closed when they entered the bathroom. Now, in the
of the next beat. First, and second.

The baby was crying and squirming on Tim's shoulder. Tim knew he had to do it.
clingy. A child can learn from them. After all, he was a child. He put the child down.
The animal was removed and immobilized. The baby slid between her legs.
Adults. The first goat opened her mouth and gently sucked the baby out.

Tim grabbed Lex's arm and pulled him into the kitchen. He had to find a way to
leave-

There was a scream. Tim looked back and saw the child in the old man's lap. is
A second velostrator came forward, took off the boy’s leg and tried to
The first day. The two friends wrestled with the children as they chewed. He bled out.
She fell to the ground.

"They ate it up," Leake said.

Animals will fight other children, biting and nipping at each other. Hey Tim
The door—opened—and he walked over, pulling Lex back.

He was in another room, and realized he was outside.
DNA Extraction Laboratory, High Resolution Acoustic Microscope
One page shows black-and-white photographs of animals. His legs and feet are what they are.
Dinosaurs ate for millions of years and spit out blood, and now blood is being reintroduced .
A dinosaur in the park. They ran into the lab and Tim could hear them screaming and yelling
The men followed them, approached, walked into the lab and passed.
There must have been a knock on the door, because in the chimney a loud knock sounded from time to time.
he shouted, and the lights above their heads flickered brightly. As he walked, Tim fell.
He walked through the darkness and back into the darkness, the sound faint, hearing the dogs barking.
he shouted as they chased after him. Lex rolled over and screamed. Tim sees another door ahead and
He pushed the door open, walked towards her, and slowly.
Then something big happens and Lex screams in terror.

"Rejoice, children," said a voice.

Tim looked at him in disbelief. Dr. Grant in the house. Next to Mr. Genaru.


In the shadows, it took Grant two minutes to realize the spy was dead .
You probably have a security card. He came back and took it and placed it on top of her.
Cordova, so we can get straight to the Core. He followed the tone of their answer and saw the soldiers.
They fight in court. She was sure the kids would go next door and
Now go back to the crafting lab.

And that’s where he met the kids.

Now that repertoire continues. The animals paused for a moment.
He was surprised at how many people showed up.

Grant yanks the children out of Genora's arms and says, "Put them somewhere else."

"but-"

"That's it," Grant said, glancing over his shoulder into the distance.
A room, if you can. You should all be safe out there.

What will you do? January said.

People stood at the door. Grant sees that all the animals are waiting.
Together, and traveling as a team. Easter servants. He was shocked.

"|He's got a plan," Grant said. "Now open fire."

Gennaro sends them to the gardens. The Russians flash quickly to Grant, passing
The mainframe, not the hosts attached to the computer


code. People come forward unconcerned and protect the villages and come
Heads.

Grant heard the door close behind him and looked over his shoulder. Everyone was standin
On the other side of the glass door, look outside. Genaro shook his head.

Grant knew what that meant. There is no back door behind him. Genaru et al.
Children were enrolled.

She felt alone now.


Grant quickly pulled himself together and walked towards the lab, away from Gennaro and
baby. There may be another door next to the one that says TO LABORATORY.
Whatever that means. He had an idea, and he thought it was true. The door with the green.
Biomarkers. The answers will be coming soon. Grant freaked out, knocked on the door and
He walked away, and there was a thud, a thud.


He was shocked.

Yes.

Where he wanted to be, where he wanted to be: under red lights, with lots of tables and bars .
Whites and some blacks. The pictures on the panels are in shape and color.
Black jumps next to their table and onto the floor, where he disappears.
difficult.

Grant sprinted down the hallway and into a gloomy laboratory with glass walls obscuring the lights of his cell.
His eyes sparkled. He looked around and saw the tray, a cup full of cake, cake.
plate . . . All laboratory work.

Retorts entered the room slowly at first, breathing the air and looking away .
Sliding side panel. The dog wiped blood from his mouth on the back of his hand. Cancel.
Pictures pass between the long screens. The animals came from the house.
On a more subtle note, you stop occasionally to look at the notes.

They were looking for him.

Grant looked, walked to the lab, looked and saw the metal box.
They are represented by muscle and bones. The label says WARNING for A4 size mice.
There are several benefits. Grant thought the Regiment said they were in force.
poison. Only a few missiles were killed. . . .

Kate was sitting at the operating table. Grant couldn’t put his hand in his pocket.
He tried to open it, but there was no door, no handle, no way to see. . . . Ross the Great
Quickly, and you look around the large room. The managers move between tables.

He smirked at the captain. The silver cup is on the table. so
as a closed inner circle. He lifted his head and saw a table.
He threw it away.

With a growl, Capone jumped to his feet.

He saw before him crystals and balloons the size of heads and horns. fluent
Try the following: CCK5 5... TetipaAlpha Release .. . Temolevin X1612. ... o
The liquid glows yellow in the lamplight. Nearby, he spotted a bucket of water.
The particles are small, each containing a small amount of volume. It makes sense.
Green light, Grant reaches out and grabs the agent. The needles on the beads were cleaned.
LIGHT. He raised his eyebrows. He looked at the small chair.

He rolled his eyes. on their answers.

He’s been studying dinosaurs all his life. Now he saw what he really was.
a. Velociraptors were small carnivorous dinosaurs, similar to oviraptors and dromaeosaurs.
Animals have long planned to steal hands. Like some special birds they eat the eggs of others.
As for birds, Grant always thought velociraptors would eat dinosaur bones if they could.

He leaned against a nearby table. Slowly, he raised his hand in the snow.
He brought a large potato to the table and smoked it. The leaves can be used as foot cream.
It is decorated with a small piece of rose. He took the drink carefully as he inserted the cord.
and the removal of the cross-section. The egg glows green.

Grant collapsed again. He saw Retorts feet under the table and the red one smiling.
She left the table. He threw the beast on the ground to chase the demon away. that


the raptors turn around, hear a loud buzzing noise and head off.
Then slowly they started to run.

The Fen stopped somewhere in the nearest Retort.

damn!

Grant did it all over again: reached for the drink before opening it, downed it and blew his nose.
on their answers. This time, the ball rested on the back of a Velociraptor. He was shocked.
Push with your feet.

The journalist looked in awe at this new offering. He stopped and heard her voice. fluent
He kept his cock with his mouth on the ground for a while.

And he wasn’t worried about it.

The Velociraptor is rebuilt and quickly climbs up, flying away. fluent

It doesn't work.

Grant brought a third egg and froze new burritos. He caught the steaming drink.
His hands, running k Then he threw this one up as fast as a football. The fire goes out.
Going under the roof is a must.

The hero hears his call, sees him coming, and follows him.
Something moved, she moved between the cushions, grabbed his shoulder, and walked over to him. setting
He picked it up and struck it in the chest, breaking the stone.

The message fades out, and a white disc falls from his mouth. He opened his mouth wide and rolled his eyes. is
And he hit the ground, but it didn’t hurt. She was ready.
They also eat fish. Grant looked up to see what was going on. . . .

Across the room, the Gnome looked at him. He looks at her.

Velisiraptor yelled in horror. She smiles at Grant, then pauses in the room.
It’s a pretty straightforward process. Grant was shocked to see what was happening when he stopped.
The creature made a screeching sound and the monster screamed, and its massive body lifted off the ground.
His head hit the ground with a thud. The data still makes the noise.
It is followed by different systems sometimes. Death came out of his mouth. His head fell back.
And left. Tail bent and twisted.

Like that, Grant thought.

However, he wasn’t supposed to die anytime soon. It seems to take a long time to die. Grant looked away.
The stomach- and noticed that the other retorts in the room had been burned in half. They heard the story.
of a dying animal. One raised an eyebrow, then another and another. The first animal.
He turned to face the fallen journalist.

The deadly retort now trembled, and the whole world trembled. He screamed innocently.
So much saliva came out of his mouth that Grant couldn’t see his head. He went
He threw her to the ground and screamed.

The second man looked at the downed creature and looked at it. I'm sorry about that.
Death and He stones over fire and earth with his grinning mouth.
nerves and feet, .. .

And he took a spear in his hand.

The dying hero howled and raised his head and coughed and dipped his tail in the sand.
About his fear.

It was both, Grant thought.

And the beast stood still. Blood spurted from his nose. He cleared his throat.
his sword, and with the same blow tore the head of the prostrate beast. The leaders
His bones drooped like a lamb’s. The sound of a dying car filled the room. attack
He shrugged, as if the fight had suddenly gotten harder.

He crossed the room and jumped on the bed! Grant looked at her from
the raptor was pulled back, the shiny object slipping from his grasp.

That makes two.

The second leg immediately stretched, straightened, and lurched forward. That will be
He brought out a table. There were a lot of eggs running all over the place. Grant was looking for them last year.
The war.

There was still a third wave.


Grant has two suits. If the center of the door is pointing at the ground, it should be
Another generation. He was trying to decide what to do when the last beast scratched its tail in anger. extend
The journalist turned around.

The final answer won’t last long, just watch. And then there’s
forward. I’m not looking for that. He walked up and down, looking first at the corners of the tables, and then at the heads. fluent
It’s refined, and for the price, it’s not the best display on the market. is
It’s a beast now, he warns. He didn't look at Grant. Grant looked around for a moment.
There was no room for it. I do nothing to.

Grant’s eyes were fixed on the raptor as he slowly walked to the side. Grant also survived. He decided to
He kept some distance between himself and the reptile. smooth . . . smooth ...
Put yourself in hand...

Her thumb pulls his face into her left thigh. His breath came in ragged gasps.
With networks.

Grant licks the sweat off his fingers, the reds licking the soles of their feet. fluent
He listened, feeling for the radio button in his pocket.

radio.

He took it out of his pocket and threw it on.

"Hi. It's Grant."

"god?" Eli's voice. "god?"

"Listen," she said. "Just talk."

"Alan, is that you?"

“Speak up,” he says again, pushes the radio to the floor, away from it, and walks away.
news in progress.

He ran to the foot of the table and paused.

"Alan, talk to me, please."

Then with a smile and a short word. Radio silence. The reporter leaned forward and shouted softly.
breath.

Radio silence.

“What’s wrong!” Have ye not yet understood? In the darkness the knight approached her;

"... god?"

The sound of the radio emanated from the beast loudly. He sniffed the air, as if he could feel it.
There was someone else in the room.

"Oh god, it's me. | I don't know if you can hear me."

Now he leaves Grant and goes to the radio station.

"God... please..."

Why didn’t he turn on the radio? The retort is closer, but a bit more nuanced.
The giant approached. Grant could see a bunch of lights and a flash of light.
Stains of dried blood on the paper towel. It makes the body smell good.

"God, please... . God?"

The announcer paused as he turned to the radio and watched. The scene changes.
of Grant. The bottle landed on Grant’s head. Grant shrugged and folded his arms to his chest.
of the body of the snake, and remove the poison.

The velostrator grunted and took off. He turned to Grant, his hand.
wide. He leaned in, pressed his nose against the table leg, and raised an eyebrow. The table was turned.
Away, and Grant stumbled back, now completely stunned. Rotter should continue
His head flickered in the dim light, shaking like a doctor.

"god?"

The man stepped back and raised his leg to protest. Grant stops and Sean pulls him back.
Underneath, it was white. He felt a sharp pain in his chest, suddenly on fire.
Blood was dripping from his shirt. He threw himself on the ground, cleared his throat, washed his hands, gave
forward. The man pulled back, turned off the radio, and looked at the flames. She cried out in pain.
And when he knocked a third time, Grant reached the wall, went nowhere, and the beast disappeared.
Feet one last time.

And then he disappeared.

The animal breathes. The air rushed out of his mouth.


Gennaro and the boys enter the house. Grant tells them to stay. The girl looked at him.
The mouse was dying and he whispered, "Wow."
Genaro helped Grant out. Everyone smiles and walks towards the courthouse.


ride


Tim was surprised to see that the screen in the control room was bright and shiny. Lex said.
"what happened?"


Tim sees Drs. Grant looks at the TV and reaches for the screen. "|
I don’t know about computers,” Grant said, shaking his head.

But Tim is already walking the line. He quickly grabbed the stairs. In Video
They watched and watched the ship approach Puntarnas. Now there are only two dozen.
A little up the hill. On the next line, he saw the building, the windows in the ground .
top. On the radio, he heard a scream.

"You did something, Tim," Leake said.

It retains the SETGRIDS DNL function, even though it has been deprecated.

the script returns:


NOTE: Automatic control disabled (MAINTENANCE AUX POWER)


"What does that mean?" Tim said.

Genaro held up his hand. "It's happened before. It means it's a complicated relationship. You."
You have to give it your best shot.

"| Do it?"

Pick up the ELECTRICAL MAIN.


Tim shouted.

"what are you doing now?" Grant said. Every piece is polished.
Tim got MAIN.

Nothing happened. The screen blinks.

Tim pulled the MAIN GRID P. He beat his chest in fear.


The power cord does not operate / for backup power only.


The screen is still black. Holds NATIONAL SET 1 .


Save the energy.


All the lights in the room were on. Every piece loses its flavor. "Hi! Good!"
Tim decided to RESET GRIDS. The lay hing continued for a while. He saw the video.
monitor, then return to the main screen.


Grant said something Tim didn't understand, he could just hear the disgust in his voice. eventually
He looked at Tim and paused.

Tim could feel his heart pounding in his chest. Lex shouted at him. He didn't want to see it.
There is no ad on TV. They hear music in the room and
The wild animals shouted. She heard Malcolm say, “Oh my God….”

He took the LODGE.


Specify the GRID NUMBER to assign.


For a moment he didn't remember the numbers, but he
F4, and hold it.


You will now find the F4 GRID LODGE.


In the video, he saw flames pouring out of the building.
The hotel room. The field glows yellow. Lex yelled "What did you do!" But it stands out almost immediately.
The shadow came back, and they saw that the rounds were caught between the embers, going .
And he screams into the blazing fire and Mildred and the others scream, their voices .
On the radio that.

"That's it," Grant said and patted Tim's shoulder. "That's it! You did it!"

Everyone stood there stunned as Lex said, "How was the ship?"

"than?"

"A ship," he said and pointed out the window.


On the page, the houses fronting the mountain are much larger and go
On the right, as the ship turned left, she prepared to depart. He saw the workers leave the side.
The action closes.

Tim returned to his room and stared at the ceiling behind him.

He turned to the TV. Mobile VBB and Mobile RSD are both based on
The same goes for smartphones. Released TELKOM RSD.


There are 23 calls and/or messages.
Want to buy them now?


He took NO.

“Maybe this group is an experiment waiting to happen,” Leake said. "You're good to go
phone number!"

He didn't hear.


Enter the desired NUM13ER code or press F7 at the DIRECTORY prompt.


He pressed F7 and the names and numbers were displayed on the screen, which was
way. It’s not alphabetical, and it takes some searching to find it.
He asks:


WC An B. (Cold) 7083902


Now, all he had to do was figure out how to track the phone. Threw some balls on the floor.
screen:


Sleep now or after bed?


He pressed DIAL NOW.


Sorry that your request did not go out as expected.
{error5981}
Please try again.


He looked at her again.

He heard a voice, and the figures shifted.
competition.

"that?" Grant said.

"Okay, Tim," Lex said. "But they can get there." In the script, they can
First stop of the ship at the Port of Puntarenas. They heard a loud bang and then
Ken said, "Uh, hey John, this is Freddie. Are you reading me?"

Tim grabs the phone from the car, but all he hears is his phone ringing.

"Uh, hi John, is this Freddie?"

"Shut up," Leak said.

Now they make phones, they call all the phones out there, but they only listen to phones .
wait. Finally, Tim noticed a phone sitting in the middle of the console with a bright red light.

"Uh, hello, Col. This is Freddy. Will you help me?"

Tim picks up the phone. "Hi, this is Tim Murphy, and | I need-."

"Uh, say it again, I don't understand John."

"Don't leave the mountain! Do you hear me?"

There was a pause. Then a voice said, "He looks like a baby."

Tim said, "Don't waste any more time! Get back in the boat!"

The sounds were distant and inaudible. And Murphy? It's another word.
"They didn't give me a name," he said.

Tim looked at the others. Genaro reached for his phone. "Let me do it. Please."
Do you know his name?”

There’s bad news on the scene. "-it could be a joke or - it could be a song
nothing."

Tim was doing the tape, so he probably knew who it was.
Freddy came. . ...

"Can you hear me?" Genaro said into his phone. "If you haven't heard me, answer me now."

“Son,” she replied gently, “we don’t know who you are, but you’re not okay and .
We will succeed and we have work to do. Now, please introduce yourself or get out of this
channel.”

Tim looks at his desk at Farrell, Frederik and, (Captain) reading.

"Do that a second time, Captain Fair," said Gennard. "If you sink this ship
If you go back to this island right away, you’ll find that you’ve unlocked the 509 leather item.
Maritime Act, to forfeit his liability, fine and fine of five millions.
$50 and up to five years in prison. Do you hear?

There was silence.

"Do you think so, Captain Fair?"


And then, far off in the distance, they heard a voice say, "I will," and another voice say, "All is ahead."
The boat began to drift along the shore.

Lexus started crying. Tim sank back into the chair and wiped the tears from his face.

Grant said, "What's with the law of the sea?" "who

Do you know what that means? Jannard said.

Everyone watches TV with interest. The ship was sailing away.
coast.

"|You think the worst is over," Gennard said. Grant shook his head. "Of course," he said.
He said he was just getting started.


The seventh time


“To move forward, accountability will require courage.”
Look at the consequences.”


Hi Malcolm
It’s ruining the world.


They took Malcolm to another room in the bedroom and onto a clean bed. Hammond thus repeats;
And he began to touch it, and he was satisfied, "Well," said he, "at least the accident was averted."

What does this mean? Malcolm said excitedly.

"Well," said Hammond, "he's restless and hits the ground."

Malcolm sat in a corner. Are you worried about that?

"That's really it," Hammond said. "These animals don't have teeth that can
Go ye, destroy all the peoples of the earth.

"You bastard," Malcolm said angrily. "Do you have any idea what I'm talking about?"
on? Do you think you can shrink the universe? "Oh my, how strong you must be."
Malcolm jumped on the bed. "Don't touch the ground. Don't move."

"A lot of people believe," Hammond whispered, "that the world is in danger."

"No, that's not it," Malcolm said.

"Experts all agree that our planet is in trouble."


Malcolm sighed. “Let me tell you about our country,” he said. “We have four and a half planets.
A billion years. Life on this earth is long past. Three billion eight.
anniversary. The first attack. And then the first animals had lots of land, and the first ice
construction, offshore, onshore. Then there are certain types of animals - amphibians, and
Dinosaurs, plants, everybody lived for millions and millions of years. Big Government.
Trends evolve, deteriorate and die;
And there are great earthquakes, high mountains rising and falling, meteorites, volcanoes .
Volcanoes, seas rise and fall, the whole earth moves. . . It's relentless, relentless and violent
change . . . Even today, most of the world’s geothermal energy is of two types .
Soils have been eroding and eroding in the Himalayas for millions of years. that
The universe was completely frozen in time. We’ll really miss him.

Hammond rubbed his eyes. "Just because a lot of time has passed," she said, "doesn't mean
always. If something bad happens to their ancestors. . ."

"Let's assume that's true," Malcolm said. “Suppose there was a bad flood with all the trees and
Animals died and the Earth warmed for hundreds of millions of years. The lives of ten
Somewhere - underground or preferably in a driveway. And after all these years, when .
The world is no longer safe and life is fragile again. progress
Work will resume. It may take a few billion years for life to return to normal.
and takes the current system. But the land is strengthened by war.
Life was lived in our pain. It’s just us,” Malcolm said, “I don’t think so.”

"Well, is the ozone layer depleting," Hammond said.

"There's a lot of UV radiation reaching the ground. What about that?"

"No. It can cause skin cancer."

Malcolm shook his head. "Veterans are good for life. Very strong. Very strong
change. “One type of life can be increased by increasing vegetation.”

"And a lot of people die," Hammond said.

Malcolm sighed. Do you think this is the first time this has happened? You don’t know
With the wind?

"| Know that life is short."

"It's now," Malcolm said. "And oxygen is toxic to proteins. Gas is very pronounced
fluoride, which is used to make glass. The first step in oxygen formation is the formation of beans.
The evolution of the plant cell — said to be about three billion years old — has had a profound impact on all other life forms on our planet .
spirit. These plant cells have high environmental and thermal integration. they
He let out a defensive gasp and took a deep breath. There are few planets as big as a carnival.
percentage of oxygen. On land, oxygen levels rise dramatically — five, ten, finally.
Twenty-one percent! The air on earth is filled with pure poison! And life isn’t perfect! "

Hammond was beaming. "So, what do you mean? Today's dust will be
also?"

"No," Malcolm said. “My point is that life on Earth can take care of itself.
Folks, a hundred years is a long time. A hundred years ago, we didn’t have cars and
Planes, computers, hair. . . . It’s a different world. But for Earth, a
One hundred years is not enough. A million years is not enough. This country lives and breathes simplicity.
A very large number. Not to mention that his music is amazing and powerful, we’re not mad.
be. We’ve been here only a little bit. If we left tomorrow, the Earth would go
Don’t forget us.”

And we need to go,” Hammond said as he took a deep breath.

"Yeah," Malcolm said. "We could be."

"So what do you say? Shouldn't we attack the place?"

"No, of course not."

"So what?"

Malcolm sighed and looked away. "Let's be honest. The world is not in danger."
We are all in danger. We cannot destroy the world and we cannot save ourselves. But we can
We have the power to save ourselves.


under his rule.


It lasted four hours. the Moon of the Sun; The sun is setting. The air conditioning came back.
In the courtroom, the computer works well. Are they coming soon?
Of the 24 people on the island, eight have died and six are missing. Guest
Both the center and the safari lodge are in bad shape, and the south end is better
Dinosaurs. They called the San Jose police, for help. Costa Rican National Guard
on the way, and the air ambulance will take Malik to the hospital. But on the phone,
The guards in Costa Rica have been vigilant – no doubt the strikes come and go .
between San Jose and Washington before aid could be sent inland. And now
It’s been under construction for a long time—if the helicopters haven’t arrived, they’ll have to wait until then .
morning.

At that point, nothing gets through. The ship was returning; The group has
They saw three little horses fly to the dock and shot them .
Animals. On Nublar Island, things were worse, and everyone was from both sides.
Visitor center or hotel. Tim did it on the computer and off he went.
A new body.





All Animals 292
Masters was found waiting.

Thyroid 2 1
41

Mysore 22 20
2?

Stegosaurus 4 1
3.9.

Trichrobe 8 6
3.1.

Procomycoagulant 65 , 64 .
2

Othniel 23 15
3.1.

Cycling 37 27
2?

Page 17 of 12
3.1.

Hadrosaurus 11 5
3.1.

Dilophosore 7 4
43

Petersburg, 6 5
43

Hypsilofodent 34 14
2?

Top 16 9
4.0

Styrosaurus 18 7
3.9.

Calphosaurus 22 13
41
292,203


What am I doing now? January said. "Now you're saying animals are scarce?"
Grant shook his head. "bridge."
“The Jurassic Museum would be great,” says Ellie.


What does it mean?

"balance." Grant pointed to the spies. In one of them, hypsolophodons swim.
Windmills like the Velociprit entered the arena from the west.

"The boats were out for hours," Grant said. "Animals mate
other. regions peaked during the actual Jurassic.

"|I don't think that should have happened," Genard said. "Animals shouldn't have
mess."

"No, no."

In the next segment, Grant watches a team playing on a field
weighing about 4 tons for Hadrosaurus. Hadrosaurus was afraid to go oq and was attacked by a predator.
In the corner, he grabs his head, and another runs forward, kicking and kicking his leg.
They smiled at him and wiped his cheek with their kiss. Within minutes, it was six on six.
Feed large animals.

Grant looked at his wife.

Can you imagine that? Ellie said.

"|I don't know what to think," he said. He looked at the TV. "No, not really."

Muldoon said quietly, "You know, it looks like all the adults are out now."

Grant didn’t give the first one much thought. He just looks at the people he sees, at their interactions.
A big dog. To the east, a stygosaurus wagging its tail, snarling
The tyrannosaur, who had been watching him, was shocked, and occasionally poked him in the leg .
notice. Forty Southerners fought among themselves.
He opened and closed channels. A scared animal.

"We've got an hour left, Dr. Grant," said Muldoon. "If you want to try u
Put your finger on it.

"Okay," Grant said. "am."

"|You're sure," said Mildred, "if the Costa Ricans come, you'll have to .
This island should be a problem for invaders. Something disappears quickly.

"Okay," Gennard said.

"They're painting in the air," Muldoon said. “Maybe napalm, maybe lighter gas, too.But.
It came from heaven.

"|They must," said Jannard. "This training is very important. All animals must be in this training
So, and so far better.

"It wasn't right," Grant said. He rose to his feet. "Let's get started."

"|I don't know if you understand, God," Janrod said. "I think it's a lesson, too
bad. It must be destroyed. All animals on this planet must go extinct, so
Costa Rican officials are doing just that. | We think we should leave it to them to make up their own minds. do you
Don't you understand what I'm saying?

"Okay," Grant said again.

"Then what's wrong with you?" January said. "It's military necessity. Leave him alone."

Grant’s eyebrows went up, where the reporter sighed. "No," she said. “We have to be careful
fluent."

"Leave it to the experts," Gennaro said.

Grant recalled seeing Gennaro drunk and scared for about six hours in the 1990s.
The cab of the truck and the hm. Suddenly he got angry and hit her.
The lawyer got up and looked out of the window. “Listen lady, you have a reason for this.
stuff and start doing it.

"|Like," Genora said softly.

"No, no. You lost your right from the start."

"hell-"

"He sold out to investors in a company you didn't like. You had a
The work is not done. You're not going to call someone you know.
You know it’s a lie and you let this guy get away with something he shouldn’t.
Technology in human affairs. I think you should quit your job.

Genaro was invited again. "Well, now I'll explain."


"No," Grant said. "You're going too. You can't do it." made
Genaro sighed. Grant was furious with Muldoon. "What do we have?"
Weapons?

“We’re taking some turnovers and it’s not good,” Muldoon said.

"How cute are these shirts?" Grant said.

"It's like sharks. They have submerged conductors, they swim
hold. More weight, less power. We can’t know, but it could be dangerous.”

"It wasn't right," Grant said. "Not on the board."

"What's good?" Genaro said as he snuggled up. "The voice of the mouse."

Ellie said.

"What does the Report think?"

Grant said, "Found a bad radio?" "am

Yes,” said Mildred.

"Give me one. And is there anything else you can do?"

Mildred shook her head.

"Well, you can have what you want."

Muldoon got out. Grant was furious with Gennard. "Your theory is nonsense, Mr. Gennard.
Theory is a problem. It needs to be cleaned. But you shouldn’t do that until you know.
mess. And this leads to the establishment of bridges in the mountains. And then parts of the retort. II does not
negative. We need to find them, meet them, and experience their efforts. We need to count
All animals were born in that country. Then we can burn it. But first, we have some work to do.”


Ellie looks at the map on the wall showing the current locations of the monsters. Tim works.
keyboard. He read the paper. "The summit is on the west side, where the
The land of the mountains. They may like fire.

Is there a place under the village to hide?

“There,” he said. "There's a lot of water that could be used to control the flood."
Western ways. Lots of land. Water and honey.

Grant shook his head. "So that's where they'll be."

Ellie said, "I think there's a beach." He looked at the consoles and
He said, "Tim, you're going to show us the source." Tim didn't listen. "Timmy?"

Hide in the mountains. "Just a minute," she said. "|There's something."

"What's that?"

"It's an empty warehouse. I don't know what's in there."

"So he might have a gun, too," Grant said.


They were all inside the school, closing a door and locking it.
Sunlight, showing the drops falling over the city. "Arnold," Mildred said as
He walked through the heels. "He needs to know I'm always here."

"Probably not," Grant said. "He didn't try to get here."

"Well, Hammond knows. Somebody knows."

Where is Hammond now?

"I'm still in the living room."

They reached the top of the building, close to the electric gas lines that supported the roof.
In plastic cups. They shine their torches around the room, watching a lot of chaos.
glass cube, two feet high, with metal lids. Grant could see the tiny blue ribbons in the cubes. fluent
It’s like walking into a room full of giant peppers ran,” he says.

Muldoon opened one’s trunk, reached in, and pulled out a parrot. 4 Replace it with light.
His eyes widened. "I'm hurt."

"What's that?" Grant said.

"Mr.12," Muldoon said. "It's nerve gas. It's signs."
The bomb."

"Let's go," Grant said quietly.


"I love it," Leica said, laughing. parking in neighbors’ garages near Fit
raptor that Grant had placed around his neck. You pull the raptor towards the sandwich.
The monster waves his hand.

"I'll be safe here," Muldoon said. "They must have made an honest mistake."

“I love it,” Leake said. "His name is Clarence."

"Clarence?"

"Yeah," Leake said.

Muldoon clutches his left shoulder with a small piece of metal sticking out. He sees Grant
Distant music in his ears. Is there anything wrong with loving an animal?

Lex was still controlling the Raptor and reached the building. "I thought you'd let me take over," she said
said.

"|I didn't move," said Mildred. "They didn't do enough." "am

It will take me time,' she said.

So Muldoon gives the necklace to Lex, and he pulls it out for him to pet. so
She said softly in Bengali. The news broke as Leica hugged her.
And he bound her in his bosom. Then he stirs the beast and changes again.

"I'm skeptical," said Mildred. "is

Truck,” Lake said.

"The other answers aren't enough," Mildred said, smiling. "The animal will
different. Anyway, she asks Grant, “If they’re all born female, how do they survive?”
You didn’t describe that in Bor’s DNA.”

"It's not Born's DNA," Grant said. "It's reptile DNA. But weird things happen."
In fact, it is documented in the literature on animals. also West African animals, with | delighted."

"What is this seed?"

"Sexy change," Grant said. "Yeah, just a dress change." Grant explains that a
Many common plants and animals change sex during life.
Orchids, some fish and plants, and now minerals. Chickens build their arms to lay their eggs.
He can change in a few months into a complete person. First they took the fight.
The male reproductive system regulates male fertility, producing hormones and
Their male hormones increase and they can eventually get pregnant.

“It looks amazing,” Gennard said. "What are you doing?"

Those changes are caused by the environment in which each organism lives.
Men and women. Meanwhile, some pirates have started to split
A man for a woman.

"And you think that happened with dinosaurs?"

“That would make the right decision, of course,” Grant said. "I thought that happened. Now,
Shall we get this one?


Once they were inside the Jeep, Lex pulled the Raptor out of the cage. The dog is happy.
He almost joined their team. He gave her one last peck on the head and released her.

The animals don’t move.

"Go, Ci!" Lex said. Go home!

The man got lost and ran into the woods.


Grant grabbed the lever and pulled the trigger. Mildred sews. The car is moving.
The main road, going south. Genaro gets angry at Grant and says, “What happened to the bottle?

"Nobody knows," Grant said.

"But | I thought you'd bury him."

“I miss the smell of a dinosaur,” Grant said. "But all water is displaced by the force of gravity
A thousand years. We made referrals, investigations, but nothing is known.
Feathers like that.

Grant hears the noise and tells Muldoon to go into the sunset. It seems like a lot u
According to Ellie: The north end is at the top of the south mountain.

Grant shook his head. "A lot of people don't know what a disability means," he said. He found himself frozen.
It refers to particular animals such as rabbits and lizards. Even their quality of life
It's not clear. In fact, American fisheries have been studied much more extensively and


Unlike animals, only the female is expected to care for the baby, that is until it is born. male
The alligator spends most of the early winter sleeping next to the female in pairs, gasping for fresh air .
about his experience and added other examples of women being made to feel uncomfortable.
reception, which made him shake his head and threaten her, while lying next to her, he gave
male. When she died two months later, the man was gone. and
Although women maintain three-toed heels, the
It shows that he didn’t plan adequately on time and left his head on time.
The young birds begin to chick and abandon the nest. So, a little squirrel in the forest
He started life alone, so his stomach was full of shit.
Food in the early days.

"How is it that the older elves don't take care of the young ones?"

"It's not what you think," Grant said. “Both parents abandoned their children.
There’s a kind of group protection. Young Alicorns are intelligent;
He would challenge anyone who would listen - human or not - and attack them with the most powerful attack of all time.
It is not a symbol of fear. Every disease.

"letter." Gennaro sighed.

Grant added, "But this is a back in every sense of the word." "example,
The biggest challenge facing the algorithm is egg collection. Snakes are always in the shadows. is
A temperature of ninety-eight degrees Fahrenheit will kill a chick egg, so the mother goes
It protects the feathers from the cold.

"But dinosaurs aren't toys to us," Muldoon murmured.

"Okay. Dinosaur bones can move."
Meaning of animal-"

"So you did say you didn't know," Janari said angrily. "You don't know what
What was that smell?

"No," Grant said. "I don't."

"No," Gennaro said. "Most of them are experienced."

Grant didn't know. You can already smell the gas. and a string called
Tacre body.


The floor is hot, Genaro thought, as he walked forward. She was really on fire. And here is
The ground fell into the ground. And the sweet, sulfurous smell screams.
A good plum goes. It’s like walking through paradise.

He saw Grant moving with his head down, listening to the sound. Give it to
The children’s colorfully printed shoes and Hawaiian shirts looked beautiful. Genaro didn't remember.
correct. He’s afraid he’s going to this place with the bounty on fire, and the Velocitrators are somewhere
around. He didn't know how Grant would blame him.

Or a woman. Satler. He was playful too, just watching her in a good mood.

Aren't you afraid? January said. "| Meaning, are you hurt?"

"We have to do it," Grant said. He didn’t say anything else.

They all made it to the tube. Genaro grabbed the cigarette butts.
He had put it in his mind. He smirked at Ellie. Why doesn’t he think about it?

"Okay," she said. "But think about that for the rest of his life."

Genaro shook his head and thought about what to do. If anything he
He’s been all his life. He thought it was no problem.


Grant blinked into the sunlight. In front of us, among the bushes, an owl twirled and screeched.
they. Then he ran away.

"Is it a woodpecker?" Ellie said.

"| Think about that. Or. Children, whatever."

And he said unto him, Wilt thou go against us?

"bridge." Ellie told him how the bells played against the wall to remind him when .
The other went home. If true, this behavior indicates good judgment.
Almost all forms of life exist in space. In the past, it was thought that the ability to develop and maintain software was
It is known in just three species: chimpanzees, monkeys, and humans. Now there’s this.
It’s possible that dinosaurs could do something different.


The figure returned and leapt into the light, then ducked back, smirking. Of course he did.
As he sent them.

Genaro frowned. "How accurate are they?" She said.

"If you assume they're birds," says Grant, "then you should be concerned. Recent studies show
Gray skin is champagne brown. And chimpanzees can
Use language in a positive way. Currently, researchers are focusing on the heart.
A three-year-old is growing, but their intelligence is not fully developed. Sleeping people can
Cool theory, yes.

"But I've never killed anyone in the kitchen," Genora said.


In the distance, they could hear the rushing of water in the valley floor. Boats on boats .
Behind them for a while, and looking up at a stone wall. The little girl disappeared on a rock.
And then he left.

"Where did he go?" Ellie said.

Grant heard a whistle. The voice stopped. "eventually."

As they walked, they found a small opening in the center of the rock, like a bird’s nest. I was
It can be on two legs. As they watched, the little girl smiled and waved in front of the
LIGHT. Then he ran away.

"It's no good," Genaro said. "I'm not going anywhere."

Grant said nothing. He started drinking with Eli. Fortunately, there was a small video about it.
The camera is connected to a handheld camera. He took the camera out of its case, turned it on, and turned it on.
urban.

"You've never seen anything like this," Gennard said.

“Give him time to adjust,” Grant said. There was enough light in the sky for them to see.
The walls were pitch black, and suddenly, all of a sudden, the abyss opened up. In the cloud,
He heard a voice. After that, the storm came. More voices for more people
Animals.

"Like a snowflake, right," Ellis said.

"But you can't see anything," said Gennard. He placed the bandage on his hand.

"No," Grant said. "But | it worked." He listened to the timer for a moment and then pulled out the camera.
He threw it to the ground. "Let's get started." He leaned against the tree. Ellie went to
Darkness and silence. Grant wears a face gas mask and disappears.
Instead, he throws his foot back.

“You can’t go much worse than that,” Jannard said.

Grant shook his head. "I don't like that. I'm going first, then Ellie, and then you come last."

"Now, wait a minute," Zener snapped. "Why don't we cover the bones?"
Where do the bombs fall, did you hit them first? Isn’t that the meaning?

"Ellie, do you have a torch?"

He handed the gun to Grant.

"how is?" January said. "What do you say?"

"I don't want anything better," Grant said. He followed her to the cave. "You never knew anythin
Did you die of lead poisoning?

"I don't..."

"Sometimes it comes in spasms. Those are bad."

"No, I'm sure you don't like it, but-"

"Look," Grant said. "We're going into this cave to look for missing monsters. If
Kill the monsters first, and something will land on the monsters in their mouths, and we’ll be done.
It’s about seeing what’s out there. So we don’t have to.

"but-"

"You are of rats, Mr. Gennard."

"|Nothing."

"Your money screwed up. Your work screwed up. You helped build it. Your accounts. And you
You can’t kill them just because you’re in the ring now.”

"I'm a little nervous," Gennaro said. "I'm scared of c-."

"Follow me," Grant said. Ellie gave him a wink. He spent more than
Stems, and leaves. "nice."


Grant sighed and rubbed his hands over his face, causing a scream.
And he walks.
The mouth of the rabbit is ugly and black.


"what happened?" Gennaro said, confused.

Ellie looks in the kitchen and hears a crash. He put
radio, he said quietly, "Alan?"

There’s a big difference. Then they heard the words, “Here I am.”

"Is everything alright, God?"

Another great feature. When Grant spoke, his voice sang
He was lost.

"Everything is fine," he said.


Standard approx.


Back in town, John Hammond wanders into Malcolm’s house. Hammond was unfazed.
And it’s not good. Since dropping the ring last summer, Malcolm has taken it by surprise.
coma, and now looks to Hammond that he might actually die. Yes, that helicopter.
It is called, but only God knows when it will come. You thought Malcolm might die.
At that moment, anxiety and fear filled Hammadi.

And, of course, Hammaud made all the mistakes because he didn’t like the president.
quite. It’s worse when that person is your friend. Hammond contemplates Malcolm’s death
If so, that would be the ultimate help.

Anyway, the smell in the room was delicious. That’s unfortunate. The human foot
meat.

"The whole ... protest.. ." Malcolm said and rolled onto his back. "is

experienced?” Harold exclaimed, shaking his head.

What did he say? Something about ghosts? "am

He didn’t catch it,” Harold said.

Hammond always makes a move. He lowered the window to let in some air.
Finally, he couldn’t take it anymore and said, “Do you mind going downstairs?”

"|Don't worry, no," Harding said. "I think this place is beautiful."

"Well, look, I'm just walking outside."

"Okay," Harold said. It controls the absorption of antibiotics into the bloodstream.

"I'll be right back."

"good."

Hammond stepped out into the sunlight, wondering why he was so upset.
For Harold. After all, this man was her employee. Hammond never talks about himself.

He walked through the gates and looked around the park. It was almost midnight.
When the rain cleared the air, and the sun came out again. Today is evening, and
Hammond found it a challenge. From what they were saying, he knew they had a secret for his park. and
Even though that idiot Gennaro smashed it to the ground, it didn’t work.
contrast.

Hammond knows that on both sides of the station, there are many others in Palo Alto.
The kids are old. It wouldn’t be a bad idea to pick them up again, on another island, somewhere else next year.
All over the world. And if there are problems here, next time they will be addressed
The war. Such is the study. To end injustice.

Upon reflection, he realized that Wu was not the man for the job. Which ten
He was obviously very proud of his hard work. And Wu was very shocked.
Through a development program. Instead of building dinosaurs, he wanted it to be perfect.
on them. Hammond thought it was Parker’s fault.

we.

Also, it should be noted that John Arnold was not eligible to hold the rank of Chief Engineer. Arnold
It was beautiful, but ultimately boring and annoying. fluent
He didn’t like it and he didn’t care. These are important things.


In fact, neither Wu nor Arnold had a successful career, Hammond said.
Those differences. It’s a good job to create something.
park where kids climb the rides and enjoy the view and come
They lived in their storybooks. The light of truth. They look to the future. type of storage.
The tools to make the decision follow.

No, Wu and Arnold did not do the work.

And in this case, Eddie Regis is the bad guy. Harding did not respond.
choice. Mildred drank… .

Hammond shook his head. It will be better next time.

He smiled and went to his room and followed the small hallway leading east.
From the living room. He walked over to an employee who shook his head. Hammon wasn’t
Put your head down. He saw how Tikan’s crew was destroyed. To be honest, it really is.
This island near Costa Rica is incredible. I don't do that.
further-

When he arrived, the noise of the dinosaurs was startling. Hammond remained stunned for a while.
He stumbled down the street, and when he looked back,
He walked through the trees near the waterfall, bouncing on it.

What is T-Rex doing here? Why is he inside the walls?

Hammond felt a little angry: then he saw a butler, running to save him, and
Hammond took advantage of the opportunity to escape, running towards the blind man on the other side of the fence .
On the road. He was in the dark - he sank to the ground, his face covered with sweat.
but the ground, a little to his feet, ran before him, fell again, and then ran again.
further. Now he was coming down a steep hill, and she couldn’t explain it. fall.
He couldn’t stand anymore and rolled on the floor barefoot before falling asleep.
assembly. He was thrown face down into the deep, warm, adjacent water and ran for it.
nose.

He lies dead in bed with his eyes closed.

afraid! This is huge! He had to go to your birthday party! Hammond said solemnly.
For himself. When she woke up, she felt a sharp pain in her right arm and tears rolled down her cheeks.
He agrees, though: it will break. He decided to focus all of his following on
finish. Yes.

He didn't leave.


Back at the courthouse, Lex tells Tim, "I want them to join us at the hospital."

"We're very excited, Lex," Tim said. "We need to be here. Hey, listen to this." fluent
Press another button, and a tyrannosaurus sound will echo in the musicians
park.

"It's fine," Lex said. "Better than that."

"You can do it, too," Tim said. "And when you pull it out, it gives you a tingling sensation."

"Let me go," Lex said. He pressed the button. The tyrannosaurus regained his composure. "We can do it
How long will it last?”

"Okay," Tim said. "We're just changing the business here."


Sitting at the bottom of the mountain, Hammond hears the Tyransaurus roar and roar.
issue.

Jesus.

He gasped, hearing that voice. He was afraid to shout into the rest of the world. He waited.
To see what happens. What does a Tyrannosaurus do? Did he find the servant?
Hammond waited patiently, listening only to the chirping of the woodland cicadas, until he knew he was getting .
Breathe, take a deep breath.

Because of his injured leg, he was unable to climb the mountain. He had to wait inside.
foot. When the Tyrannosaurus arrived, he asked for help. This time, he’s not surprised
here.

Then he heard a voice say, "Come on, Tim. | You saw it too. Come on. Let me
Copy that sound.

baby!


The Tyrannosaurus came rushing back, but this time there was a stronger thrust and it was
echo, meaning finally.

''Good morning,'' said the little girl. "Do it again."

These are kids!

Cannot take small children. It’s just a problem for them
beginning. Nobody wanted them around - Hammaud just took them because he thought
He tries to stop Genaro from destroying the resort, but Genaro is devastated. and
Obviously the guys broke into the control room and started causing trouble now that they let
that?

He felt his heart race and his breathing quicken. He forced himself to laugh.
relax. There was nothing. Although he couldn’t climb the mountain, he couldn’t fly .
Hundreds of acres of forests and pastures. Hammond sat in the tub.
At the bottom, he hears noises in the woods around him, and after a while, he begins to cry.
to help.


Malcolm's voice was more than a whisper. "Everything is different ... on the other side,"
She said.

Harding approached. "How much more?" You think it’s Malcolm talking.
dying.

"It changed . . .," Malcolm said.

"Butterflies?"

Malcolm didn't answer. His left lip twitched. "Hell," he said at last.

"Did their paradigms shift?" Harold said. He knows that systems are changing. In recent years,
New ways of achieving educational change. “model” and another
Language refers to a symbol, but people say, language refers to something, a worldview. mom
Worldview. It’s been said that a paradigm shift happens whenever science makes a major breakthrough
It changes the world. These changes are rare and only happen once.
century, Darwin’s breakthrough brought about a paradigm shift. Quantum mechanics breaks down
little change.

"No," Malcolm said. "Not... the size."

“Don’t worry…what….

Harding sighed. Despite all this, Malcolm quickly became restless. your
It was very high, and they were given antibiotics.

What don't you see ?

"Everything," Malik said. "Because . . . there's everything . . . on the other side."

And he laughed.


perfect


"You're hurt," Genaro told Ellie Sattler, looking at her shoulder.
prison, waving his hands in front of him. "You don't want to do that!"

He laughed. "Okay," he said. He waved his hand and
Stand on the right side of the window. And he walks in it.

The line is black.

Gennaro started coughing. He yelled at Muldoon, who was standing next to the Jeep. "I don't
This, he said.

"You're right."

"|That's impossible. | It's not fair."

"I've been waiting for you," said Mildred. "You have to do it."

“Jesus knows what’s going on underneath,” Gennaro said. "I'm telling you, I can't."

"You have to do it."

Gennaro sighed, looked out the window, and looked down. "It's okay. I can't do it."

"|Don't do it," said Mud. He used waterproof plastic. Do you hear a word?

"I don't do much," Mildred said. "It's okay to die. He'll bless you, after all
Your body feels good. But it’s generally harmless. It’s not just about religion. but,
So the population is very small.


Genaro looked at the board. "forbidden."

"| in my opinion you had better go and look after these animals," said Mud. "And you don't have to leave."

Genaro returned to the cave, the door in the floor. Then, a
Mildred, standing behind him, is huge and unsteady.

Gennaro smiled and started walking towards the exit. away
It’s a small trail, but the closer you get, the bigger it gets.

"That's it," said Mildred.

Genaro returns to the pool, but it’s too dangerous to walk.
Travel - The idea of ​​going into the unknown had too much on him - so at the last minute he went
And he went, and climbed up into a house, and spread his hands and his feet.
Because he needed to see where he was going. You poured juice on his face.

He crept forward, walking through the darkness, avoiding the walls.
He stepped into the darkness behind him, the walls creaking and cracking.
He complains of gradually worsening chest pain.
He blew air to his lungs and he could already feel the water change.
A little back, he slowly adjusts his body, while breathing heavily, checking the points beforehand.
Face, great pain.

Then, suddenly, the ship became quiet, still, and Genaro felt .
Bad ground, roads, and air. Surprised by the freedom, he grunted and turned around.
concrete.

And he broke it.


The screams are dark. His hands clenched and stretched forward to make a sound. that
The air was thick as a mountain.

"-ok?"

"Pretty good, yeah." "is

My breath. ... ."

"correct."

His hand caressed her face. And Eli. Can you hear him? He sniffed.

Why is everyone screaming? She said. "because." He left.

Genaro turned, scowled, and quickly stood up. He looked down as he looked down at her.
Darkness. But the first thing he saw glowing in the dark was her eyes. Red Light
eye.

Lots of fruit. all around him.


It was in a corridor, a narrow door seven feet from the ground. huge
The iron crates served as hiding places and protected them from the eyes of those who would deliver them.
Standing before them were velociraptors, not five feet tall. The animals are black.
Yellow with black ivory stripes. They stand on their heads. they
They continued, looking at him with blue eyes. Children Adult feet
The velociraptor roared and roared. Far away from beaming in the shadows, in the dark, kids running around, playing.
produces little food.

Genaro was not surprised and nodded.

Two monsters!

Only a foot or two above the animal's head. The leaders
They trembled, trembling in fear and pain. Sometimes they get hurt.
My patience. So they went and returned with a great crowd.

Wiping his eyes, Janrod knew now that they were onto something big.
However, underground structures are man-made, and they have some unique features;
Railroads. And inside this huge temple there are many monsters: xenora .
Imagine thirteen wild animals. It can be a lot.

"The friendship is," Grant said, smiling. "Four or six adults. The rest are babies and toddlers. inside."
Only two. One last year and one this year. The cubs are about 4 months old.
Probably in April.


One of their favorite sons walked to the other side of the table and joined them, shouting. fluent
He was ten feet away now.

"Oh Jesus," Genaro said. But suddenly an old man came up to him and raised his head.
And hold that baby. The boy was surprised and jumped up.
Adult in the womb. The old man walked slowly, letting the boy hold his head
The throat, the breath. In this scene, the young man is shocked and yells at the three men.
country.

The adults don’t move.

"|He doesn't understand," Gennard said. Why don’t they go for it?

Grant shook his head. "They don't have to look at us. And neither side now… ."
He gave them heart.

"Are you okay?" January said. How long are we here?

"His spirit is measured," Grant said.


The way Grant sees it, there are three classrooms, three teachers. Country Description
It was in the middle near their hands, though it looked like the children were kissing each other and playing .
Many countries. The adults are good to the kids and love the kids.
Sometimes, the older animals are too weak to walk.

Just then a bottle comes to E ́li and hits him on the head. fluent
He looked down and saw a leather purse next to a black one. It exploded somewhere. And that's
He touched the skin of the animal's neck.

The young man shouted.

On the roof of the house, one of the elders complains about the noise.

"Do you think | you can pull it off?" he asked.

"Just hurry."

"Okay," he said, kneeling beside the boy. He shouted again.

The adults shook their heads.

Eli takes the boy in his arms to calm him down so that he does not cry out. He pulled away.
Hands moved over the leather breasts, raising and squeezing them round. The adults shook their heads.
Their heads.

Then one of them started walking towards her.

"Man," Genaro said under his breath.

"You can't go," Grant said. "shut up."

The old man walked towards them, his heels clicking on the concrete. The animal is protected.
Instead of Ellie, who was left with a clothed baby on the bathroom floor. He was young.
He appeared, and Elliot's hand was still on his head. The king lifted his head and spat in the air.
The demon head was close at hand, but he was too stunned to see it.
box. One mouth was removed and dissected.

Grant picked up a glass pipe, took it out of his holster, and cocked the gun. January
He reached out and shook his head, staring at Ellie.

She wasn't wearing pants.

Grant fired the gun and hit Prady. Eli was an old man.

Ellie twisted the leather strap. The stone hit the concrete. old man's head
He frowned slightly, then sat to the side, panting heavily. Back to
Find out, when the little girl screams for joy, and runs away. The old man sat down.
by Eli. Then turn around and go to the edge of the platform.

Genaro took a deep breath. "Jesus. Can we go?"

"No," Grant said. "But | I think we can do some work now."


In the dim light of the night, Grant looked around.
At the entrance, check the first chest. Dirt and grass.
It is the shape of a basket. He counted forty feet. Of course, it doesn’t work
The marriage itself is distant and suddenly bitter and broken
But he considered the echo of the fields in the open. Thus, sellers have
They build nests before laying eggs, and their eggs leave a permanent mark on the soil. fluent
It is also a sign that someone is lost. He counted thirty animals.


The second leg broke in half. But Grant thought he had nine drinks. that
The third option contains five pairs;

"What does all this mean?" January said.

"Thirty-four people died," Grant said. "And how

Have you seen anyone else?”

Grant shook his head. Animals were running around the bottom of the cave, barking
In and out of light.

"I'm looking," Ellie said, lightly scribbling in the book. "You can go
Pictures to be sure, but not all baby teeth are the same. My question is thirty-three.

What about the kids?

"Twenty-two. But God - did you see anything wrong with them?"

"Like what?" Grant said.

"How do they behave over time? Do they fall into a pattern or
homework."

Grant sighed. "It's very dark," he said.

"No, look. Find him. Look at the kids. When they play games, they fall, they run
All the way. But instead, when the kids wake up, watch how they react.
Their bodies. They looked at this wall and the other wall. That's how they'll do it.

"| I don't know, Ellis. Do you think there is an island? Like honey?"

"No, not really," she said. "Well, better. Just a theory."

"And kids do that?"

"No. Everyone does it. Adults do it. Look at them. I told you they would."

Grant sighed. It seemed to be moving very slowly. Animals do all kinds of behaviors but
During breaks, times when they are watching and relaxing, doing their work
In a very important way, there seems to be no limit to the world.

"She dropped me," Grant said. "The air is nice. . ."

"| I don't know, God."

What do they do? A type of social relationship called a physical bond?

"That doesn't make any sense," he said. "Because everybody does that."

Genaro glanced at his watch. "I knew this thing would come in handy one day." below:
The clock face is compact;

Grant said, "How many votes do you have in court?"

"I don't." Genaro shook his head. "My wife gave it to me," he explained, "for my birthday." fluent
He looked at the bottle. “Well,” he said, “they don’t mind going anywhere… | Guess .
They were in the northwest — northwest, something like that."

"They must have heard something," Ellie said, "They're trying not to hear anything . . ."

Grant sighed.

“Or maybe it’s just ritual,” he says, “where animals are encouraged .
They were together. But maybe it doesn't matter much." Ellie smiled. "Or maybe .
They're good. Dinosaurs could be a problem. Or perhaps a form of communication.

Grant thinks so. A bee can communicate with its environment by
dance. You can do the same with dinosaurs.

Gennaro looked at them and said, "Why don't you guys leave the house?"

"Those are the problems,"

"Yeah, but they hide."

Grant raised his hand. At this moment the children began to shriek and jump for joy. that
The adults watched curiously for a while. And, with his voice and his voice calling in the dark
In the background, all the dinosaurs got on wheels and ran around, smashing up the sides of the cave and into the crevices of the
Before dark.


Hammond


John Hammond sat on the ground at the bottom of the hill, trying to catch his breath.
For God's sake, it burned, he confessed. Fire and smoke. It's breathing.


Sponge.


Overlooking the river, forty feet away. It took a few hours afterwards.
The water boiled and began to rise up the mountain. His nose twitched and turned red. fluent
I can’t give him an explanation. He was forced to climb a mountain on one leg, which is now
She winced in pain and fear.

There is a flower. Before he came out of the river, he was drunk, but
He knew this was wrong. Now he’s failed and the world revolves around him again. eventually
It affects his health. But he knew he had to climb the mountain and get back on the road
above. Hammond thought he’d heard footsteps on the street many times in the past.
He was always screaming for help. But somehow the sound did not travel far;
He didn't save her. Then, as the evening wore on, he realized he would
You have to climb a mountain, on foot or not. And that’s what’s happening now.

Kids are curious.

Hammond shook his head and smiled- he had been walking for an hour and .
He just walked up to the third base of Mt. And he was tired as an old dog. your
He stomps his foot. He shook his head. Of course, he knew there was nothing wrong with that: there was
He was almost back to his roots, thank God - but he had to admit, he was tired. stay
At the top of the mountain, she realized she didn’t want to live.

And why doesn't it take long? He thinks. He was seventy-six years old. Not a year.
Look at the gates of the rising mountain. Despite Hammond’s good form for the season.
In his lifetime, he hopes to reach one hundred. It’s really self-care.
We see things as they come. Now he has more reason to live. Other channels have
ride. More surprises to come-

He hears cooing and some birds chirping.
The tree is very tall. She had been training the dogs all morning. There are all kinds of descendants.
Here: animal, paper, snake.

Noise levels are rising, and small towns are increasingly moving into the mountains. some
It's coming. Then he saw a black bird flying over the hill behind him—and another.
And another .

Compys, he thought bitterly.

Fabric manufacturers.

Comics suck. They are like sheep and live
And walk with a little bit of dignity like an animal. But he knew it was poison. Their products
It contains a rare poison that is used to kill animals.

He thought of missing animals and chuckled.

The first group stayed at the bottom of the hill and watched. Stay about five feet away.
He didn’t, and he just watched. Others came and stopped for a moment and stood one over the other.
protect. They whine and get mad and fight.

"Sabo! Get out!" he said, throwing a stone.

The celebrities followed, but they were only a foot or two away. They weren't afraid. Like they knew.
He cannot do them harm.

Hammoud angrily severed a tree branch and threw them down with him. The committees dissolve;
She licked her lips and wept with joy. It was like he was going funny.

Again he thought about the poison. He remembered that there was a leader.
It was broken by a knife in the house. The officer said the poison is similar to heroin.
meat. No pain.

You just want to sleep.

The hell with that, she thought. Hammond grabbed a package, turned it, and shot him.
He pulled a pair of sex toys over his shoulder. The little animal screamed in terror and screamed.
Then, squeeze the button. The other animals followed quickly.

improve.

Hammond stopped and started down the hill again. Hands held in both hands
With his hands, he rubbed at his left knee, feeling pain in his groin. Not quite eleven.
As it turned out, someone had shot him in the leg. He reached out and pulled the beast.
But he went out of the house, and cast himself to the bottom of the mountain. When formed, Company II.
He leans forward and takes a small piece in his hand. He looked shocked, as he saw the blood soaking
on his chest. He sighed and started back to the gym.


There was another lump in his throat and he felt a slight pain in his chest.
He screams and throws the blade at the animal. He leaned against the bushes, breathing heavily.
They stood still, jumping and convulsing, and turned their heads to look at him. from
He felt a burning sensation in his neck and chest.

He lay on his back at the top of the mountain and began to grow, somehow, into himself.
But he realized that nothing was wrong. There is no problem. Malcolm was confused.
Your question. Hammond sighs like a child in a park longing for peace.
When another deputy arrived, he punched him in the back and tried to
clingy. The little animals are coming closer. Soon they were all milling around and cheering.
birds. He nodded as another landed on his back, and the creature squirmed.
and head. Hammond felt very little pain, very little pain, when the company collapsed and he shaved his head.


beach;


Chasing dinosaurs, dodging cliffs and concrete mountains, Grant suddenly jumped
Crossing an inlet, he found himself standing on the beach, looking out over the Atlantic Ocean .
ocean. Around him, young Velociraptors scrambled and teased at the edges. but,
One by one, the horses were piled up on the edge of the grassy lawn near the bus entrance.
mangrove sand, and stood, bent over, looking out to sea.
They were heading east.

"|Not his father," Janrod said.

"|Same," Grant said, but they weren't impressed. The sun doesn’t shine as brightly.
sea; A light breeze blew and the sea was rough. Also, why were they not successful in their work on the field?
What brings all the fighters to the beach?

Genaro glanced at his watch and saw the flies flying.
"Northwest-southeast. Same as before."

On the other side of the beach, deep in the woods, they heard the sound of a fishing boat. “But we
You know what it looks like,” Ellis said.

Then they heard the explosion of coal in the sea, and through the fog they saw the ship burst.
In the west. It was a big freighter, going fast in the east.

"Is that why they left?" January said.

Grant shook his head. "They should have known it was coming,"

As the wheelbarrow passed, all the animals moved, except for the few times they spoke.
meaning or meaning. Grant was impressed with their quality, professionalism, and
Make it a team. But maybe it’s not such a coincidence. In his opinion, a
The rest of the events take place in the tomb.

At first, the children were neglected. So, the authors believe. And finally, all animals
They went to the water. This leads to more powerful baby animals.
He apparently discovered the hole first. The elders took the soldiers to the beach. And as
Grant looked around and saw that the group was now thousands of years old. There is a genetic link.
along the shore, and when the animals were gone, she didn’t move and move as slowly as she should
He was inside. But he’s still working hard, getting better. Adults are considered a
Within a block or so, each adult walked among the children. The children stopped.
Among the great ones she is the only one.

But Grant also notes that not all adults are the same. There was a very beautiful woman.
hat on his head, and he was in the middle of the group as far as the beach.
She remains center stage, too. You feel like something
The pig army, the pastoral order is organized around women, and this
The green cat is the alpha female of the island. The men, he gave their names.
Defensively in the middle of the club.

But unlike feathers, which evolved relatively quickly, dinosaurs lost
They formed slowly- like a military unit. However, it, too, has a problem
oriented in the north-east-south-east. Grant followed. But on the other hand, a
It’s not a surprise. Neuroscientists have been digging for a long time, forgetting how
Very little information can be obtained for some clades. The bones tell you something.
The general appearance of the animal, including height and weight. They can tell you something about how


nerves connected but something about the structure of the animal in life.
They may be the answer to some illnesses that affect their bones. But the toilets are bad.
It’s one thing, of course, how to manage the entire site structure.

Because fossils are human, paleontologists use fossils. Like other
Natural scientists, Grant became an expert in handwork. And in some places
Somehow, he begins to sense the unexpected — that dinosaurs might be real .
Different animals to co-exist and live with each other according to
A symbol for future generations, though, because dinosaur
birds;

"Oh my God," Grant said.

He saw the wild boars standing before him on the shore, watching
ship. And he knew what he was looking at.

“These animals,” Gennard says, “love to run .
here."

"No," Grant said. "They don't want to leave."

"Don't they know?"

"No," Grant said. "They want to go."


He approached the darkness.


"go!" Ellie said. "cute!"

"Yeah," Grant said. He was laughing.

Where do you think they want to go? Illis said.

"|I don't know," Grant said, as thousands of helicopters hovered over the area, creating a fog as well.
There are many weapons in the world. People are scattered.
Just as the whistle blew, one of the helicopters turned back, circled the runway, and flew back.
to the river. The door opened, and soldiers approached with flamethrowers.
they. Grant hears some words in Spanish and sees that Muddy
On the boat with the kids. “Please come with us,” a soldier says in English.
No time here.

Grant looked out to sea where there were waves, but they were gone. All this
Animals are lost. It was like they had never seen him before. The soldiers were attacking and
He let her get under the covers and lean against the door.
Muldoon became enraged and shouted in Grant's ear, "We've got to get out of here now. Let's go
Do it now!

The soldiers pull Grant, Ellie, and Genord to their seats and help them get inside.
Herniations. Tim and Lex gave him a hand and he was surprised at how close they got and
have. Lex rubbed his cock.

An officer approached Grant and shouted, "Sexur: Are you the captain?"

"No," Grant said. "I'm not in charge."

Who’s in charge, anyway?

"|I don't know."

The king went to Janrod and asked him: Are you the chief?

"No," said Gennard.

The officer looked at Ellis, but said nothing. The door opens like a helicopter.
After leaving the ship, Grant was anxious to see if he could contact
raptors, but by then the helicopter was above the pine trees, flying south over the mountains.

Grant leaned over Mildred and yelled, "What about the others?"

Muldoon shouts that they have already released Harding and some of the staff.
accident. He found her on the hill near his house. He must fall.

" correct ?" Grant said.

"No. The comics found them."

"What about Malcolm?" Grant said.

Mildred shook her head.

Grant was nervous to reveal too much. He sighed, and looked at the door. fluent
It’s getting dark now.


He looked out and saw the helicopter and screamed.
That's exactly what happened.

Somewhere they heard thunder and saw another helicopter.
As he walks through the rain towards the parking lot, moments later, the building suddenly collapses .
He glows orange, and Lex starts crying, and Ellie throws her arms around him, trying to comfort him .
protect.

Grant looked down and saw the space barriers again.
They moved like rats, moments before another shot exploded beneath their heads.
Their helicopter crashed and crashed into the sea.

Grant sat back in his chair. He thought of dinosaurs standing on the beach.
He wondered where he would go if they took him away, and was embarrassed and
I was intrigued and comforted at the same time.

The officer came back to him and looked him straight in the eye. Are you the manager?

"No," Grant said.

"You know, Sixer, who's in charge?"

"No one," Grant said.

The helicopter lost air on approach to the ground. Now it’s winter and
The soldiers closed the door. When they did, Grant resurfaced and saw the island.
Against the blue of the sky and the sea, there was a huge cloud on white pearls .
It happened quickly, one after another, the entire island disintegrating and falling into place.
The place glows in the darkness of the night.


initial:


San Jose


Days passed. They were confronted by officers, and taken to a fancy hotel in San Jose,… The
They had the freedom to come and go and talk to whomever they wanted. But they were not abandoned.
department. Every day a young man from the American embassy comes to them and asks questions .
If they need anything, and tell them Washington is doing everything it can to meet
Let them go. But the truth is that many people died in one world.
Costa Rica. The reality is that the climate crisis is preventable. that
The Costa Rican government claims he was cheated and manipulated by John Hammond and his cronies .
group. At the time, the government refused to release the survivors.
urgent. They didn’t want to bury Hammond and Lane Malcolm. They just put them away.

Every day Grant traveled from one government office to another where i
another government official asked. They let him go home.
Words, time and timing. That’s how Grant met John Hammond. Here’s what Grant knows about the business.
How Grant got the fax from New York. Why did Grant go to the island. is
It takes place on an island.

The news, again, is daily. One word.

For a long time Grant said that they had to believe they were being talked to and that.
That’s what they want you to say, but you don’t know what. so,
As expected.

Finally, they sat by the hotel pool one evening and watched Tim and
Lex splash, when an American enters the cockpit.

"We've never seen it before," the American said. "My name is Marty Gutierrez. I'm a teacher here
Bell Station.

"You're the first example of a Prochomygotes," Grant said.

Right, right." Gutierrez sat down next to her. "You should go home.”

"Yeah," Grant said. "|You only have a few days until winter starts. In Montana, you have
You know, the first bite comes in August.

Gutierrez said, "Is that why the Hammond Foundation supports South Goose? Because it does."
Would it have been possible to bring intact genetic material from dinosaurs back to colder climates?

"That's | spiritually, that's."


Gutierrez shook his head. "Hammond is a smart man."

Grant said nothing. Gutierrez sat down at a pool table.

"The authorities aren't going to tell you," Gutierrez finally said. “Because they’re afraid, and maybe .
I am angry with you for what you have done. But something happening.
field to field."

"Did you deliver the child?"

"No, well, he's not. Except something else. Right now, in Isma'aloya's house."
In the wild, animals unknowingly eat plants in an unhealthy way. they
Caught daily on a straight line - as straight as an oyster - from the beach
A mountain in the woods."

Grant sat up straight.

"It's like a process," Gutierrez said. "forbidden?"

Which field? Grant said.

"No, it's fine. They just eat guava leaves and soybeans, and sometimes chicken eggs."

Grant said, "That food has too much lysine. What happened to these animals?"

"Well," Gutierrez said, "we're going into the woods. Anyway, we're not
find. Of course, they would be hard to find in the wild. A team of researchers can
For years on Mount Ishmael, nothing was certain.

"And we're trapped here because…"

Gutierrez raised his hand. "The government is scared. Maybe there are more monsters. More
conflict. They think about them.

Do you think there are too many monsters? Grant said.

"|I can't tell you. Can you tell me?"

"No," Grant said. "I can't say."

"But you think?"

Grant shook his head. "Okay. Yeah."

"| That's good."

Gutierrez rose from the floor. He waved to Tim and Lex as they swam. "bridge
They send kids home.
glasses. "Please come with us, Dr. Grant. It's a nice area here."

You’re telling me we’re not going anywhere? Grant said.

“None of us are going anywhere, Dr. Grant,” Gutierrez said, laughing. And he stopped and
He returned to the hotel entrance.



   
